





YOU CAN’T SCARE ME! 
Goosebumps -15 
R.L. Stine 


1 


The day we decided to scare Courtney was the day of our class field trip. 

Mr. Melvin, our teacher, and Ms. Prince, the other sixth-grade teacher, 
stood counting us as we boarded the yellow school bus. 

Courtney was first in line, of course. Courtney makes sure she is 
always first in line. Her friend Denise boarded right behind her. 

It was a gray day. Dark storm clouds rolled overhead, blocking the 
sun. The guy on the radio said there was a ninety percent chance of rain. 

I didn’t care. I was happy to be getting out of school. 

I pushed my friend Hat into the kid in front of him. His real name is 
Herbie, but everyone calls him Hat. That’s because no one has ever seen 
him without a baseball cap on his head. I’ve known Hat since fourth grade, 
and I don’t think I’ve ever seen his hair. 

The kid in front spun around and shoved Hat back at me. 

“Hey—give me a break!” Hat shouted. He slugged me hard on the 
shoulder. “You made me swallow my gum, Eddie.” 

“Hey, guys, be cool,” Mr. Melvin said, frowning at us. He’s the kind of 
teacher who always says things like “be cool” and tries to act like he’s our 
friend. But he’s a pretty good teacher, anyway. 

And he takes us on a lot of field trips, which is cool. 

“Why are we going to a forest?” Hat grumbled, slipping another piece 
of bubble gum into his mouth. “What are we supposed to look for?” 

“Trees, I guess,” I replied. I didn’t remember why we were going to 
Greene Forest. I just remembered we were supposed to take notes. 

“Eddie, want some bubble gum?” 

I turned around to see my friend Charlene right behind me in line. She 
and my other friend Molly had big gobs of grape gum in their mouths and 
were chewing hard. 

“Molly, how can you chew that stuff with braces?” I asked. 

She opened her mouth in a wide grin, showing me her teeth. “It 
doesn’t stick too much,” she said. 

Molly’s braces are red and blue. She’s always showing them off. I 
don’t know why. 



Molly and Charlene look so much alike, almost like sisters. They both 
have short brown hair and brown eyes. They’re both about my height, five 
two. They both wear faded jeans and big, oversized T-shirts all the time. 
The only difference between Molly and Charlene is that Molly wears 
glasses and has braces, and Charlene doesn’t. 

“I’ll protect you two in the deep, dark forest,” I teased. “You know. In 
case you’re attacked by fleas or something.” 

“Eddie’s a real macho guy,” Hat said, grinning. “He’s real brave.” He 
punched my shoulder. Hard. 

I pretended it didn’t hurt. 

“You both have fleas,” Charlene said. 

“We’ll protect you, Eddie,” Molly offered. “There might be some 
vicious worms there!” 

Hat, Molly, and Charlene burst out laughing. Molly was teasing me 
about the time the four of us went fishing at Muddy Creek, and I had a little 
trouble putting a worm on my hook. 

“I wasn’t afraid of that worm!” I cried angrily. “It was just yucky, 
that’s all.” 

I scowled at Molly, but I wasn’t really angry. I’m used to being teased. 
Kids always make fun of my freckles and my red hair. And my older 
brother, Kevin, calls me Bugs. He says I look just like Bugs Bunny because 
my two front teeth stick out. 

“What’s up, doc? What’s up, doc?” That’s all Kevin ever says to me. 
He and his high school pals think it’s a riot. 

I climbed onto the bus and scrambled past Hat to get a window seat. 
Courtney and Denise had taken the front seat, of course. Courtney was 
brushing her long, blonde hair, using the bus window as a mirror. Denise 
was writing something in her notebook. 

Hat slammed into me, and I stumbled down the aisle. He quickly slid 
into the seat and moved to the window. “Hey—no fair!” I shouted. 

He giggled his high-pitched giggle and grinned at me. Hat is my best 
pal, but I have to admit he’s sort of goofy-looking. I mean, he’s always 
grinning, sort of like Dopey in Snow White and the Seven Dwarfs. And he 
has really big ears that bend down beneath his baseball cap, sort of doubled 
over. 

He’s a good guy. He really makes Molly, Charlene, and me laugh all 
the time. 

“I get the window going back,” I said, slumping down beside Hat. 
Charlene messed up my hair as she walked past. 

“Why do they call it Greene Forest?” Hat asked, pressing his nose 
against the window, watching it steam up from his breath. “Why not Blue 
Forest or Red Forest?” 

“A guy named Greene used to own it,” I told him. “He gave the land to 
the city when he died.” 

“I knew that,” Hat said. What a liar. 

I spun his cap around till it was backwards. He really hates that. But he 
deserved it for grabbing the window seat. 

A few minutes later, the bus was bouncing toward Greene Forest. A 
few minutes after that, we were piling out of the bus, staring at the tall trees 
that reached up to the dark, cloudy sky. 

“Make two columns on your work sheet,” Ms. Prince was telling 
everyone. “One for wildlife and one for plantlife.” 

“I’m putting you down as plantlife,” I told Charlene. 

She stuck her tongue out at me with the big, purple blob of bubble 
gum on the tip. Hat slapped her on the back really hard, and the wad of 
bubble gum went flying. 

Charlene cried out angrily and tried to slug him, but Hat backed away 
to safety. He was too fast for her. 

The teachers divided us into groups, and we began to explore the 
forest. We followed a narrow dirt path that twisted through the trees. 

It was cooler in the forest, and dark. I wished the sun would come out. 

“What’s that green stuff on that tree?” Hat asked me, pointing. “Is that 
moss? Is moss wildlife or plantlife?” 

“You should know,” I told him. “You have it growing on your back!” 

Molly and Charlene laughed, but Hat didn’t. “Can’t you ever be 
serious?” He scribbled something on his work sheet. 

I glanced down at mine. I hadn’t written anything yet. I mean, I’d only 
seen a bunch of trees and some weeds. Who cared about writing that down? 

“The creatures are hiding,” Ms. Prince was telling the group of kids 
ahead of us. “Search for their hiding places. Look for holes in the ground 
and in trees. Look for hidden nests.” 

I gazed up at the trees above my head. The leaves were too thick to see 

any nests. I was about to tell Hat he should look under some rocks because 
that’s where he came from. But before I could, I heard a hushed cry behind 
us. 

“Ssshhh! Look! A deer!” 

We all turned back to see who had called out. Of course it was 
Courtney. Who else would be the first to spot a deer? 

She and Denise were frozen like statues, staring into a narrow space 
between the trees. Courtney kept raising her finger to her lips, signaling for 
everyone to be silent. 

Hat, Molly, Charlene, and I went running over to see the deer. “I don’t 
see anything,” I said, squinting hard into the trees. 

“It ran away,” Courtney told me. 

“You missed it,” Denise added. I watched her write deer on her work 
sheet under wildlife. She already had four other creatures on her list. I 
didn’t have any. 

“Did you see the sleeping bat?” Courtney asked me. 

“Bat?” I don’t like bats. They’re so ugly. And what if one bites you? 

“It was hanging on that tree,” Courtney said, pointing behind us. “How 
could you miss it?” 

I shrugged. 

“There’s a birch tree,” Denise told Courtney. “And there’s a weeping 
beech tree. Add them to the list.” 

Hat, Molly, and Charlene had moved on along the trail, and I hurried 
to catch up to them. Courtney and Denise were working too hard, in my 
opinion. Field trips are supposed to be for goofing and having fun away 
from school. 

We made our way slowly through the forest. After a while, the sun 
came out and sent shafts of yellow light down through the trees. 

I tried to push Hat into a huge patch of poison ivy. But he dodged 
away from me, and I went sprawling face down in the dirt. 

I was still brushing myself off when I saw the snake. 

Right beside my left sneaker. 

It was bright green, and big. 

I stopped breathing. I stared down at it. 

I had nearly stepped on it. 

As I stared helplessly, it arched its head, opened its jaws, and darted 



forward to bite my leg. 

I opened my mouth to scream, but no sound came out. 



2 


The snake dived toward me. I shut my eyes and waited for the stab of pain. 

“Ohh.” A low, frightened cry escaped my lips. 

I opened my eyes to see Courtney holding up the snake. “Courtney—I 
—I—” I stammered. 

“Eddie, you’re not scared of this, are you?” Courtney demanded, 
raising the snake to my face. Its black eyes stared up at me. It flicked its 
tongue. 

“It’s a harmless green snake, Eddie,” Courtney said. “You can’t be 
afraid of a green snake! ” 

I heard Denise snickering behind me. 

Courtney petted the snake, stroking it, letting it slide through her 
fingers. 

“Uh... I wasn’t really scared,” I muttered. But my voice trembled. I 
could tell Courtney didn’t believe me. 

“A harmless green snake,” she repeated. She set the snake down on the 
ground. 

I jumped back. I thought it was coming for me again. 

But it slid silently into the weeds. 

Hat laughed. A high-pitched, nervous laugh. 

Denise shook her head scornfully. 

“Add that to the list,” Courtney told her. “Green snake. That makes 
seven in the wildlife column.” 

“We should write down chicken,” Denise said, staring at me. “That 
would make eight.” 

“Cluck cluck,” I replied bitterly. I motioned for my friends to follow 
me, and we hurried up the path. We could hear Courtney and Denise both 
laughing. 

“Don’t feel bad,” Hat said to me, patting my shoulder. “Just because 
she made you look like a total jerk.” 

Molly laughed, but Charlene didn’t. “Courtney was just showing off,” 
Charlene said to me. “For a change.” 

“I wish that snake had bitten her perfect nose,” Molly added. “You 



know. Put a little dent in it.” 

“I really wasn’t afraid,” I insisted shrilly. “The snake surprised me, 
that’s all. I knew it was harmless.” 

“Yeah. Right,” Hat replied, rolling his beady little black eyes. I made a 
swipe at his cap but missed. 

“Coming through! Coming through!” Courtney called. She and Denise 
hurried past us, swinging their work sheets in one hand as they passed by. 

Denise turned and hissed at me like a snake. Courtney laughed. 

“I suppose they’ll be teasing me about the green snake for the next 
hundred years,” I said with a sigh. 

“We’ll all tease you about it for a hundred years,” Molly promised. 

I trudged unhappily along the path. Golden sunshine filtered down 
through the trees, but it didn’t brighten my spirits. A cute red-furred squirrel 
scampered across the path. I wasn’t interested. 

My day had been ruined. 

Ruined by Courtney and that stupid green snake. 

I could hear kids up ahead laughing about it. Every time I looked at 
Hat, he grinned at me as if to say, “You really blew it today, Eddie.” 

It’s not a big deal, I kept telling myself. So I got scared of a snake. 
And I had to be rescued by Courtney. So what? 

“Look out, Eddie. There’s a caterpillar. It might bite!” some kid called 
from a clump of tall weeds up ahead. 

“Give me a break!” I cried angrily. 

As I made my way along the path, the forest became a bright green 
blur to me. Other kids were busy adding to the lists on their work sheets. 

But I couldn’t see anything to add. The air became hot and damp. My 
T-shirt stuck to my back. Little white gnats flew around my face. 

I was really glad when the path ended and we stepped out near the 
parking lot. We had made a complete circle. The school bus stood at the 
edge of the grass, its door open invitingly. 

But no one was getting on the bus. 

To my surprise, I saw a big crowd of kids huddled in a circle several 
feet from the bus. They were standing silently, staring straight ahead. 

“What—what’s up?” I called to Charlene, who was hurrying toward 
the silent circle of kids. 


“It’s Courtney!” she called back. 



I began running, too. 

The kids were huddled so silently. No one moved. 
Had something terrible happened to Courtney? 



3 


What happened to her? Did she faint or something? Was she bitten by some 
kind of forest animal? 

I ran across the grass and pushed my way into the circle of kids. 

And I saw Courtney standing in the center of the circle, an excited 
smile on her face. 

I was wrong. Nothing terrible had happened to Courtney. 

She was showing off again. 

She had her hand raised and was showing everyone her open palm. 
Two enormous bumblebees were in her hand, walking across her palm. 

I sucked in my breath and stared along with the others. 

Courtney’s smile grew wider as her eyes landed on me. 

One of the bees had crossed her wrist and was walking down her arm. 
The other bee stood in the center of her palm. 

Mr. Melvin and Ms. Prince stood in the circle across from Courtney. 
They had admiring expressions on their faces. Mr. Melvin was smiling. Ms. 
Prince had her arms crossed tensely in front of her. She looked a little more 
worried than Mr. Melvin. 

“Bees will not sting you unless they are provoked,” Courtney said 
softly. 

“What do they feel like?” a kid asked. 

“They kind of tickle,” Courtney told him. 

Some kids hid their eyes. A few others groaned or shuddered. 

“Get rid of them!” someone urged. 

The bee crawled up Courtney’s arm toward the sleeve of her T-shirt. I 
wondered what she’d do if it crawled under her shirt. 

Would she panic then? 

Would she go totally nuts, screaming and thrashing her arms, trying to 
get it out? 

No. No way. Not Courtney. 

Cool, calm Courtney would never panic. 

The other bee walked slowly across her hand. 



“It tickles. It really does,” Courtney giggled. Her blonde hair gleamed 
in the sunlight. Her blue eyes twinkled excitedly. 

Come on, bee — sting! STING! I urged silently. 

I wondered if anyone else had the same secret wish. 

It was a mean thought, I admit. But Courtney was really asking for it. 

Come on—just one little sting! I begged, concentrating with all my 
might. 

The bee on her arm turned around when it reached the T-shirt sleeve 
and made its way back slowly toward Courtney’s elbow. 

“Bees are really very gentle,” Courtney said softly. 

Both bees were in her palm now. 

Courtney smiled at me. I felt a shiver go down my back. How does she 
do that? I wondered. 

I had to admit to myself that I was afraid of bees. I’d always been 
afraid of them, ever since I’d been stung when I was a little kid. 

“Would anyone else like to try this?” Courtney asked. 

Nervous laughter rose up from the circle. No one was crazy enough to 
volunteer. 

“Here, Eddie—catch!” Courtney cried. 

And before I could move or shout or duck or do anything —she pulled 
back her hand and tossed both bees at me! 



4 


I screamed and stepped back. 

I heard loud gasps all around. 

One of the bees hit my shoulder and dropped to the grass. 

The other bee fluttered onto the front of Hat’s shirt and stuck there. 

“Get it off! Get it off!” Hat screamed. He shook his shirt with both 
hands and did a wild, frightened dance. 

Some kids were screaming. But most everyone was laughing 
uproariously. 

I had my eye on the bee on the grass. It buzzed loudly off the ground 
and made a dive for my face. 

“Whoa!” I screamed and dropped to my knees, flailing my hands 
above my head. 

“I think it’s time to get back to school,” I heard Mr. Melvin say over 
the laughter of the other kids. 

Courtney flashed me a smug grin as I walked past her down the aisle 
on the bus. I kept my eyes straight ahead and walked faster, ignoring her. 

Some kids were making buzzing bee sounds. Others were hissing like 
snakes. Everyone thought it was a total riot that Hat and I had acted like 
such chickens. 

I slumped down into the very last seat with a sigh. Hat dropped beside 
me and pulled his cap down over his eyes. 

The seat stretched all the way across the back of the bus. Molly and 
Charlene joined us. Charlene was chewing her bubble gum furiously. Molly 
was trying to unstick her gum from her braces. 

None of us said a word until the bus pulled away. 

Then we started to grumble in low voices about Courtney and what a 
show-off she was. “She just thinks she’s the greatest,” Hat muttered 
unhappily. 

“She acts as if she isn’t afraid of anything,” Charlene said. “Like she’s 
Superwoman or something.” 

“Throwing those bees at Eddie was a mean joke,” Molly added, still 
struggling to unstick the gum from her braces. 



“She knows what a chicken Eddie is,” Hat said. “She knew he’d 
scream and carry on like a jerk.” 

“Well, so did you!” I cried, not meaning to sound so babyish. 

“Hey, I’m on your side!” Hat insisted, giving me a shove. 

I shoved him back. I was really angry. Mostly with myself, I guess. 

“There’s got to be something that Courtney is afraid of,” Charlene said 
thoughtfully. 

The bus stopped at a red light. I glanced out the window and saw that 
we were at the woods that led to Muddy Creek. “Maybe she’s afraid of the 
Mud Monsters,” I suggested. 

My three friends laughed bitterly. “No way,” Charlene said. “No one 
really believes in the Mud Monsters anymore. That’s a stupid old fairy tale. 
No way Courtney would be afraid of them.” 

There’s a legend in our town that the Mud Monsters live under the 
muddy banks of the creek. And sometimes when the moon is full, the Mud 
Monsters rise up from the creek bed, all dripping with mud, and look for 
victims to pull down in the mud with them. 

It’s a good story. I used to believe it when I was a little kid. My 
brother, Kevin, always took me into the woods there. He would tell me 
about the Mud Monsters rising up. Then he’d start to point and tremble and 
say that he saw them. I tried not to get scared. But I couldn’t help it. I 
always started screaming and running for my life! 

“Is your brother still making that movie about the Mud Monsters?” 
Hat asked. 

I nodded. “Yeah. You should see the disgusting costumes he and his 
friends cooked up. They’re really gross.” 

Kevin and some of his friends were making a home video for one of 
their high school courses. It was a horror movie called The Mud Monsters 
of Muddy Creek. 

I begged him to let me be in it. But he said he couldn’t take the risk. 
“What if the real Mud Monsters rose up and came after you?” he asked, 
grinning at me. 

I tried to explain that I was too old, that he couldn’t scare me with that 
stuff anymore. But Kevin still wouldn’t let me be in the video. 

The bus started with a jolt. I glanced up to the front and saw Courtney 
and Denise staring back at me, laughing. 



I turned to my friends. “We’ve got to find a way to scare Courtney,” I 
said heatedly. “We’ve got to!” 

“Eddie’s right,” Hat quickly agreed. “We’ve got to find a way to scare 
Courtney and embarrass her in front of a whole bunch of kids. Otherwise, 
she’ll never let us forget today.” 

“But she’s so brave, so totally fearless,” Charlene said, shaking her 
head. “What could we possibly do to frighten her?” 

We all moaned quietly, shaking our heads, thinking hard. 

Then I saw an evil smile break across Molly’s face. She pushed her 
glasses up on her nose. Behind them, her brown eyes sparkled with 
excitement. “I think I have an idea,” she whispered. 



5 


“My brother has a disgusting rubber snake,” Molly whispered. Her excited 
grin grew wider. 

The four of us huddled together on the edge of the back seat. Every 
time the bus bounced, we nearly fell to the floor. 

“Courtney isn’t afraid of snakes,” Hat interrupted. “She likes to pet 
them. Remember?” 

“That was a stupid green snake,” Molly whispered. “My brother’s 
mbber snake is big and black. The mouth is open. It’s got these huge, 
pointy white fangs. It’s got a fierce expression on its face, and—” 

“Does it look real or does it look fake?” I asked. 

The bus hit a hard bump. We all bounced a foot straight up. 

“It looks real,” Molly replied, her eyes flashing behind her glasses. 
“And it feels warm and kind of sticky.” 

“Yuck!” Charlene exclaimed, making a face. 

“He’s scared me with it a dozen times,” Molly confessed. “It’s so real 
and disgusting, I’m fooled by it every time. Once when I reached under my 
pillow in the middle of the night and felt it there, I screamed for at least an 
hour. No one could get me to stop.” 

“Great!” Hat declared. 

I still had my doubts. “You really think it’ll make Courtney scream?” 

Molly nodded. “She’ll freak. She’ll totally freak. This rubber snake is 
ugly enough to scare a real snake!” 

We all laughed loudly. Some kids in the front turned to see what was 
so funny. I could see Courtney and Denise in the front seat, writing in their 
notebooks. They were probably copying their work sheet lists over. They 
both had to be perfect students in every way. 

“I can’t wait to scare Courtney,” I said as the bus pulled up to our 
school. “You sure you can get this snake from your brother, Molly?” 

Molly grinned at me. “I know which drawer he keeps it in. I’ll just 
borrow it.” 

“But what are we going to do with it?” Charlene demanded. “How are 
we going to scare Courtney with it? Where are we going to hide it?” 



“In her lunch bag, of course,” Molly replied. 

The four of us climbed off the bus with big smiles on our faces. 


* * * 


The lunch bags were kept on a low bookshelf in the back of our classroom. 
My class always eats lunch right in our classroom. Our school is very small 
so a cafeteria was never built. Courtney’s lunch was always easy to spot. It 
was the biggest one on the shelf. 

Her mother always packed her two sandwiches and two boxes of juice. 
Plus a bag of potato chips and an apple, some string cheese, and usually a 
fruit rollup or two. 

I don’t know why Courtney’s mom gave her such big lunches. There 
was no way Courtney could eat it all. She became a big hero at lunchtime 
because she shared a lot of it with kids who had crummy lunches. 

The next morning, I got to school a little late. The lunch bags were 
already spread out on the low shelf. I could see Courtney’s overstuffed 
brown paper bag at the end. 

I studied Courtney’s lunch bag as I set mine down at the other end. 
Had Molly succeeded in her mission? Had she stuffed the rubber snake into 
the bag? 

I couldn’t tell by looking at the bag. But I could tell by looking at 
Molly. Her face was bright red, and she kept darting nervous glances at me. 

Yes. 

Molly had succeeded. 

Now we just had to survive the three and a half hours until lunchtime. 

How would I be able to concentrate on anything? I kept turning around 
in my seat and glancing back at Courtney’s bulging lunch bag. 

I kept imagining what was about to happen. I pictured the wonderful 
scene again and again. I saw Courtney sitting across the table from Denise, 
as she always did. I saw her chattering away. I saw her reach into the brown 
paper bag.... 

I saw the horrified look on Courtney’s face. I imagined her scream. I 
imagined the snake popping up from the bag, its fangs bared, its eyes 
glowing like hot coals. 

I pictured Courtney shrieking in fright and everyone else laughing at 



her, making fun of her. I imagined myself walking over casually and 
picking up the snake. “Why, it’s only rubber, Courtney,” I’d say, holding it 
up high so everyone could see. “You shouldn’t be afraid of rubber snakes. 
They’re harmless. Perfectly harmless!” 

What a victory! 

All morning long, Hat, Molly, Charlene, and I kept grinning at each 
other, casting secret glances back and forth. I don’t think we heard a single 
word Mr. Melvin said. 

I couldn’t tell you what spelling words were written on the blackboard. 
And I couldn’t tell you what kind of math was on my review sheet. It was 
just a blur of numbers and squiggly signs to me. 

My three friends and I spent most of the morning staring eagerly at the 
clock. Finally, lunchtime rolled around. 

We hung back, all four of us. We waited at our tables and watched 
Courtney and Denise walk together to the back of the room to get their 
lunches. 

We watched Courtney bend down in front of the bookshelf. First she 
handed Denise’s lunch up to her. Then she picked up her own bag. 

The two of them made their way to the table where they always sat. 
They pulled out chairs and sat down across from each other. 

This is it, I thought, holding my breath. 

This is the big moment. 



6 


My friends and I hurried to get our lunches. We didn’t want anyone to 
wonder why we were just standing there staring at Courtney. 

We sat down at our usual table. I kept my eyes glued on Courtney. I 
was so nervous and eager, I thought I would burst! 

Courtney started to open her lunch bag. 

Just then, everyone heard a low groan from the back of the room. It 
was Mr. Melvin. “Oh, no,” he cried. “I forgot my lunch today.” 

“That’s no problem,” Courtney called back to him. 

Mr. Melvin walked over to her table. He leaned down and started 
talking to her. I couldn’t hear what they were saying. It’s always really 
noisy in the room at lunchtime with everyone talking and laughing and 
crinkling their lunch bags and unwrapping their food. 

Hat, Molly, Charlene, and I were the only ones in the room who were 
being quiet. We watched as Courtney and Mr. Melvin continued to talk. 

“What are they talking about?” Hat whispered to me. “Why doesn’t he 
let her open her bag?” 

I shrugged, keeping my eyes on Courtney. She had a thoughtful 
expression on her face. Then she smiled up at him. 

Then she handed him her lunch bag. 

“No, really, it’s fine,” Courtney said to Mr. Melvin. “You can have 
some of my lunch. You know my mom always packs too much.” 

“Oh, no,” I groaned. I suddenly felt sick. 

“Should we warn him?” Hat asked me. 

Too late. 

Still standing beside Courtney’s table, Mr. Melvin opened the bag and 
reached inside. His eyes narrowed in bewilderment. 

Then he let out a high-pitched, startled cry as he pulled the big, black 
snake out. 

The lunch bag dropped to the floor. The rubber snake wriggled briefly 
in his hand. 

Molly was right. It was very real-looking. 

Mr. Melvin let out another cry, and the snake dropped to the floor. 



The room filled with startled shrieks and cries. 

Courtney leapt up from her seat. She gave Mr. Melvin a gentle shove 
to move him out of the way. Then she began stomping on the snake. Fierce, 
hard stomps. 

Heroic stomps. 

A few seconds later, she picked the snake up and flashed Mr. Melvin a 
triumphant grin. The snake was in two pieces. She had stomped off its head. 
“My brother is going to kill me!” Molly moaned. 

“Well, at least we scared Mr. Melvin,” Charlene said after school. Charlene 
always tries to look on the bright side. 

“I can’t believe he spent the rest of the afternoon trying to find out 
who put the snake in the bag,” Hat exclaimed. 

“Courtney kept looking over at us,” I said. “Do you think she 
suspected us?” 

“Probably,” Hat replied. “I’m just glad to get out of there.” 

“Mr. Melvin has a really funny scream,” Charlene remarked. 

Molly didn’t say a word. I guessed she was thinking about what her 
brother would do to her when he discovered his rubber snake was gone. 

We were walking to my house. We had all agreed to hold a meeting 
and try to come up with a better plan for scaring Courtney. 

It was a beautiful, warm day. It had been raining all week. This was the 
rainy season in southern California. But today the sun was bright yellow in 
a clear, smogless sky. 

Everyone was thinking about how we almost got caught—and how we 
failed at frightening Courtney. 

We failed. And Courtney was a hero once again. 

“The rubber snake was a bad idea,” Hat murmured as we crossed the 
street onto my block. 

“Tell us about it,” Molly grumbled, rolling her eyes. 

“Courtney will never fall for a fake,” Hat continued. “We need 
something real to scare Courtney. Something alive.” 

“Huh? Something alive?” I asked. 

Hat started to reply—but a woman’s voice interrupted him. 

I turned to see Mrs. Rudolph, one of our neighbors, running toward us. 
Her blonde hair was all wild, and she had a very troubled expression on her 



“Eddie, please—you’ve got to help me!” she cried. 


face. 



7 


I felt a cold chill run down my back. Mrs. Rudolph looked so frightened. 

“What’s w-wrong?” I stammered. 

She pointed up to the sky. “Can you help me?” 

“Huh?” I followed her gaze. It took me a while to realize she was 
pointing up to a tree branch, not to the sky. 

“It’s Muttly, my cat,” Mrs. Rudolph said, shielding her eyes from the 
sun with one hand, still pointing with the other. 

“I see him,” Hat said. “On that branch. The bent one.” 

“I don’t know how he got out of the house,” Mrs. Rudolph said. “He 
never climbs trees. Somehow he got up there, and he can’t get down.” 

I stared up into the thick leaves. Yep. There was Muttly. Pretty high 
up. Making frightened yowling sounds and pawing at the slender tree 
branch. 

We all stood staring up at the frightened cat. 

Suddenly I felt Mrs. Rudolph’s hand on my shoulder. “Can you climb 
up and get him, Eddie?” 

I swallowed hard. I’m not the best tree climber in the world. In fact, I 
hate climbing trees. I always cut my hands on the bark or scrape the skin 
off my stomach or something. 

“Please hurry,” Mrs. Rudolph pleaded. “Muttly’s so scared. He—he’s 
going to fall.” 

So what if he falls! Aren’t cats supposed to have nine lives? 

That’s what I thought. But I didn’t say that to Mrs. Rudolph. 

Instead, I stammered something about how high up he was. 

“You’re good at climbing trees, aren’t you?” Mrs. Rudolph said. “I 
mean, all boys your age climb trees, don’t they?” Her eyes studied me. She 
had a strong look of disapproval on her face. 

She thinks I’m a chicken, I realized. 

If I don’t climb the tree and rescue her stupid cat, she’ll tell my mom 
what a weakling I am. The word will be out all over the neighborhood: Mrs. 
Rudolph asked Eddie for help, and he just stood there like a coward, 
making lame excuses. 



“I’m a little afraid of heights,” I confessed. 

“Go ahead, Eddie,” Hat urged. “You can do it.” Some friend. 

Above us, the cat yowled loudly. He sounded like a baby crying. His 
tail stood stiffly straight up in the air. 

“You can do it, Eddie,” Charlene said, staring up at the cat. 

“Please hurry,” Mrs. Rudolph pleaded. “My kids will be heartbroken if 
anything happens to Muttly.” 

I hesitated, gazing up the long, rough-barked trunk. 

The cat yowled again. 

I saw the branch tremble. I saw the cat’s legs scrabble frantically as he 
lost his grip. 

Then I heard the cat yelp as he started to fall. 



8 


We all screamed. 

The branch bobbed up and down. The cat clung to the branch with his 
front paws. Its back legs kicked the air furiously. 

“Oh no oh no oh no!” Mrs. Rudolph chanted, covering her eyes with 
one hand. 

The cat yowled in terror. 

Somehow he managed to pull himself back up onto the shaking tree 
branch. Then he cried again, frightened, human-sounding cries. 

Mrs. Rudolph lowered her hand from her eyes. She stared disgustedly 
at me. “I guess I’d better call the fire department.” 

I knew I should grab onto the tree trunk and pull myself up. But I 
really am afraid of heights. I’m just not a good climber. 

With an exasperated sigh, Mrs. Rudolph turned and started jogging to 
her house. She stopped when we heard a girl’s voice cry out. 

“Hey—what’s the problem?” 

Courtney rolled onto the sidewalk on her sleek red racing bike. She 
hopped off and let the bike fall to the ground. She was wearing white denim 
overalls over a bright yellow T-shirt. 

“What’s going on, guys?” she asked, hurrying up to us. 

“My cat—” Mrs. Rudolph said, pointing up to the tree. 

The cat yowled in panic. 

Courtney gazed up to the bobbing branch. 

“I’ll get him down,” Courtney said. She grabbed the tree trunk and 
began shinnying up. 

The cat meowed and nearly slipped again. 

Courtney climbed quickly, easily, wrapping her legs around the trunk, 
pulling herself up with both hands. 

A few seconds later, she made her way onto the branch, grabbed the 
cat around the stomach with one hand, and pulled him close to her body. 
Then she skillfully lowered herself to the ground. 

“Here’s the poor kitty,” Courtney said, smoothing the cat’s fur, petting 
it gently. She handed him to Mrs. Rudolph. Courtney’s white denims and 



yellow T-shirt were smeared with dirt and bits of dark bark. She had pieces 
of green leaves in her blonde hair. 

“Oh, thank you,” Mrs. Rudolph gushed, wrapping the still mewing cat 
in her arms. “Thank you so much, dear. You were so wonderful.” 

Courtney brushed some of the dirt off her overalls. “I like climbing 
trees,” she told Mrs. Rudolph. “It’s really fun.” 

Mrs. Rudolph turned her gaze to me, and her smile quickly faded. “I’m 
glad someone in this neighborhood is brave,” she said, making a disgusted 
face. She thanked Courtney again, then turned and carried the cat into the 
house. 

I felt so bad. I wanted to sink into the ground with the worms. I wanted 
to disappear and never be seen again. 

But there I was, standing with my hands shoved in my jeans pockets. 

And there was Courtney, grinning at me. Gloating. Rubbing it in with 
that smug look on her face. 

Hat, Molly, and Charlene didn’t say a word. When I looked at them, 
they avoided my eyes. I knew they were embarrassed for me. And angry 
that Courtney had made us all look bad again. 

Courtney picked up her bike and started walking it away. She threw 
her leg over the bar and climbed on to the seat. Then she suddenly turned 
back to me. 

“Hey, Eddie—was it you who put that dumb snake in my lunch?” 

“Of course not!” I exclaimed. I kicked the grass with one sneaker. 

She continued to stare at me, her blue eyes studying my face. 

I knew I was blushing. I could feel my cheeks grow hot. But there was 
nothing I could do about it. 

“I thought maybe it was you,” Courtney said, tossing her hair behind 
her shoulder. “I thought maybe you were trying to pay me back. You know. 
For the green snake thing.” 

“No way,” I muttered. “No way, Courtney.” 

My three friends shifted uncomfortably. Hat started humming some 
song. 

Finally, Courtney raised her feet to the pedals and rode off down the 
street. 

“We’ve got to find a way to scare her,” I said through clenched teeth as 
soon as she had ridden out of sight. “We’ve just got to!” 



“How about a live tarantula down her back?” Hat suggested. 



9 


The plan was simple. 

Mr. Dollinger, the science teacher, kept two tarantulas in a cage in the 
second-floor science lab. 

Hat and I would sneak into the science lab after school on Thursday. 
We would borrow one of the tarantulas and hide it in my locker overnight. 

The next morning, we all had gym right after morning meeting. There 
is a narrow balcony over the gym floor where equipment is stored. Hat and 
I would sneak up onto the balcony with the tarantula. 

Then Molly and Charlene would start talking to Courtney and get her 
to stand under the balcony. When Courtney was in position under the 
balcony, one of us would drop the tarantula onto Courtney’s head. 

Then she’d scream and howl, and the tarantula would get tangled in 
her hair, and she wouldn’t be able to get it out, so she’d scream some more 
and go totally ballistic, and we’d all have a good laugh. 

A simple plan. 

And one we were sure would work. 

What could go wrong? 

Thursday after school, Molly and Charlene wished us luck. Hat and I went 
into the shop room and pretended to be working on our wood projects. 
Actually, we were waiting for all the kids to leave the school building. 

Pretty soon it was silent out in the hall. I poked my head out the shop 
door. Empty. 

“Okay, Hat,” I whispered, motioning for him to follow me. “Let’s get 
this over with.” 

We crept out into the hall. Our shoes scraped noisily against the hard 
tile floor. The halls at school are kind of creepy when everyone has left and 
it’s so quiet. 

We passed by the teachers’ lounge near the front stairway. The door 
was open a crack, and I could hear some kind of teachers’ meeting going 
on. 

That’s great, I told myself. If the teachers are all meeting downstairs, 



we will have the science lab to ourselves. 

Hat and I hurried up the front stairs. We leaned on the banister and 
tried to move as silently as we could. 

The science lab is at the end of the hall on the second floor. We passed 
by a couple of eighth graders we didn’t know. But we didn’t see anyone 
else. There didn’t seem to be any teachers up there. They were probably all 
at the meeting. 

Hat and I peeked into the lab. Late afternoon sunlight poured in 
through the windows. We had to squint down the long rows of lab tables. 

“Mr. Dollinger?” I called. I just wanted to make sure he wasn’t there. 

No reply. 

We both tried to squeeze through the door at the same time, but we 
didn’t fit. Hat laughed. His nervous, high-pitched giggle. I raised a finger to 
my lips, signaling for him to be quiet. I didn’t want anyone to hear us. 

Hat followed me down the center aisle of the long room. My heart 
began to thud loudly in my chest. My eyes darted around the room. 

The sunlight seemed to grow even brighter. The watercolor paintings 
of the rain forest we had all made were hanging on the wall behind Mr. 
Dollinger’s desk. Water dripped in one of the lab sinks to our right. Plonk. 
Plonk. Plonk. 

The door to the tall metal supply cabinet beside Mr. Dollinger’s desk 
had been left open. I pointed it out to Hat. “That probably means he’s 
coming back up here after the teachers’ meeting,” I whispered. 

Mr. Dollinger is a neat freak. He wouldn’t leave a supply closet open 
overnight. 

Hat gave me a shove. “We’d better hurry.” 

“Don’t push me,” I grumbled. 

We made our way to the tarantula cage, on a metal table against the 
wall. It was actually a rectangular, plywood box with a wire mesh top. 

A loud crash made me stop a few feet from the cage. I gasped and 
turned to Hat. “What was that?” 

The sound repeated. We both realized it was a Venetian blind, blown 
by the wind, banging against the open window behind us. 

I breathed a long sigh of relief. I stared at Hat and he stared at me. He 
nervously adjusted his baseball cap over his forehead. “Eddie, maybe this 
isn’t such a good idea,” he whispered. “Maybe we should get out of here.” 



I was tempted to agree with Hat and run out the door as fast as I could. 
But then I remembered Courtney’s smug smile as she climbed down from 
the tree with the cat. “Let’s stick to the plan,” I said. 

I really wanted to scare Courtney. More than anything else in the 
world. 

Hat and I peered down through the wire mesh at the two tarantulas. 
The bigger one was crawling along one end of the cage. The smaller, 
browner one was sitting like a lump at the other end. 

“Yuck,” I said in a low voice. “They really are gross.” 

Their legs were all hairy and prickly-looking. Their bodies looked like 
disgusting brown hairy sacks. 

“Let’s take the big one,” Hat urged, reaching for the lid. A grin spread 
across his face. “It’ll make a nice plop when it lands on Courtney’s head.” 

We both laughed. Hat made some funny plopping sounds. 

He lifted up the wire mesh top of the cage. He reached a hand in to 
grab the bigger tarantula. Then he suddenly stopped, and his grin faded. 

“We’ve got a little problem,” he said. 

“Huh? What?” I glanced nervously back to the doorway. No one there. 

“What are we going to put it in?” Hat demanded. 

My mouth dropped open. “Oh.” 

“We forgot to bring something to put it in,” Hat said. He lowered the 
top of the cage. Both tarantulas were crawling slowly toward each other 
now. 

“Yeah. Well, we need a bag or something,” I said. My eyes searched 
the tabletops. 

“A bag isn’t any good,” Hat replied, frowning. “Tarantulas can tear 
right through a bag.” 

“Oh, yeah. You’re right.” 

“Why didn’t we think of this before?” Hat demanded. “Why were we 
so stupid? What did we think we were doing? You can’t just put a tarantula 
in your backpack and carry it around!” 

“Calm down,” I said, motioning for him to lower his voice. I could see 
he was starting to panic. “There must be something to keep a tarantula in up 
here.” 

“This is really stupid,” he grumbled. “Did you think I was going to 
keep it in my pocket?” 



“Wait,” I told him. I hurried over to the next table and picked up a 
plastic container. It was the size of a cottage cheese container and had a 
plastic top. “This is perfect,” I whispered, holding it up to show him. “HI 
just poke holes in the top.” 

“Hurry,” Hat urged. He pulled off his cap and scratched his dark hair. 

I poked several air holes in the lid with a pencil. Then I carried the 
plastic container over to the cage. “Here,” I said, handing it to him. 

“You have to hold it,” Hat told me. “I can’t hold the container and pick 
up the tarantula.” 

“Oh,” I replied unhappily. I didn’t want to be that close to the 
tarantula. 

My hand started shaking a little. But I held the container close to the 
cage, ready to snap the lid over it as soon as Hat dropped one of the ugly 
creatures inside. 

He pulled up the lid and reached into the cage. Hat was really brave. 
He wrapped his hand around the bigger one’s body and lifted it up easily. 
Hat didn’t even hesitate or make a disgusted face. 

I was impressed. 

I nearly dropped the plastic container when he lowered the tarantula 
inside. My hand was really shaking. But I managed to hold on. 

The tarantula began flopping around frantically, shooting its legs out, 
slipping and sliding on the slippery plastic surface. 

“He doesn’t like it in there,” I said in a trembling voice. 

“Too bad,” Hat replied, closing the wire mesh cage lid. “Quick, Eddie 
—put the lid on the container.” 

I scrambled to clamp the lid on. 

I almost had it in place when I heard footsteps outside the door. And 
voices. 

Hat and I both gasped as we realized Mr. Dollinger was about to walk 
in. 



10 


A feeble croak escaped my lips. The bright sunlight suddenly glared white. 
I felt the floor sway. 

I could feel my panic weigh me down. I suddenly felt as if I weighed a 
thousand pounds. 

I could hear Mr. Dollinger talking to another teacher right outside the 
science lab door. In another few seconds, he’d step inside, and... and.... 

“Quick—duck under the table!” Hat whispered, his eyes wide with 
fright beneath his cap. 

I started to follow him under the table. But I realized it wasn’t a good 
hiding place at all. Mr. Dollinger would see us as soon as he went to his 
desk. 

“No—no good!” I croaked. “No good. Uh...” 

My eyes flashed around the room. Where could we hide? Where? 

“The supply cabinet!” I cried. I grabbed Hat’s arm and pulled him with 
me. 

The tall metal cabinet was wide enough to hide both of us. 

Could we get into it in time? 

We scrambled inside, pushing each other forward. 

I pulled the door closed. It clicked shut just as Mr. Dollinger entered 
the room. 

Hat and I stood trembling in the darkness of the cabinet, listening to 
his footsteps approach. I gripped the tarantula container tightly in one hand. 

Mr. Dollinger was softly humming a tune. I heard him stop right in 
front of the supply cabinet. 

My heart was pounding so loud, I wondered if the teacher could hear it 
through the cabinet door. 

I shifted my weight and bumped into Hat. There wasn’t another inch of 
space in there. I could hear Hat’s shallow breathing. I could tell he was as 
scared as I was. 

What if Mr. Dollinger decided to open the cabinet door? 

Please, please—just turn out the lights and go home, I pleaded silently. 

I could hear him shuffling papers on his desk. I heard the desk drawer 



open and shut. I heard a book slam shut. More footsteps. Water running in 
one of the sinks. 

He turned off the water. He was still humming softly to himself. More 
footsteps. The click of the light switch. 

Then silence. 

I struggled to hear over my pounding heartbeat. Silence. No humming. 
No footsteps. 

Hat and I stood frozen in the darkness, listening hard. “He—he’s 
gone,” I stammered finally. “He left, Hat.” 

“Phewwww!” Hat sighed loudly. 

“Let’s get out of here!” I cried. I reached for the latch. 

My hand fumbled around in the darkness, sweeping over the metal 
door. I located a slender metal bar and pulled up on it. It didn’t budge. 

“Hey—” I cried out. I moved my hand slowly up the door, trying to 
find a latch or release. 

“Hurry up. Open the cabinet door,” Hat urged. “It’s getting hot in 
here.” 

“I know,” I replied tensely. “I—I can’t find anything.” 

“Let me try,” Hat said impatiently. He pushed my hand away and 
began fumbling with the metal bar. 

“There’s got to be a latch or something,” I said shrilly. 

“Very helpful,” Hat grumbled. He began pounding on the door with his 
open hand. 

I grabbed his arm. “Stop. That won’t open it. And someone will hear 
you.” 

“You try again,” he ordered. His voice sounded really tiny and afraid. 

I swallowed hard. I suddenly had a heavy lump in my throat. It felt as 
if my heart had leapt up into my neck. 

I fumbled frantically with everything I could grab hold of. But I 
couldn’t find anything that would open the door. 

“I give up. We—we’re locked in, Hat,” I stammered. 

“I don’t believe it,” he muttered. 

The container started to slip out of my hand. I grabbed it with both 
hands—and made a startling discovery. 

The lid had come off. 

“Oh, no,” I murmured. 



“What now?” Hat demanded. 

Taking a deep breath, I shook the container. 

It was empty. No tarantula. 

I tried to tell Hat that the tarantula had escaped, but my voice caught in 
my throat. I let out a choking sound. 

And then I felt a prickling on my leg just above my sock. 

And then another prickling, like a pinprick, a little higher up. 

“Hat—the tarantula—” I managed to croak. “It—it’s crawling up my 

leg.” 



11 


The pinpricks moved a little higher on my leg. 

I could feel the tarantula’s warm, hairy body rub against my skin. 

“It—it’s going to b-bite me,” I stuttered. “I know it is.” 

“Don’t move,” Hat advised, sounding even more frightened than me. 
“Just don’t move.” 

The creature’s legs dug into my skin, like sharp needles. 

“I—I have to get out of here!” I screamed. Without thinking about it, I 
lowered my shoulder and heaved all my weight against the cabinet door. 

With a loud pop, it swung open. 

A startled cry escaped my lips as I tumbled out. I landed hard on my 
side, and the empty plastic container rolled across the room. 

Breathing hard, I scrambled to my feet and began furiously kicking 
and shaking my leg. 

The tarantula dropped to the floor and immediately began scrabbling 
across the linoleum. “Catch it! Catch it!” I shrieked. 

Hat dove out of the cabinet and lurched after the tarantula. 

I grabbed up the container and hurried over to him. Hat lifted the 
tarantula high in the air. Its hairy legs kicked and squirmed, but Hat didn’t 
let go. 

He plopped the ugly thing into the container. “Put the lid on tight this 
time,” he warned. 

“Don’t worry,” I moaned. My hands were shaking. But I clamped the 
lid on tightly, then checked and rechecked it three times. 

A short while later, Hat and I were heading downstairs to deposit the 
tarantula in my locker for safekeeping. I could still feel the itchy pinpricks 
on my leg, even though I knew the tarantula hadn’t bitten me. 

“Wow. That was scary!” Hat declared. “That was really scary.” 

“It just means that the rest of the plan will go perfectly,” I assured him. 

A little before nine the next morning, Hat and I were hiding again. This 
time we were hiding on the narrow balcony that overlooks the gym. 

While everyone else in our class changed into their gym shorts and 



sweats and stuff, Hat and I sneaked out of the boys’ locker room. Hat hid 
the tarantula container under his sweatshirt, and we hurried up to the 
balcony. 

The four of us had been calling each other for most of the night, 
getting the plan straight. It was a very simple plan, actually. 

All Molly and Charlene had to do was get Courtney to stand under the 
balcony. Then Hat would drop the tarantula into her hair, and we’d all 
watch her scream and cry and carry on, and make a total fool of herself. 

Simple. 

“What if Courtney doesn’t get upset?” Molly had asked me on the 
phone. “What if she just plucks it out of her hair and calmly asks if anyone 
has lost a tarantula?” 

“That’s impossible,” I had replied. “Courtney is calm—but she isn’t 
that calm! She’s got to scream and go wild with a tarantula in her hair. If 
she doesn’t, she’s not human. She’s a statue or something.” 

“Ready, Hat?” I asked, peering over the side of the balcony. 

He nodded solemnly, his eyes on the volleyball nets below. 

He carefully pulled the lid off the container. The tarantula reached up 
two legs as if to grab him. 

I heard voices down below. A few girls had wandered out of their 
locker room onto the floor. One of them picked up a volleyball and took a 
jump shot at the basket. The ball hit the rim and bounced off. 

“Get down. They can see you,” Hat whispered. 

I lowered my head. It was hot up on the balcony, hotter than down on 
the gym floor, and I started to sweat. 

We were both on our knees. Hat was holding the tarantula container in 
front of him with both hands. 

I could hear more voices down below. Several boys had come out and 
were dribbling a volleyball up and down the floor, passing it off to one 
another. 

“Do you see Courtney?” Hat whispered. 

I raised myself a little higher and peered down. “Yes!” 

Molly and Charlene had Courtney between them. Both of them were 
talking excitedly at the same time. I couldn’t hear what they were talking 
about. 

Courtney was shaking her head. I saw her laugh, then shake her head 



some more. She was wearing a loose-fitting purple T-shirt, and white shorts 
over purple tights. Her blonde hair was tied behind her in a loose ponytail. 

A perfect target, I thought gleefully. I grinned at Hat. I had a good 
feeling about this. A very good feeling. 

Raising my eyes beyond the volleyball nets, I saw that Mr. Russo, the 
gym teacher, was talking to another teacher at the door. 

Good, I thought. We don’t want Mr. Russo blowing the whistle and 
starting the volleyball game until we take care of Courtney. 

Molly and Charlene, meanwhile, still had Courtney between them. 
They were still chatting away. As they talked, they kept backing up, 
backing up, until they were almost in position. 

“Just a few more feet and Courtney will be under the balcony,” I 
whispered to Hat. “It’s happening, Hat. It’s really happening.” 

I was so excited, I felt like I was about to burst. Beads of sweat rolled 
down my forehead and into my eyes. I wiped it with the sleeve of my T- 
shirt and peered down. 

Yes! 

Molly and Charlene had done it. They had backed Courtney under the 
balcony. The three of them stood right beneath us. 

Perfect! 

“Hat—do it!” I whispered. 

Hat didn’t hesitate. Not for a second. This was too perfect. Too 
perfect! 

His eyes on the three girls directly below, he reached into the container 
and picked up the hairy tarantula. 

Then he raised himself up a little higher over the balcony edge, held 
the tarantula over the side, took careful aim—and let it drop. 



12 


Hat and I both leaned over the balcony and watched the tarantula drop. 

And we both cried out in horror when it landed with a sick plop in 
Molly’s hair. 

“Hat—you missed!” I screamed. 

But Molly was screaming a lot louder. Her face was as red as a tomato, 
and her eyes were bulging out of her head. She was shrieking at the top of 
her lungs and doing a strange dance, hopping wildly up and down while her 
hands thrashed the air. 

A lot of kids were running over with startled and bewildered 
expressions. “What’s wrong with Molly?” someone screamed. 

“Why is she doing that?” 

“What happened to her?” 

Staring down, I leaned so far over the balcony, I nearly dropped like 
the tarantula. 

Poor Molly was tearing at her hair now, still shrieking and hopping 
around. 

I cried out in relief as she finally managed to pull the tarantula from 
her dark hair. She juggled it in her hand, nearly dropping it. Then, still 
screaming, she tossed it to Charlene! 

Beside me on the balcony, Hat was laughing now. But I was too upset 
to find it funny. 

How could Hat have missed such an easy shot? 

Charlene let out a scream that rattled the gym rafters. She hobbled the 
tarantula from one hand to the other. 

Then it dropped to the floor at her feet. 

Charlene leapt back, still screaming, both hands pressed against the 
sides of her face. 

Everyone in the gym class had huddled around. Some kids still looked 
confused. Others were laughing. A couple of girls were trying to comfort 
Molly, whose hair was standing straight up on her head. 

“Oh, wow. Oh, wow,” Hat kept repeating, shaking his head. “Oh, 
wow.” 



Gripping the balcony edge with both hands, I watched Courtney bend 
over and gently pick up the tarantula from the gym floor. She placed it in 
the palm of her hand and appeared to be saying soothing words to it. 

The kids had formed a circle around Courtney. As she held the 
tarantula close to her face, they quieted down and watched. 

“It’s just a tarantula,” Courtney said, petting its hairy back with one 
finger. “Tarantulas don’t bite that often. And if they do, it doesn’t hurt very 
much.” 

Kids began murmuring once again about how brave Courtney was. I 
saw Molly and Charlene comforting each other at the edge of the circle. 
Charlene was smoothing down Molly’s hair. Molly’s whole body was still 
quivering. 

“Where did this tarantula come from?” Courtney was asking. 

I saw Molly stare up angrily at us. She raised her fist and shook it 
toward us. 

I ducked down out of sight behind the balcony wall. 

“The plan didn’t work too well,” Hat murmured. 

Is he the master of understatement—or what? 

We didn’t realize that the disaster wasn’t over. “Let’s get out of here,” I 
whispered. 

Too late. We both looked up to see Mr. Russo glaring angrily at us 
from the balcony entrance. “What are you boys doing up here?” he asked 
suspiciously. 

I turned to Hat. Hat stared back at me blankly. 

Neither of us could think of a good answer. 

“Come on back downstairs,” Mr. Russo said softly, holding open the 
door for us. “Let’s have a nice, long talk.” 

It could have been worse, I thought. Sure, Hat and I had to stay after school 
and clean the science lab every afternoon for the next two weeks. And sure, 
we had to write one-thousand-word essays on why it’s wrong to steal living 
things and drop them on people’s heads. 

And sure, Molly and Charlene aren’t speaking to Hat or me. 

But it could have been worse. 

I mean, what if Hat and I were still locked in the supply cabinet? That 
would be worse, wouldn’t it? 



It was later that afternoon. I was slumped on my bed, glumly thinking 
about gym class and how our plan had bombed. 

It’s all Courtney’s fault, I told myself, absently pulling at a little tear in 
my bedspread. 

Courtney had moved just at the last minute. 

She must have moved. Hat couldn’t be that bad of an aim. 

I sighed bitterly as once again I pictured Courtney calmly picking the 
tarantula up off the floor and petting it. “It’s only a tarantula,” Courtney 
had said. So smug. So superior. “It’s only a tarantula. They don’t bite very 
often. ” 

Why didn’t it bite her hand? 

That would have wiped the smug expression off her face. 

Why did she have to be so totally brave? 

Courtney really deserves to be scared out of her wits, I thought 
unhappily. I tore at the little rip in the bedspread, turning it into a big rip. 

She’s really asking for it, asking to be frightened speechless. 

But how, how, how? 

Sitting on the edge of the bed, I had my head lowered and my 
shoulders hunched. I was leaning forward glumly, picking at the bedspread 
without even realizing it. 

Again I pictured Hat letting the tarantula drop. 

Again I saw it land on Molly’s head. 

No! No! No! 

Again I saw Molly start to do her frantic, furious dance. 

The unhappy picture vanished from my mind as I suddenly realized I 
was no longer alone. Raising my eyes to the doorway, I gasped sharply. 

And saw the tall, lean monster stagger toward me, its face dripping 
with dark blood. 



13 


The tall monster lurched toward me, its dripping arms reaching out in front 
of it, ready to grab me. 

“Kevin—get out of here!” I cried. “You’re dripping mud all over my 
floor!” 

My older brother Kevin lowered his arms to his sides. “It isn’t real 
mud, punk,” he said. “It’s makeup.” 

“I don’t care,” I replied shrilly, jumping up off the bed and giving him 
a hard shove in the stomach. “It’s dripping all over.” 

He laughed. “Scared you, didn’t I?” 

“No way!” I insisted. “I knew it was you.” 

“You thought it was a Mud Monster,” he said, grinning at me through 
the thick, brownish-orange gunk dripping down his face. “Admit it, punk.” 

I hate when he calls me punk. I guess that’s why he does it. “You don’t 
look like a Mud Monster,” I told him nastily. “You just look like a pile of 
garbage.” 

“We scared some little kids who came into the woods this afternoon,” 
Kevin said gleefully. “You should’ve seen their faces. We ran at them and 
yelled BOO. Two of them started to cry.” He snickered. 

“Way to go,” I muttered. I gave him another shove toward the door and 
got the thick, brownish-orange gunk all over my hands. 

“The video is almost finished,” he told me, deliberately wiping his 
hand on my open notebook. He stared down at the dark stain he had made 
on my math homework. “Maybe I’ll let you see it when it’s done.” 

“Get away from my stuff, Kevin!” I said angrily. Then I remembered 
what I wanted to ask him, and changed my tone. “Can I be in the video?” I 
pleaded. “Please? You said maybe I could be in it—remember?” 

“Huh-uh, punk.” He shook his head. “You’d get too scared.” 

“What?” Was he putting me on? 

“You’d get too scared, Eddie,” he repeated, scratching his forehead 
through the heavy, wet makeup. “All alone in the deep, dark woods with 
three Mud Monsters walking around. You’d lose it. You’d totally lose it.” 

“Hey—” I cried angrily. “You’re not funny, Kevin. You promised—” 



“No, I didn’t,” Kevin insisted. A big brown blob of gunk fell off his 
shoulder and landed with a splat on my floor. “Whoa. You’re going to have 
to clean that up,” he said, grinning meanly. 

“I’m going to make you eat it!” I shouted angrily, crossing my arms 
over my chest. 

He just laughed. 

I suddenly had an idea. “Kevin, will you help me with something?” I 
asked thoughtfully. 

“Probably not,” he replied, still grinning. “What is it?” 

“Do you have any good ideas for scaring someone?” I asked. 

He narrowed his eyes at me. Then he gestured to the brownish-orange 
stuff covering his whole body. “Isn’t this scary enough?” 

“No. I mean, some other way to scare someone,” I said, wondering 
how to explain. I decided just to come right out and say it. “Some friends 
and I, we’re trying to scare this girl, Courtney.” 

“Why?” Kevin demanded, resting a globby hand on my dresser top. 

“You know. Just for fun,” I told him. 

He nodded. 

“But we haven’t been able to scare her at all,” I continued. 
“Everything we try totally bombs out.” I sank back onto my bed. 

“What have you tried?” Kevin asked. 

“Oh. A couple of things. A snake and a tarantula,” I said. “But she 
didn’t get scared.” 

“Too small,” he muttered. He stepped away from the dresser. I could 
see that he had left a big brown stain on the side. 

“Huh? What do you mean Too small’?” I demanded. 

“Too small,” he repeated. “You’re trying to scare her with little things. 
You’ve got to scare her with something big. You know. Maybe something 
bigger than she is.” 

I thought about what he was saying. It seemed to make sense. “What 
do you mean by big?” I asked him. “You mean like an elephant?” 

He frowned and shook his head. “Eddie, where are you going to get an 
elephant? I mean like a big dog. You know. A huge, growling dog.” 

“A dog?” I scratched my head. 

“Yeah. Let’s say this girl Courtney is walking down the street, or she’s 
in the woods, maybe—and suddenly she hears angry growls and snarls. She 



looks up and sees this enormous dog, its mouth open, its fangs bared, 
running right at her. That’ll scare her. No problem.” 

“Not bad,” I said thoughtfully. “Not bad. You’re a genius, Kevin. 
Really.” 

“Tell me about it,” he replied. He walked out of the room, leaving a 
muddy trail behind him. 

A huge, growling dog, I thought. I pictured it in my mind. I pictured it 
raising its head to the moon and howling like a wolf. 

Then I pictured Courtney walking innocently down a dark street. She 
hears a sound. A low growl. She stops. Her eyes grow wide with fear. 

What’s that noise? she wonders. 

And then she sees it. The biggest, meanest, loudest, angriest dog that 
ever lived. Its eyes glow red. It pulls back its heavy lips to reveal a mouth 
full of pointy fangs. 

With an earth-shattering growl, it makes its leap. It goes right for her 
throat. 

Courtney cries out for help. Then she turns. She’s running now, 
running for her life, shrieking and crying like a frightened baby. 

“Here, boy,” I call to the attacking beast. 

The dog stops. It turns around. It walks quickly to me, its tail wagging. 
Courtney is still crying, still shaking all over, as the dog gently licks my 
hand. 

“It’s only a dog,” I tell her. “Dogs won’t hurt you—unless they sense 
that you’re afraid !” 

I jumped up from my bed, laughing out loud. 

It’s definitely worth a try, I thought excitedly. Definitely worth a try. 

Now, who do I know who has an enormous, growling, ferocious dog? 



14 


Saturday afternoon we were in Charlene’s back yard, trying out the new 
croquet set her father had bought. It was an overcast day. High clouds kept 
blocking out the sun, sending long, gray shadows over the back lawn. 

The roar of a power mower from next door made it a little hard to be 
heard. But I was telling Molly, Charlene, and Hat about my brother’s idea 
for scaring Courtney. 

“A big, angry dog is way scary,” Hat quickly agreed. He tapped his 
mallet hard against his green croquet ball and sent mine sailing into the 
hedge. 

Molly frowned. She still hadn’t forgiven me for the tarantula incident, 
even though I had apologized a thousand times. She straightened the bottom 
of her yellow T-shirt over her black Lycra bike shorts and prepared to take 
her turn. 

“We need a dog that really looks vicious,” Molly said. She slammed 
her ball hard. It missed the hoop and bounced off a wooden peg. 

“I guess my dog, Buttercup, could do it,” Charlene offered, sighing. 

“Huh? Buttercup?” I cried out in surprise. “Get serious, Charlene. 
Buttercup is a big, lovable oaf. He couldn’t scare a fly.” 

A teasing smile formed on Charlene’s face. “Buttercup could do it,” 
she repeated. 

“Oh, sure,” I said, rolling my eyes. “He’s real vicious. That’s why you 
gave him a vicious name like Buttercup.” 

“It’s your turn,” Molly said to me, pointing to my ball way over at the 
hedge. 

“This is such a boring game,” I complained. “Why does anyone like 

it?” 

“I like it,” Hat said. He was winning. 

Charlene cupped her hands around her mouth and shouted, “Buttercup! 
Buttercup! Come here, you ferocious beast!” 

A few seconds later, the big Saint Bernard came lumbering toward us 
from the side of the house. His bushy, white tail was wagging hard, making 
his entire backside waggle as he hurried across the grass, his big pink 



tongue drooping out. 

“Ooh, I’m scared! I’m scared!” I cried sarcastically. I dropped my 
croquet mallet and hugged myself, pretending to shiver in fright. 

Buttercup ignored me. He ran up to Charlene and started licking her 
hand, making tiny mewing sounds, almost like a cat. 

“Ooh, he’s tough,” I exclaimed. 

Hat came up beside me, adjusting his baseball cap over his eyes. “He’s 
a big, lovable Saint Bernard, Charlene,” Hat said, bending to scratch the 
dog behind the ears. “He’s not too scary. We need a big wolf. Or a six-foot- 
tall Doberman.” 

Buttercup turned his big head to lick Hat’s hand. 

“Yuck!” Hat made a disgusted face. “I hate dog slobber.” 

“Where can we get a real attack dog?” I asked, picking up my mallet 
and leaning on it like a cane. “Do we know anyone who has a guard dog? A 
big, ugly German shepherd, maybe?” 

Charlene still had that teasing grin on her face, as if she knew 
something the rest of us didn’t. “Give Buttercup a chance,” she said softly. 
“You might be surprised.” 

Clouds drifted over the sun again. The air suddenly grew cooler as 
gray shadows slid over the grass. 

The power mower on the other side of the hedge sputtered to a stop. 
The back yard suddenly seemed eerily quiet and still. 

Buttercup dropped to the grass and rolled onto his back. His four furry 
paws kicked the air as he scratched his back on the lawn. 

“Not too impressive, Charlene,” Hat said, laughing. The dog looked so 
stupid. 

“I haven’t done our little trick yet,” Charlene replied. “Just watch.” 

She turned to the dog and started to whistle. A tuneless whistle, just a 
bunch of shrill, flat tones. 

The big Saint Bernard reacted immediately. As soon as he heard 
Charlene’s whistle, he rolled off his back and climbed to his feet. His tail 
shot out stiffly behind him. His entire body appeared to go rigid. His ears 
stood up on his head. 

Charlene continued to whistle. Not loudly. A steady, low whistle of 
long, shrill notes. 

And as we stared in silent surprise, Buttercup began to growl. The 



growl started deep in his stomach, angry and menacing. 

He pulled back his dark lips. He bared his big teeth. 

He growled loudly. His growl became a vicious snarl. 

The dog’s eyes glowed angrily. His back stiffened. His head arched 
back as if preparing to attack. 

Charlene sucked in a deep breath and whistled some more. Her eyes 
were locked on the growling dog. 

“Buttercup—get Eddie!” Charlene suddenly screamed. “Get Eddie! 
Kill! Kilir 



15 


“No!” I shrieked and fell back toward the hedge. 

The dog growled a warning. Then it leapt to attack. 

I raised my arms in front of me as a shield and waited for the impact. 

And waited. 

When I slowly lowered my arms, I saw that Charlene was hugging the 
dog around the neck. Charlene had a gleeful grin on her face. Buttercup 
turned and planted a slobbery dog kiss on her forehead. 

“Gotcha, Eddie!” Charlene declared. “That was to pay you back for 
the tarantula.” 

Molly laughed. “Way to go, Charlene.” 

“Wow,” I exclaimed weakly. My heart was still pounding. The back 
yard was spinning in front of me. 

“That’s a good trick,” Hat told Charlene. “How did you teach him 
that?” 

“I didn’t,” Charlene said, giving the dog a final hug, then shoving him 
away from her. “It was sort of an accident. I was whistling one day, and 
Buttercup went ballistic on me. He started growling and snarling, showing 
his teeth.” 

“I guess he really hates the way you whistle!” I exclaimed, starting to 
feel a little more normal. 

“He hates anyone whistling,” Charlene replied, brushing dog fur off 
the legs of her denim cutoffs. “Maybe it hurts his ears or something. I don’t 
know. But you can see what it makes him do. He goes nuts like that every 
time someone whistles.” 

“That’s great!” Hat declared. 

“He really can terrify Courtney,” Molly said. 

We watched the dog lumber away, his tongue hanging nearly to the 
ground. He sniffed at something in the flower bed, then disappeared around 
the side of the house. 

“Poor dog,” Charlene said, shaking her head. “He hates California. 
He’s hot all the time. But when we moved here from Michigan, we just 
couldn’t bear to part with him.” 



“I’m glad you didn’t,” I said enthusiastically. “Now we’re finally 
going to scare the life out of Courtney!” 

Molly tapped a croquet ball softly with her mallet. She had a troubled 
expression on her face. “We’re not really going to hurt Courtney, are we?” 
she asked. “I mean, Buttercup isn’t really going to attack her, is he? If he 
gets out of control...” 

“Of course not,” Charlene answered quickly. “He stops growling and 
carrying on as soon as I stop whistling. Really. As soon as the whistling 
stops, he goes right back to his gentle personality.” 

Molly looked relieved. She tapped the ball through a hoop, then used 
the mallet to push it back out. 

We had all lost interest in the croquet game. Planning how we were 
going to use Buttercup to terrify Courtney was a lot more exciting than any 
game. 

The sun had poked out from the high clouds. The closely trimmed 
grass gleamed brightly in the sunlight. We tossed down the mallets and 
made our way to the shade of the big grapefruit tree in the center of the 
back yard. 

“We should scare Courtney in the woods, at that tree house she and 
Denise built by Muddy Creek,” I suggested, sprawling on my back on the 
grass. “It’s the perfect place. She and Denise all alone in the woods. 
Suddenly, a snarling dog leaps out at them. They’ll both scream for a 
week!” 

“Yeah, that’s good,” Hat agreed. “In the woods, there are plenty of 
places for us to hide and watch. I mean, Charlene can hide behind a bush or 
an evergreen or something and whistle her brains out. We’ll all be hidden. 
Courtney will never know who did it.” 

Sitting with her legs crossed, Molly chewed her lower lip thoughtfully. 
She pushed her glasses up on her nose. “I don’t like it,” she said. “It’s no 
fun if we don’t scare Courtney in front of a lot of people. If we scare her in 
the woods with no one around, who will care?” 

“We will!” I argued. “ We will see it. That’s all that counts. We will 
know that we finally managed to terrify her.” 

“And maybe we can all jump out and yell ‘Gotcha!’ and stuff, so she’ll 
know we saw her get frightened,” Charlene added enthusiastically. “Then 
we’ll spread it around school, and everyone will know.” 



“I like it!” Hat declared. 

“When should we do it?” Molly asked. 

“How about now?” I said, jumping to my feet. 

“Huh? Now?” Charlene reacted with surprise. 

“Why not?” I argued. “Let’s just go do it. Maybe we’ll get lucky and 
find Courtney and Denise at their tree house. They go there a lot on 
weekends, you know, to hang out and read and stuff.” 

“Yeah! Let’s go!” Hat jumped up and slapped me on the back. “Let’s 
do it!” 

“I’ll go get Buttercup’s leash,” Charlene said. “I guess there’s no 
reason to wait.” She turned to Molly, who was hanging back. 

“I have a better idea,” Molly said, pulling a blade of grass from her 
brown hair. “Before we go running off to the woods, let’s make sure that 
Courtney is at the tree house.” 

“Huh? How do we do that?” I asked. 

“Simple,” she replied. And then Molly did the most amazing 
impersonation of Denise. “Hello, Courtney. Meet me at the tree house in 
ten minutes, okay?” It was incredible! She sounded just like Denise! 

We all gaped at her in amazement. 

“Molly, I didn’t know you were so talented,” Charlene said, laughing. 

“I’ve been practicing,” Molly said. “I can do all kinds of voices. I’m 
really pretty good at it.” 

“Molly, maybe you can do cartoon voices when you get older,” I 
suggested. “You could be Daffy Duck. You sound a lot like him already!” 

Hat laughed. Molly stuck her tongue out at me. 

“Let’s go inside and call Courtney,” Charlene said eagerly, sliding 
open the screen door. “If she isn’t home, she’s probably already at the tree 
house. So we’ll get Buttercup and go there. If she is home, Molly can 
pretend to be Denise and tell Courtney to meet at the tree house.” 

We made our way into the kitchen. Charlene handed the kitchen phone 
to Molly. Then she brought over the cordless phone for the rest of us to 
listen in on. 

Molly punched in Courtney’s number, and we each held our breath as 
we listened to the phone ring. One ring. Two. 

Courtney picked it up after the second ring. “Hello?” 

Molly put on her best Denise voice. “Hi, Courtney. It’s me.” She really 



sounded just like Denise. I think she could’ve fooled Denise’s own mother! 

“Can you meet me in the woods? You know. At the tree house?” Molly 
asked in Denise’s voice. 

“Who is this?” Courtney demanded. 

“It’s me, of course. Denise,” Molly replied. 

“That’s weird,” we all heard Courtney say. “How can you be Denise 
when Denise is standing here right next to me?” 



16 


“Oops. Wrong number,” Molly said. She quickly slammed down the 
receiver. 

Calling Courtney had turned out to be a bad idea. 

Our plan hadn’t exactly worked. But we were sure we could scare 
Courtney with Buttercup. We just had to catch her in the woods at the right 
time. 

The next day, Sunday, it rained. I was very disappointed. 

My brother, Kevin, stood beside me at the window, watching the 
raindrops patter against the glass. He was very disappointed, too. He and 
his friends had planned to finish their Mud Monsters video in the woods. 

“Today we were going to tape the big finish where the Mud Monsters 
rise up out of the mud,” he said. 

“Maybe the rain will stop,” I told him. 

“It doesn’t matter,” Kevin sighed. “We won’t be able to shoot 
anyway.” 

“Why not?” I asked. 

“Too muddy,” he replied. 

The week dragged by. It rained just about every day. 

On Saturday afternoon, the sun came out. Charlene put Buttercup on a 
leash, and we eagerly headed to the woods. 

“Courtney’s got to be there. She’s got to!” I declared. 

“Someone has to scout out the tree house,” Molly said. “Someone has 
to make sure Courtney and Denise are there before we let Buttercup go.” 

“I’ll do it!” Hat and I volunteered in unison. 

Everyone laughed. We were in a good mood. I think we all had a really 
good feeling, a feeling that this was the day we were finally going to scare 
Courtney out of her wits. 

The woods started a few blocks from Charlene’s house. It was a really 
pretty day, the first all week. Everything smelled fresh and sweet from all 
the rain. 

Buttercup kept stopping to sniff flowers and bushes and other plants. 



Charlene had to keep tugging the leash to keep him walking. It was a tough 
job. It isn’t easy to tug a Saint Bernard if he doesn’t want to be tugged! 

“My mouth is kind of dry,” Charlene complained as we neared the 
edge of the woods. “I hope I can whistle okay.” 

She tried whistling. It came out real breathy. Not much whistle sound. 

But that didn’t seem to matter to Buttercup. He raised his head 
instantly. His ears shot up and his tail stood straight back. 

Charlene blew harder, but she still wasn’t getting much sound. 

Buttercup’s stomach began to rumble. The rumble became a low 
growl. The growl became a snarl as the big dog ferociously bared his teeth. 

“Charlene—stop,” I said. “Don’t waste it.” 

Charlene stopped whistling. The dog relaxed. 

“Does anyone have some gum?” Charlene asked, holding her throat. 
“My mouth is really dry.” 

Molly handed her a stick of gum. 

“Buttercup is ready!” Hat declared happily as we stepped into the 
woods. 

Shadows of the leaves overhead danced on the ground. Sparkling rays 
of sunlight beamed down through the trees. Twigs and dried leaves crackled 
under our sneakers as we walked. 

“Come on, dog!” Charlene pleaded, tugging hard at the leash. 

“Ssshh,” Molly warned. “We’ve got to be quiet now. If Courtney is in 
the woods, she’ll hear us.” 

“Come on, Buttercup!” Charlene repeated in a loud whisper. 

The dog was being difficult. He kept stopping to sniff things. He 
pulled at the leash, trying to break free and go off on his own. I guess there 
were too many exciting smells for him. His tail was wagging back and 
forth, and he was panting noisily. 

We were deep in the woods now, approaching the creek. It grew 
shadier and cooler. Purple shadows surrounded us as we walked. 

“I’ll sneak up near the tree house and see if Courtney and Denise are 
there,” I whispered. I handed the brown paper bag I’d been carrying to Hat. 
“Hold this for me. I’ll be right back.” 

Hat gazed suspiciously at the bag. “What’s in it?” 

“You’ll see,” I told him and hurried off on my scouting mission. 
Keeping low, I made my way through a clump of tall weeds. 



I glanced back at my friends. They had clustered around Buttercup. 
The big dog had plopped down on the ground and was chewing on a big 
stick. 

As I followed a narrow dirt path through the trees, I realized my heart 
was pounding excitedly. This was it! The day of our victory over Courtney. 

Her tree house was perched near the creek on the other side of a small, 
grassy clearing. As I approached the clearing, I could hear the soft trickle of 
water from the creekbed. 

Slipping between the trees, I kept in the shadows. I didn’t want to be 
spotted by Courtney or Denise. That would spoil the surprise. 

A smile broke over my face as I thought about how scared they were 
about to become. If they were there.... 

I stopped at the edge of the clearing and peered across it. The tall grass 
was matted down by dozens of footprints. I realized that my brother and his 
friends must have taped part of their Mud Monsters video there. 

Keeping under the trees, I began to make my way around the circle of 
the clearing. There, on the other side, Courtney’s tree house came into view. 
It looked like a large wooden crate, perched in the lowest limb of an old oak 
tree. A rope ladder connected it to the ground. 

Were they there? Courtney and Denise? 

I couldn’t see them. 

I took a few more steps, pushing tall weeds out of the way as I came 
nearer. “Ow,” I muttered as something prickled my shoulder. Glancing 
down, I carefully pulled two burrs from the sleeve of my T-shirt. 

Then I kept walking, trying to be silent as I moved nearer the tree 
house. 

I stopped when I heard voices. Girls’ voices. 

And then I saw Courtney and Denise. They were just ahead of me, 
walking in the woods. 

I ducked low behind a clump of thick shrubs. 

They were only a few feet in front of me. Had they seen me? 

No. 

They were talking excitedly, having some kind of heated discussion. I 
watched them through the shrub. They were both wearing blue midriff tops 
and white denim shorts. Twins. 

They were walking slowly in the other direction, casually pulling up 



weeds and wildflowers as they walked. 

Great! I thought. This is perfect ! 

I knew this was the day! 

I turned and silently hurried away. I couldn’t wait to get back to my 
friends. 

I found them in the same spot, still huddled around the dog. 
“Buttercup, do your stuff!” I cried excitedly, grinning and waving as I ran 
up to them. 

“You mean they’re there?” Hat asked, surprised. 

“They’re there,” I said breathlessly, “waiting to be scared.” 

“Great!” Molly and Charlene exclaimed. Charlene tried to tug 
Buttercup to his feet. 

“Wait,” I said. I grabbed the brown paper bag from Hat. “Before 
Buttercup gets up, let’s put this on first.” 

I pulled out the can of shaving cream I had brought. 

“What’s that for?” Hat demanded. 

“I thought we’d smear shaving cream around his mouth,” I explained. 
“You know. Make him look like he’s frothing. Rabid dogs always froth at 
the mouth. When they see a growling dog frothing up white stuff as he 
attacks them, Courtney and Denise will drop dead!” 

“Excellent!” Molly cried, slapping me on the back. “That’s really 
excellent!” 

Everyone congratulated me. Sometimes I do have great ideas, I have to 
admit. 

Buttercup lumbered to his feet. He started pulling Charlene toward the 
clearing. 

“Let him get closer to them,” Charlene whispered loudly, as the big 
dog trotted through the trees, dragging her with him. “Then we’ll smear the 
stuff on and let him loose.” 

Molly, Hat, and I followed close behind. A short while later, we were 
at the edge of the clearing. We stopped behind the tall, thick shrubs and 
squatted down. We were completely hidden from view there. 

Courtney and Denise had stepped into the clearing. They were 
standing in the tall grass, their arms crossed over their chests, their heads 
bowed as they discussed whatever it was they were discussing. 

We could hear the murmur of their voices, but we weren’t close 



enough to hear what they were saying. Behind them, we could hear the 
creek trickling past in its muddy bed. 

“It’s showtime, Buttercup,” Charlene whispered, bending down to 
unleash the dog. She turned back to us. “As soon as he heads into the 
clearing, I’ll start whistling.” 

Gripping the shaving cream can, I sprayed a thick puddle of white 
lather into my hand. 

Suddenly I heard a sound behind us in the trees. 

A rustling, crackling sound. Something running over the dry leaves 
and twigs. A squirrel appeared in a break between the shrubs. 

Buttercup saw it, too. As I leaned over and reached out my hand to 
smear the shaving cream on his mouth, the big dog took off. 

I toppled over onto my face. 

I looked up in time to see the dog bolting for the trees, chasing after 
the squirrel. 

My three friends were already on their feet. “Buttercup! Buttercup! 
Come back!” Charlene was shouting. 

I climbed to my feet. I had shaving cream smeared over the front of 
my T-shirt. Ignoring it, I turned and ran into the trees after them. 

They were already pretty far ahead of me. I couldn’t see them. But I 
could hear Charlene yelling, “Buttercup! Come back! Buttercup—where 
are you?” 



17 


I ran as fast as I could and caught up with my friends. “Where—where’s 
Buttercup?” I asked breathlessly. 

“Over there somewhere, I think,” Charlene replied, pointing to a thick 
clump of trees. 

“No. I think I heard him over there,” Hat said, pointing in the opposite 
direction. 

“We can’t lose him,” I said, struggling to catch my breath. “He’s too 
big to lose.” 

“I didn’t know he could run that fast,” Charlene said unhappily. “He 
really wants to catch that squirrel.” 

“Doesn’t he know he has a job to do?” Molly asked, searching the 
trees. 

“I—I shouldn’t have let go of the leash,” Charlene moaned. “Now 
we’ll never catch the big oaf.” 

“Sure we will,” I replied, trying to sound cheerful. “He’ll come back to 
us after the squirrel runs away.” 

Dirt and dried leaves had stuck to the shaving cream when I fell over. 
Now I had a big, dark smear on my T-shirt. I wiped at it with my hand as 
my eyes searched the woods for Buttercup. 

“We’d better split up,” Charlene said. She looked really worried. 
“We’ve got to find him before he gets into some kind of trouble. He isn’t 
used to the woods.” 

“Maybe he’s by the creek,” Molly suggested, straightening her glasses. 
She had a twig caught in her hair. I pulled it out for her. 

“Let’s stop talking and go find him,” I urged impatiently. “Maybe we 
can still scare Courtney and Denise with him.” 

I’m always the optimist in the group. 

“Let’s just find him,” Charlene murmured, a tight, worried expression 
on her face. “If anything happens to Buttercup...” She was too upset to 
finish her sentence. 

We split up. I took the path that led toward the creek. I began jogging, 
pushing away low tree branches as I made my way along the twisting path. 



“Buttercup! Buttercup!” I called in a loud whisper. 

How could that dumb dog mess us up like this? How could he be so 
irresponsible? 

“Ow!” A sharp thorn tore through my wrist as I ran past a large 
bramble bush. I stopped to examine the cut, breathing hard. A small 
teardrop of bright red blood appeared on my wrist. 

Ignoring it, I resumed my search. “Buttercup! Buttercup?” 

I should be pretty near the creek by now, I realized. But I couldn’t hear 
the sound of the water. 

Was I on the right path? Had I gotten turned around somehow? 

I began running faster, jumping over a fallen log, pushing my way 
through tall reeds. The ground became soft and marshy. My sneakers were 
sinking into soft mud as I ran. 

Shouldn’t the clearing be right up ahead? 

Shouldn’t the creek be on this side of the clearing? 

I stopped. I leaned over, struggling to catch my breath, resting my 
hands on my knees. 

When I looked up, I realized I was lost. 

I gazed up to find the sun. Perhaps I could recapture my sense of 
direction. But the trees were too thick. Little sunlight filtered through. 

“I’m lost,” I said out loud, more startled than frightened. “I don’t 
believe it. I’m lost in the woods.” 

I spun around, searching for something familiar. Slender, white¬ 
trunked trees nearly formed a thick fence behind me. Darker trees 
surrounded me on the three other sides. 

“Hey—can anyone hear me?” I cried. My voice came out shrill and 
frightened. 

“Can anyone hear me?” I repeated, forcing myself to shout louder. 

No reply. 

A bird cawed loudly overhead. I heard fluttering wings. 

“Hey, Hat! Molly! Charlene!” I called their names several times. 

No reply. 

A cold shiver rolled down my back. “Hey, I’m lost!” I shouted. “Hey 
—somebody!” 

And then I heard the crunch of footsteps to my left. Heavy footsteps. 
Coming toward me rapidly. 



“Hey, guys—is that you?” I cried, listening hard. 

No reply. The heavy footsteps moved closer. 

I stared into the dark trees. 

I heard the caw of another bird. More fluttering wings. 

Heavy footsteps. Dry leaves crunching. 

“Buttercup—is that you? Hey—Buttercup?” 

It had to be the dog. I took a few steps toward the approaching sounds. 

I stopped when the dog stepped into view. 

“Buttercup?” 

No. 

I gasped as I stared into the glaring red eyes of another dog. An 
enormous, mean-looking dog, nearly as tall as a pony, with smooth, black 
fur. 

It lowered its sleek head and snarled at me, its red eyes glowing 
angrily. “Nice doggie,” I said weakly. “Nice doggie.” It bared its teeth and 
let out a terrifying growl. Then it took a running start and, snarling with 
fury, leapt at my throat. 



18 


“Hey!” An alarmed voice called out from somewhere behind me. 

The snarling dog appeared to stop in midair. 

Its eyes still glowing like hot coals, it landed hard on all four legs. 

“Hey—go away!” the voice cried. 

I turned to see Hat running toward me, swinging a long stick in one 
hand. “Go away, dog!” Hat shouted. 

The dog lowered its head and let out a growl, its eyes still on me. It 
took a reluctant step back, its smooth black tail tucked between its heavy 
legs. It took another step back. Then another. 

“Go away!” I took up the cry. “Go away!” 

I don’t know if it was because there were now two of us, or whether it 
was the stick Hat was swinging in front of him—but the enormous creature 
suddenly turned and loped off into the trees. 

“Oh, wow,” I moaned. “Wow. Wow. That was close.” I suddenly 
realized I’d been holding my breath for so long, my chest hurt. I let it out in 
a loud whoosh. 

“Are you okay?” Hat asked. 

“Yeah, I guess,” I replied shakily. “Thanks for saving my life.” 

He stared into the trees where the dog had disappeared. “Was that a 
dog or a horse?” Hat cried. “He looked mean enough, didn’t he?” 

I nodded. My throat suddenly felt very dry. It was hard to talk. I knew 
I’d be seeing that growling beast again, in nightmares. 

“Did you find Buttercup?” I managed to ask. 

Hat kicked at a fallen tree trunk. He shook his head. “No. Not yet. 
Charlene’s getting a little ballistic.” 

“I—I know how she feels,” I stammered. I glanced to the trees. For 
some reason, I thought I saw the big, black dog coming back for me. 

But it was just a gust of wind, shaking the leaves. 

“We’d better get back,” Hat said, giving the tree trunk a final kick. 

I followed him along the path. It curved and then sloped downhill. 
Little creatures rustled the dry leaves at our feet. Chipmunks, I thought. 

I didn’t pay any attention to them. I was still picturing the enormous, 



growling monster, still thinking about my close call. 

We caught up to Molly and Charlene a short while later. They both 
looked really miserable. 

“What are we going to do?” Charlene whined. She had her hands 
jammed tightly into the pockets of her jeans. She looked about to cry. “I 
can’t go home without Buttercup!” she wailed. “I can’t!” 

“I’ll bet your dog went home,” Molly said. “I’ll bet that stupid dog is 
home already.” 

Charlene’s face brightened a little. “Do you think so? You don’t think 
he’s lost in the woods?” 

“Dogs don’t get lost,” I offered. “Only people get lost.” 

“He’s right,” Hat agreed. “Dogs have a great sense of direction. 
Buttercup is probably at home.” 

“Let’s go check it out,” Molly urged, putting a comforting hand on 
Charlene’s shoulder. 

“And what if he isn’t there?” Charlene demanded miserably. “Then 
what?” 

“Then we’ll call the police and ask them to help us find him,” Molly 
told her. 

That answer seemed to satisfy Charlene. The four of us unhappily 
began trudging out of the woods. 

We had just stepped out from the trees and were heading toward the 
street when Courtney and Denise came into view. 

They were standing at the curb. There were two dogs standing with 
them. 

Buttercup stood on one side of Courtney. The huge, black dog-monster 
sat on its haunches on Courtney’s other side. 

“Hi!” Courtney called as we went running up to them. “Do these dogs 
belong to any of you?” 

I just stopped and stared in disbelief. 

Buttercup was affectionately licking Courtney’s hand. The big, black 
dog was tenderly licking her other hand. 

“The Saint Bernard is mine!” Charlene cried happily. 

“You should hold on to his leash,” Courtney told her. “He was totally 
lost when I found him.” She handed Buttercup’s leash to Charlene. 

Charlene thanked her. 



“Isn’t this other dog a sweetheart?” Courtney cooed. She bent down 
and gave the huge black monster a nose kiss. 

That’s when I decided to give up. 

It was impossible, I saw. There was no way —no way —we would ever 
scare Courtney. 

It was time to admit defeat, I told myself. 

Little did I know just how scary things were soon going to get. 



19 


Icy hands, cold as death, wrapped around my neck. 

I screamed. 

Charlene laughed. “Eddie, what’s your problem? A little tense?” 

“Why are your hands so cold?” I demanded, rubbing my neck. 

She held up a can of Coke. “I just took this from the fridge.” 

Everyone laughed at me. 

The four of us were sitting in Charlene’s den a few days later, trying to 
decide what to try next. It was about eight-thirty on a Thursday night. We’d 
told our parents we were studying together for our math final. 

“I think we should just give up,” I said glumly. “We can’t scare 
Courtney. We just can’t.” 

“Eddie’s right,” Hat agreed. He was sitting next to Molly on the brown 
leather couch. I was slouched in the big armchair across from them. 

Charlene had dropped down to the shaggy white carpet. 

“There’s got to be a way,” Charlene insisted. “Courtney isn’t a robot, 
you know. She’s got to get scared sometimes!” 

“I’m not so sure,” I said, shaking my head. 

At that moment, Buttercup padded into the room, his tail wagging 
behind him. He made his way to Charlene and started licking her arm. 

“Get that traitor out of here!” I demanded sharply. 

Buttercup raised his head and gave me a long, wet stare with those 
sorrowful brown eyes of his. 

“You heard me, Buttercup,” I said coldly. “You’re a traitor.” 

“He’s just a dog,” Charlene said, defending him. She pulled the furry 
beast down beside her on the rug. 

“Dogs sure seem to like Courtney,” Molly commented. 

“Snakes and tarantulas like her, too,” I added bitterly. “There’s nothing 
Courtney is scared of. Nothing.” 

Molly suddenly got this devilish expression on her face. “Want to see 
something really scary?” she asked. She reached over to the other side of 
the couch and pulled the baseball cap off Hat’s head. 



“YUCK!” the three of us all cried at once. “Scary!” 

Hat’s dark hair was plastered to his head. It looked like wood or 
something. He had a deep red mark across his forehead made by the rim of 
the cap. 

“Hey!” Hat cried angrily. He grabbed the cap back and jammed it onto 
his head. 

“Don’t you ever wash your hair?” Charlene cried. 

“What for?” Hat replied. He got up and walked to the mirror so he 
could adjust the cap the way he liked it. 

We talked about scaring Courtney for a while longer. We were pretty 
depressed about the whole thing. We just couldn’t think of any good ideas. 

At a little after nine o’clock, my mom called and told me I had to come 
home. So I said good night to my friends and headed out the door. 

It had rained most of the day. Now the air was cool and wet. The front 
lawns shimmered wetly in the pale light from the street lamps. 

My house was four blocks away on the same street. I wished I had 
ridden my bike. I don’t really like walking alone this late at night. Some of 
the street lamps were out, and it was kind of creepy. 

Okay, okay. I admit it. I’m a lot easier to scare than Courtney. 

Cold hands on the back of my neck are enough to make me jump. 

Maybe that’s what we should try on Courtney, I thought as I crossed 
the street and started down the next block. Icy cold hands on the back of her 
neck. . . 

I was passing an empty lot, a long rectangle of tall weeds and 
overgrown shrubs. In the corner of my eye, I saw something move along the 
ground. 

A darting shadow, black against the yellow-gray ground. 

Something scurrying through the tall weeds toward me. 

I swallowed hard, feeling my throat tighten up. I started to jog. 

The shadow slid toward me. 

I heard a low moan. 

Just the wind? 

No. Too human to be the wind. 

Another moan, more of a cry this time. 

The trees all began to shake and whisper. Black shadows swept 
quickly toward me. 



My heart pounding, I started to run. I crossed the street and kept 
running. 

But the shadows were closing in. Darkening. About to sweep over me. 

I knew I’d never make it home. 



20 


I was running as fast as I could. The dark hedges and trees flew by in a blur. 
My sneakers slapped the wet pavement loudly. 

I could feel the blood pulsing at my temples as my house came into 
view. The yellow porchlight made the front lawn glisten brightly. 

Almost there, I thought. Almost there. Please let me make it inside. 

A few seconds later, I was lurching up the driveway. I darted past the 
front walk, along the side of the house, and up to the kitchen door. 

With a final, desperate burst of energy, I pushed open the door with my 
shoulder, bolted into the kitchen, slammed the door behind me, and locked 
it. 

Gasping for breath, my chest heaving up and down, my throat dry and 
aching, I stood there for a long while, leaning my back against the door, 
struggling to catch my breath. 

It didn’t take me long to realize that no one had really been chasing 
me. I knew it was all my imagination. 

This had happened to me before. 

Lots of times. 

Why am I such a scaredy-cat? I asked myself, starting to feel a little 
more normal now that I was home safe and sound. 

And, then, standing in the empty kitchen, waiting for my heart to stop 
pounding, I realized what my friends and I had been doing wrong. I realized 
why we hadn’t been able to scare Courtney. 

“Eddie, is that you?” my mom called from the living room. 

“Yeah. I’m home,” I called back. I hurried through the hall and poked 
my head into the living room. “I just have to make one call,” I told her. 

“But you just got home—” Mom started to protest. 

I was already halfway up the stairs. “Just one call!” I shouted down. 

I flew into my room, grabbed the phone, and called Charlene. She 
picked up after the second ring. “Hello?” 

“We’ve been doing it all wrong!” I told her breathlessly. 

“Eddie? Are you home already? Did you run all the way?” 

“We’ve been doing it all wrong,” I repeated, ignoring her questions. 



“We’ve got to scare Courtney at night! At nightl Not in the daytime. 
Everything is scarier at night!” 

There was a brief silence. Charlene must have been thinking about 
what I was saying. Finally, she said, “You’re right, Eddie. Everything is a 
lot scarier at night. But we still don’t have any good ideas.” 

“Yeah, you’re right,” I admitted. 

“We can’t just jump out at Courtney in the dark and yell 'Boo!”’ 
Charlene said. 

Charlene was right. Nighttime was definitely the right time to scare 
Courtney. But we needed an idea. A really good, terrifying idea. 

Strangely enough, Courtney gave me the idea herself the next 
morning. 



21 


We were discussing monsters at morning meeting. 

We have morning meeting to start each day. We all gather in the 
meeting area at one end of the classroom. Mr. Melvin leans against the 
chalkboard or sits on a little three-legged stool he keeps there. And we 
discuss all kinds of things. 

Actually, the same three or four kids have the discussion. The rest of 
us just sit there and pretend to listen while we struggle to wake up. 

Of course Courtney is one of the big talkers. She’s always bright and 
enthusiastic, even first thing in the morning. And she’s never afraid to give 
her opinion on anything. 

Today, Mr. Melvin was telling us how people have always believed in 
monsters, since very early times. “People have a need to create monsters,” 
he said. “It helps us believe that the real world isn’t quite as scary. The real 
world isn’t as scary as the monsters we can dream up.” 

He went on like that for quite a while. I don’t think anyone was really 
listening. It was very early in the morning, after all. 

“There are countless legends and myths, stories and movies about 
monsters,” Mr. Melvin was saying. “But no one has ever proven that 
monsters exist. Mainly because they exist only in our imaginations.” 

“That’s not true,” Courtney interrupted. She always started talking 
without raising her hand first. She never cared if she was interrupting 
someone or not. 

Mr. Melvin’s bushy black eyebrows shot up on his shiny forehead. 
“Do you have proof that monsters exist, Courtney?” he asked. 

“Courtney’s a monster,” someone whispered behind me. I heard a few 
kids snicker. 

I was sitting on the window ledge. The morning sunlight through the 
window felt warm against my back. Molly was beside me, trying to unstick 
some gum from her braces. 

“My uncle is a scientist,” Courtney said. “He told me that the Loch 
Ness Monster in Scotland really exists. It lives in this big lake, and it looks 
like a sea serpent. And people have taken pictures of it.” 



“Those pictures aren’t really proof—” Mr. Melvin started. 

But Courtney kept going. She never stopped until she’d said all she 
had to say. “My uncle says that Bigfoot is real, too. He’s seen photos of 
Bigfoot’s footprints, taken in the Himalaya Mountains.” 

There were whispered comments around the room. I glanced at Hat, 
who was sitting on the floor in the middle of the meeting area, and he rolled 
his eyes at me. 

“People don’t just imagine all the monsters,” Courtney concluded. 
“They’re real. A lot of people are just too scared to admit that they’re real.” 

“That’s a very interesting theory,” Mr. Melvin said, scratching his 
neck. “Does anyone agree with Courtney? How many of you believe in 
monsters?” 

A few kids raised their hands. I didn’t notice how many. I was lost in 
my own thoughts. 

Courtney believes in monsters, I told myself. She really believes that 
monsters exist. 

Slowly, an idea began to hatch in my mind. 

Monsters... monsters... 

Monsters at night. In the dark... 

Thanks to Courtney, I was beginning to get the perfect plan for scaring 
her. The perfect plan that had to work! 



22 


I asked Kevin to help me, and he refused. So I brought Hat, Molly, and 
Charlene over to beg him. 

“Let me get this straight,” Kevin said, frowning at us. “You want me 
and two friends to get into our Mud Monster costumes and scare some girl 
in the woods?” 

“Not some girl,” I told him impatiently. “Courtney.” 

“She deserves to be scared,” Charlene quickly added. “Really. She’s 
been asking for it.” 

It was Saturday afternoon. We were standing in my back yard. Kevin 
had the garden hose in his hand. He did a lot of lawn chores on Saturdays. 
He was about to water the flower beds. 

“The video is all finished,” Kevin said, tightening the nozzle. “I’m 
glad I don’t have to get into that costume and put on all that drippy makeup 
again.” 

“Please!” I begged. 

“It’ll be fun,” Hat told Kevin. “It’ll be really funny.” 

Kevin turned the nozzle, but no water came out. 

“The hose is tangled,” I said, pointing. “Let me untangle it for you.” I 
bent down and started to work the knot out of the hose. 

“Courtney and her friend Denise have this tree house in the woods by 
Muddy Creek,” Charlene told Kevin. 

“I know,” Kevin replied. “We did our video there. We used the tree 
house in the video. The Mud Monsters climbed up into the tree house to 
murder a guy. It was cool.” 

“Great!” Molly cried. “How about an instant replay?” 

“Please!” I pleaded. I’d been doing a lot of pleading with Kevin ever 
since I got the idea. 

“So you want the three of us to wait in the woods at night, right?” 
Kevin asked. 

I untangled the hose. Water sprayed out onto Hat’s sneakers. 

He jumped back with a startled cry. We all laughed. 

“Sorry,” Kevin said, turning the spray on the flowers. “It was an 



accident.” 

“Yeah. You and your friends wait in the woods. Then, when it’s really 
dark, you come out and scare Courtney to death!” 

“You mean we make weird sounds and stagger around with slimy mud 
dripping off us and pretend to chase her,” Kevin said. 

“Right,” I replied eagerly. I could see he was starting to get interested. 

“How are you going to get her to the tree house at night?” Kevin 
asked. 

A good question. I hadn’t really thought about that. 

“I’ll get her there,” Molly said suddenly. She’d been very quiet all 
afternoon. 

“You’ll pretend to be Denise?” I asked. “That didn’t work out well last 
time.” 

“I won’t need to be Denise this time,” Molly said mysteriously. “Don’t 
worry. I’ll get her there.” 

Kevin raised the hose till the strong spray rose up the side of the 
house. He had his back turned to me. I couldn’t tell what he was thinking. 

“Well? Will you do it?” I asked, ready to start pleading and begging 
again. “Will you get your friends to help out, too?” 

“What’s in it for me?” Kevin asked without turning around. 

“Uh...” I thought quickly. “I’ll be your servant for a week, Kevin,” I 
said. “I’ll do all your lawn chores. I’ll mow the lawn. I’ll water and weed. 
And... I’ll do the dishes every night. And I’ll clean your room.” 

He turned and narrowed his eyes at me. “Get serious,” he muttered. 

“No. Really!” I insisted. “I’ll be a total servant. Total! For a whole 
week.” 

He turned off the nozzle. The water fizzled, then slowed to a drip. 
“How about for a month?” he said. 

Whoa. A month was a long time. A month of doing all of Kevin’s 
chores and jumping at his every command. A whole month... 

Was it worth it? Was it worth turning myself into a pitiful, overworked 
servant for a month just to scare Courtney? 

Of course it was! 

“Okay,” I said. “A month.” 

He grinned and shook my hand. His hand was wet from the hose. 

He handed the hose to me. “Take over, servant,” he ordered. 



I took the hose from him. Water dripped onto the front of my jeans. 
“When do you want the three Mud Monsters to appear?” Kevin asked. 
“When do you want to scare Courtney?” 

“Tomorrow night,” I replied. 



23 


Fm not really sure how the legend of the Mud Monsters got started. I heard 
about them first from another kid when I was little. The kid was trying to 
scare me, and he did a pretty good job of it. 

The legend goes something like this: 

Some early settlers of our town were too poor to build houses. So they 
set up little huts in the woods along the banks of Muddy Creek. 

The creek was much bigger then, much deeper and wider. It wasn’t 
just a muddy trickle of water the way it is today. 

The people were poor and hard-working and, pretty soon, they’d built 
an entire village of huts along the creek. But the people in town looked 
down on them. They refused to help them in any way. 

The town officials refused to share the city water supply with the 
Muddy Creek people. The store owners refused to let them buy anything on 
credit. 

Many of the Creek people were going hungry. Many of them were 
sick. But the town refused to help. 

This all happened over a hundred years ago. Maybe even longer. 

One night, there was a terrible rainstorm. Pouring rains and hurricane 
winds. 

Before the Creek people could run to safety, the creek rose up. The 
muddy banks towered up like a tidal wave, a tidal wave of heavy, black 
mud. 

The mud swept over the village. It buried all the huts and all the 
people. Like lava from a volcano, it buried everything beneath it. 

The next morning, there was nothing left of the village. The creek 
rolled by, high on its muddy banks. The woods were silent and empty. 

The village and all the people were gone. 

Only not completely. 

According to the legend, once a year when the moon is full, the 
villagers rise up from the mud. They’re monsters now, half-dead and half- 
alive. They’re Mud Monsters. 

And once a year the Mud Monsters pull themselves up from their 



muddy graves to dance in the moonlight—and to seek revenge on the 
townspeople who refused to help them. 

That’s the local legend, as much as I know of it. 

Of course it isn’t true. But it’s a really good story, I think. And it’s 
been told again and again, passed on from one generation to the next. 

The story has scared an awful lot of kids. Including me. 

And now, on Sunday night, Kevin and his two fellow Mud Monsters 
were about to terrify Courtney, the girl who couldn’t be terrified. 

At a little after seven, Kevin was in the bathroom, putting the finishing 
touches on his costume. He had thick, brownish-orange mud caked over his 
face and hair. He wore a loose-fitting black shirt over baggy black jeans. 
His clothing was dripping with mud, too. 

I stepped into the doorway and examined him as he piled more thick 
goo onto his hair. “Yuck. You really look gross,” I told him. 

“Thanks, punk,” he replied. “Did you finish loading the dishwasher?” 

“Yes,” I said grudgingly. 

“And did you collect all my dirty clothes from my room and put them 
in the hamper?” 

“Yes,” I muttered. 

“Yes, sir,” he corrected me. “A servant should always be polite.” 

“Yes, sir,” I repeated. He had been running me ragged ever since I’d 
agreed to be his servant. It was truly unbelievable how many chores he 
found for me to do! 

But now the big moment was rapidly approaching, the moment that 
would make my month of drudgery worthwhile. 

Kevin turned to me. “How do I look?” 

“Like a pile of mud,” I replied. 

He smiled. “Thanks.” I followed him down to the front hall. He picked 
up the car keys from the little table. “I’m going to drive over and pick up 
my two friends,” he said, admiring his gruesome appearance in the hall 
mirror. “Then we’ll find hiding places in the woods. Want a lift?” 

I shook my head. “No. Thanks. I’ve got to go to Molly’s first. There’s 
one little detail we have to take care of.” 

“What’s that?” Kevin asked. 

“Getting Courtney to the woods,” I replied. 



24 


“Hi, Eddie. What’s going on?” Molly’s dad asked. 

We were standing in Molly’s kitchen. Her dad pulled open the 
refrigerator and removed a can of ginger ale. Then he searched the shelves, 
squinting into the light. 

“Nothing much, Dad,” Molly replied nervously. “Eddie and I are just 
hanging out.” 

He turned away from the refrigerator. “You two want to play some 
Scrabble or something?” 

“No. No thanks,” Molly replied quickly. “Not tonight, okay?” 

I glanced up at the kitchen clock. It was getting late. We didn’t have 
time for any long discussions with Molly’s dad. We had to get Courtney to 
the woods. 

“How about some card games?” her dad said, sticking his head back in 
the refrigerator. “You’ve been wanting me to teach you poker. I don’t have 
much to do tonight, so—” 

“Eddie and I have to talk about stuff,” Molly said. “And... uh... we 
have to call some kids.” 

Her dad looked hurt. He pulled some cold cuts from the fridge and 
started to make a sandwich. “You two hungry?” 

“No. We’re not,” Molly replied impatiently. She pulled me toward the 

den. 

“Molly, we’ve got to hurry,” I whispered. 

“Tell me about it,” Molly said dryly. She pushed her glasses up on her 
nose. “Here. You can listen on this phone, Eddie. I’ll go upstairs and call 
Courtney.” 

“What are you going to say? You’re not going to pretend to be 
Denise?” I was starting to feel really nervous. We should have called 
Courtney a lot earlier. We shouldn’t have waited until the last minute. 

Molly flashed me a mysterious smile. “You’ll see,” she said slyly. 
Then she disappeared upstairs. 

I paced back and forth in the den for a minute or so, giving Molly time 
enough to dial. Then I carefully picked up the receiver and held it to my ear. 



Molly already had Courtney on the phone. “Who is this?” Courtney 
was asking. 

“It’s Molly,” was the reply. 

I held my breath. Why was Molly telling Courtney the truth? 

“Hi, Molly. What’s up?” Courtney asked, surprise in her voice. She 
and Molly had never exactly been pals. 

“I heard something I thought you’d be interested in,” Molly said 
breathlessly. “I just heard that the Mud Monsters are supposed to appear at 
the creek tonight.” 

There was a long silence on Courtney’s end. Finally, she said, “This is 
a joke, right?” 

“No,” Molly answered quickly. “I really heard it. They said it’s a full 
moon, and this is the night the Mud Monsters rise up every year.” 

“Molly, give me a break,” Courtney said sarcastically. “Come on. 
Why’d you call me?” 

She isn’t buying it, I thought, gripping the phone tightly, too nervous 
to breathe. Courtney isn’t buying it. Molly’s idea is a flop. 

“Well, Courtney, you said in school that you believed in monsters,” 
Molly said. “And so when I heard about the Mud Monsters, I thought you 
would be really desperate to see them.” 

“Where did you hear about this?” Courtney demanded suspiciously. 

“On the radio,” Molly lied. “I just heard it on the radio. They said the 
Mud Monsters were going to rise up in the woods tonight when the moon is 
up.” 

“Well, you go,” Courtney said coldly. “You can tell me about it in 
school on Monday.” 

Oh, no, I thought. Failure. Total failure. The whole plan is a bust. My 
brother is going to kill me! 

“Well, I might go,” Molly told Courtney, not giving up. “I mean, you 
don’t get a chance to see real monsters very often. But if you’re scared, 
Courtney, you should stay home.” 

“Huh? What did you just say?” Courtney demanded, her voice rising 
shrilly. 

“I said,” Molly repeated, “if you’re too scared, you definitely should 
stay away from the woods.” 

“Me? Scared?” Courtney’s voice was almost high enough for only 



dogs to hear. “I’m not scared of any Mud Monsters, Molly. I’ll see you 
there in ten minutes. Unless you ’re too scared.” 

“No. Really. Stay home,” Molly told Courtney. “I don’t want to be 
responsible. If you start to panic and you get hurt—” 

“See you there,” Courtney said sharply. She hung up. 

A few seconds later, Molly returned to the den with a wide, pleased 
smile on her face. “Am I a genius, or what?” she asked. 

“You’re a genius,” I replied. “Let’s get going.” 



25 


I felt a cold shiver as Molly and I neared the woods at Muddy Creek. The 
air was surprisingly cool and damp. Slender wisps of black clouds floated 
over the full moon, which still hovered low over the trees. 

“This is exciting,” Molly said, her eyes searching the dark trees ahead 
of us. “I can’t believe we’re finally going to scare Courtney.” 

“I can’t believe it, either,” I said. “I just keep wondering what will go 
wrong this time.” 

“Nothing will go wrong,” Molly assured me. “Stop being such a 
pessimist. Tonight’s the night, Eddie.” 

Charlene and Hat were waiting for us at the edge of the woods. Molly 
saw them first and waved. We both began jogging over to them. 

“Have you seen my brother and his two friends?” I asked, gazing 
toward the dark woods. 

“No,” Hat replied. 

“But we saw Courtney,” Charlene reported. 

“She and Denise were hurrying to the tree house.” 

“She brought Denise?” I cried. “Great! We’ll terrify Denise, too!” 

“Did they see you?” Molly asked Charlene. 

“No way,” Charlene replied. “Hat and I hid. Over there.” She pointed 
to a cluster of thick shrubs. 

The woods suddenly grew brighter. I glanced up to see that the wispy 
clouds had rolled away from the moon. Pale yellow light, eerie light, 
washed over us. 

The trees suddenly shook in a gust of wind. It sounded like whispering 
all around us. 

“My brother and his friends must be hiding down by the creek,” I said. 
“Come on. Let’s go. We don’t want to miss the big moment.” 

The four of us made our way through the trees. We tried to walk 
silently, but twigs and dried leaves crackled noisily under our sneakers. 

I gasped when I heard a soft moan. 

A haunting, sad cry. Mournful. 

I stopped and listened. Another moan. 



“Wh-what’s that?” I stammered in a choked whisper. 

“Sounds like a bird. A dove, maybe,” Charlene replied. 

Another moan. Yes. It was a dove, up in a tree. 

“Hey, Eddie, you’re not freaking already, are you?” Hat demanded. He 
slapped me hard on the back. “You’ve got to keep it together, man.” 

“ I’m together,” I muttered. I felt embarrassed that I’d panicked over a 
stupid dove. I was glad it was too dark for them to see me blushing. 

I reached out and flipped Hat’s cap around, just to get my mind off the 
dove. 

“Hey!” Hat cried out, spinning around angrily. 

“Ssshhh. Quiet. Courtney and Denise will hear us,” Molly scolded. 

We made our way quickly toward the tree house. The woods grew 
darker as we crept under the whispering trees. We huddled closer together 
as we walked. No one whispered or spoke. 

I heard more low moans. Soft cries. 

I forced myself to ignore them. I wasn’t going to allow myself to be 
frightened by any more birds. 

It seemed as if we had walked for hours, but I knew it had only been a 
couple of minutes. My throat felt dry, and my knees were a little shaky. Just 
from the excitement, I guessed. 

“Oh!” I cried out as I tripped over something, a raised tree root or a 
rock. I went sprawling in the dirt face first. “Ow.” 

Hat and Charlene pulled me up quickly. “Are you okay?” Charlene 
whispered. 

“Yeah. Fine,” I muttered, brushing myself off. I had landed hard on my 
right elbow, and it was throbbing like crazy. 

“Stop trying to scare us,” Charlene scolded me. 

“I’m not,” I protested. Rubbing my aching elbow, I followed them 
along the path. 

We stopped at the edge of the clearing. Keeping in the darkness of the 
trees, we stared out at the tree house. 

It was more like a platform with walls than a house. I mean, it didn’t 
have a roof or anything. Courtney and Denise were perched in it, leaning 
against one side. 

Moonlight washed over the clearing, and I could see them both clearly. 
Courtney had a pair of binoculars up to her eyes. Denise was shining a 



flashlight into the trees. She had a camera around her neck. 

Perfect, I thought, snickering to myself. They always have to be the 
perfect scientists. I was surprised they hadn’t made work sheets so they 
could check off the Mud Monsters when they saw them. Under wildlife! 

My three friends and I squatted down behind a clump of tall weeds and 
watched them. Courtney and Denise kept chatting as they peered out over 
the tree house wall. But I couldn’t hear what they were saying. 

“I can’t wait!” Hat whispered, leaning toward me. His dark eyes 
flashed excitedly under the brim of his cap. He was furiously chewing a big 
wad of gum. “Where’s your brother?” he asked. 

My eyes searched the trees that lined the creek bed just behind the 
clearing. “I don’t see him,” I whispered to Hat. “But he and his friends are 
there somewhere. And they’re going to come walking out any minute.” 

“And then the fun will begin,” Hat whispered, grinning. 

“Yeah,” I agreed. “Then the fun will begin.” 

But I had this gnawing doubt, a heavy feeling of dread. 

Where were Kevin and his friends? 

Where were they? 

And then I saw something moving behind the tree house at the edge of 
the clearing. 



26 


I grabbed Hat’s sleeve when I saw the moving shadows near the trees. 
“Look!” I whispered, my heart pounding. I pointed across the clearing. 

But I didn’t need to point. He saw them, too. We all saw them. 

Courtney and Denise were facing the other direction, unaware that 
something was happening behind them. 

I stared hard, holding my breath, keeping low behind the weeds. 

I saw a dark figure moving slowly toward the tree house. 

Then I saw another figure behind it. It seemed to be pulling itself up 
from the mud. 

A third figure staggered into the light. 

Yes! 

The three Mud Monsters! 

Kevin and his friends had come through for us! 

Courtney and Denise still didn’t see them. 

Courtney was leaning on the tree house wall, peering through the 
binoculars. 

Denise was aiming the flashlight in the other direction. 

I could see Kevin and his friends clearly now. They looked great! 

Their heads were covered with wet, dark mud. Their clothes appeared 
tattered and decayed. 

Dripping mud, they staggered forward, like zombies, with their arms 
outstretched. 

Closer. Closer to the tree house. 

Turn around! I silently urged Courtney and Denise. 

Turn around—and start screaming your heads off! 

But Courtney and Denise still didn’t turn around. They still had no 
idea the three gmesome Mud Monsters were sneaking up behind them. 

I turned and glanced quickly at my three friends. Molly and Charlene 
were frozen like statues, their mouths wide open, their eyes bulging, 
enjoying the show. Hat stared without blinking. Watching gleefully. 
Waiting. 



We were all waiting for our two victims to realize the Mud Monsters 
were approaching. 

Suddenly, as I stared at the three staggering Mud Monsters in the 
clearing, I heard a rustling sound behind me. 

Crackling twigs. The scrape of shoes against the ground. 

Footsteps. 

Low murmuring voices. 

“Huh?” With a gasp of surprise, I turned back. 

And saw three other Mud Monsters standing behind us! 

“No!” I tried to scream, but my voice came out a choked whisper. 

Hat, Molly, and Charlene spun around as the three new Mud Monsters 
moved closer. 

And I recognized Kevin in the middle of them. 

“K-Kevin!” I stammered. 

“Sorry, punk,” Kevin whispered. “But we had a flat tire.” 



27 


“Are we too late?” Kevin asked. 

I didn’t reply. I couldn’t. 

I turned back to the clearing. The three Mud Monsters were staggering 
right behind the tree house. Their sunken eyes peered out from the wet mud 
that dripped down their faces. 

And then I saw more of them. I saw arms poking up from the dirt. I 
saw mud-covered heads appear. More and more bodies rose up silently 
from the marshy ground. 

Dark figures, dripping with thick mud, pushed themselves up and 
began staggering across the clearing. Their bare feet slapped the mud as 
they walked. 

There were dozens of them now. Skinny, scraggly, twisted, mud- 
drenched bodies, all lurching toward the tree house. Dozens. And dozens 
more, pulling themselves up from under the ground. 

“Run!” I screamed, jumping out from behind the weeds. “Courtney! 
Denise! Run! Run!” 

They hesitated. Then they finally saw the hideous monsters. 

Courtney’s shrill scream rang out through the trees. 

She screamed out in terror. Again. And then again. 

She and Denise were both screaming. 

It should have been our big moment, our triumph. 

But it wasn’t. 

The two girls screamed in shrill horror. 

And then I realized we were all screaming. 

Their feet smacking wetly over the ground, the Mud Monsters 
staggered forward. 

I saw Courtney and Denise leap to the ground. 

And then I saw them running, screaming in terror as they ran. 

And then I was running, too. Running through the dark trees. Running 
from the woods. 

Running. Running. Running from the mud-covered monsters I knew 
I’d never forget, no matter how far I ran. 



Well, that all happened two weeks ago. Two long weeks ago. 

The horror is over. It’s all behind us. 

But I still don’t go out much. I really don’t like to leave the house. 
Neither do my friends. 

Yesterday, Kevin asked me if I wanted to see his Mud Monsters video. 
It’s all edited and finished, he said. 

I told him no thanks. I really don’t want to watch it. 

I’ve been very nervous and tense since that night in the woods. 

My friends have been nervous and tense, too. We’re all totally stressed 

out. 

Except for Courtney. 

You know what Courtney has been doing? She’s been bragging to 
everyone that she was right. That there really are monsters in the world. 

Courtney’s been bragging to everyone how she proved there are real 
monsters because she saw them. 

She’s worse than ever. 

My friends and I, we’d really like to give Courtney a good scare. 

We’d really like to scare Courtney once and for all. 

But we can’t. We’re just too scared. 




Search

 UPLOADbrett_devan_wieler BRETT_DEVAN_WIELER
 
BOOKS
 
VIDEO
 
AUDIO
 
SOFTWARE
 
IMAGES
Upload files
My uploads
My loans
My favorites
My web archives
Account settings
Get help
Log out
 Search metadata
 Search text contents
 Search TV news captions
 Search radio transcripts
 Search archived web sites
Advanced Search
ABOUT BLOG PROJECTS HELP DONATE  CONTACT JOBS VOLUNTEER PEOPLE
Full text of "Goosebumps [All Books]"
See other formats
,A . - 

E 

hi 

ter 










ONE DAY AT 
HORRORLAND 


Goosebumps - 16 
R.L. Stine 





1 


As we entered the gates to HorrorLand, we had no idea that, in just a few hours, 
we would all be lying in our coffins. 

I’m the calm one in the Morris family. Everyone says, “Lizzy, you’re the 
calm one.” And I’m trying to tell this story calmly. 

But believe me—there’s no way! 

We had never planned to go to HorrorLand. In fact, we’d never heard of it. 

The five of us were squeezed into Dad’s little Toyota, on our way to spend 
the day at Zoo Gardens Theme Park. Dad had messed up and left the map at 
home. But Mom said the park would be real easy to find. 

When we got close to the park, Mom said, there would be lots of signs to 
direct us. But so far we hadn’t seen a single sign. 

Dad was driving, and Mom was beside him in the front. I was squeezed in 
back with my little brother, Luke, who is ten, and Luke’s friend Clay. 

It wasn’t the best place to be. My brother cannot sit still for a second. 
Especially in the car. He just has too much energy. And he’s totally goofy. 

The longer we drove, the more restless Luke became. He tried wrestling 
with Clay, but there really wasn’t room. Then he tried arm wrestling with him, 
and the two of them kept bumping me until I lost my temper and started shouting 
at them to stop. 

“Why don’t you three play Alphabet?” Mom suggested from the front. 
“Look out the window for letters.” 

“There aren’t any,” Luke replied. “There aren’t any signs.” 

“There isn’t anything to look at,” Clay grumbled. 

He was right. We were driving past flat, sandy fields. There were a few 
scraggly trees here and there. The rest was all desert. 

“I’m going to take this turnoff,” Dad announced. He took off his Chicago 
Cubs cap and scratched his thinning blond hair. “Haven’t I already taken this 
turnoff?” 

Dad is the only blond in the family. Mom, Luke, and I all have straight 
black hair and blue eyes. 

In fact, Dad doesn’t look as if he belongs in the same family. The three of 
us are tall and thin, with very fair skin. And Dad is short and kind of chubby, 



with a round face that’s almost always pink. I tease him all the time because I 
think he looks a lot more like a wrestler than a bank manager, which he is. 

“I’m pretty sure we’ve already been here,” Dad said unhappily. 

“It’s hard to tell. It’s all desert,” Mom replied, gazing out her window. 

“Very helpful,” Dad muttered. 

“How can I be helpful?” Mom shot back. “You’re the one who left the map 
on the kitchen table.” 

“I thought you packed it,” Dad grumbled. 

“Why should it be my job to pack the map?” Mom cried. 

“Break it up, you two,” I interrupted. Once they start fighting, they never 
stop. It’s always best to interrupt them quickly before they really get into it. 

“I’m the Mad Pincher!” Luke cried. He let out a gruesome, horror-movie 
laugh and started pinching Clay’s ribs and arms. 

I hate Luke’s Mad Pincher routine more than anything. I was so glad that 
Clay was sitting in the middle next to Luke and not me. Usually, the only way to 
stop Luke’s pinching is to slug him. 

Clay started squirming and laughing. He thinks everything Luke does is a 
riot. He laughs at all of my brother’s stupid jokes and stunts. I think that’s why 
Luke likes Clay so much. 

The two of them began pinching each other. 

Then Luke shoved Clay into me. “Give me a break!” I cried. 

I shoved Clay back. I know I shouldn’t have. But it was getting hot in the 
car, and we’d been driving for hours, and what was I supposed to do? 

“Lizzy! Boys! Chill out back there!” Dad cried. 

“Dad, nobody says ‘chill out’ anymore,” I told him calmly and quietly. 

For some reason, that made him go berserk. He started yelling, and his face 
got bright red. 

I knew he wasn’t mad at me. He was mad because he couldn’t find Zoo 
Gardens Theme Park. 

“Everybody just take a deep breath and be silent,” Mom suggested. 

“Ow! Stop pinching me!” Clay screamed. He gave Luke a hard shove. 

“You stop pinching me!” my brother shrieked, shoving him back. 

Boys can really be animals. 

“Hey, look—a sign up ahead!” Mom pointed as a large green sign came 
into view. 

Luke and Clay stopped fighting. Dad leaned forward over the steering 



wheel, squinting through the windshield. 

“Does it say where the park is?” Luke demanded. 

“Does it say where we are?” Clay asked. 

The words on the sign came into view as we drove past it. It read: SIGN 
FOR RENT. 

We all let out disappointed groans. 

“The Mad Pincher returns!” Luke cried. He gave Clay a hard pinch on the 
arm. Luke never knows when to quit. 

“This road isn’t going anywhere,” Dad said, scowling. “I’ll have to turn 
around and get back on the highway. If I can find it.” 

“I think you should ask someone for directions,” Mom suggested. 

“Ask someone? Ask someone?” Dad exploded. “Do you see anyone I can 
ask?” His face was bright red again. He drove with one hand so he could use the 
other to shake a fist. 

“I meant if you see a gas station,” Mom murmured. 

“A gas station?” Dad screamed. “I don’t even see a tree!” 

Dad was right. I stared out the window and saw nothing but white sand on 
both sides of the road. The sun beamed down on it, making it gleam. The sand 
was so bright, it nearly looked like snow. 

“I meant to go north,” Dad muttered. “The desert is south. We must have 
gone south.” 

“You’d better turn around,” Mom urged. 

“Are we lost?” Clay asked. I could hear some fear in his voice. 

Clay isn’t the bravest kid in the world. In fact, he is pretty easy to scare. 
Once I crept up behind him in our backyard at night and whispered his name— 
and he almost jumped right out of his shoes! 

“Dad, are we lost?” Luke repeated the question. 

“Yeah, we’re lost,” Dad replied quietly. “Hopelessly lost.” 

Clay let out a soft cry and slumped in the seat. He looked a little like a 
balloon deflating. 

“Don’t tell him that!” Mom cried sharply. 

“What should I tell him?” Dad snapped back. “We’re nowhere near Zoo 
Gardens. We’re nowhere near civilization! We’re in the desert, going nowhere!” 

“Just turn around. I’m sure we’ll find someone we can ask,” Mom said 
softly. “And stop being so dramatic.” 

“We’re all going to die in the desert,” Luke said, with a gmesome grin on 



his face. “And buzzards will peck out our eyeballs and eat our flesh.” 

My brother has a great sense of humor, doesn’t he? 

You can’t imagine what it’s like having to live with a total ghoul! 

“Luke, stop scaring Clay,” Mom said, turning in her seat to glare at Luke. 

“I’m not scared,” Clay insisted. But he looked scared. His round face was 
kind of pale. And his eyes were blinking a lot behind his glasses. With his short, 
feathery blond hair and round eyeglasses, Clay looked a lot like a frightened 
owl. 

Muttering to himself, Dad slowed the car to a stop. Then he turned it 
around, and we headed back in the direction we had come. “Great vacation,” he 
said through clenched teeth. 

“It’s still early,” Mom told him, checking her watch. 

The late morning sun was nearly straight overhead. I could feel its warmth 
on my face through the open sunroof. 

We drove for nearly half an hour. Luke wanted to play Twenty Questions or 
Geography with Clay. But Clay moodily said no. He just stared out the window, 
watching the desert roll by. Every few minutes, he’d ask, “Are we still lost?” 

“Pretty lost,” my dad would reply unhappily. 

“We’re okay,” Mom kept reassuring us. 

As we drove, the scraggly trees reappeared. Then, after a while, the sand 
gave way to darker fields, dotted with trees and low shrubs. 

I sat silently, my hands clasped in my lap, staring out the window. I wasn’t 
really scared or worried. But I wished we would at least see a gas station or a 
store or one other human being! 

“I’m getting hungry,” Luke griped. “Is it lunchtime?” 

With a long sigh that sounded like air escaping from a tire, Dad pulled the 
car to the side of the road. He reached across Mom to the glove compartment. 
“There’s got to be some kind of map in there,” he said. 

“No. I already looked,” Mom told him. 

As they started to argue, I raised my eyes to the open sunroof above my 
head. 

“Oh!” I let out a cry as I saw a hideous monster staring down at me, 
lowering its enormous head, about to crush the car. 



2 


I opened my mouth to scream, but no sound came out. 

The monster glared down at me through the sunroof. It was as tall as a 
building, I realized. Its red eyes glowed with evil, and its mouth was twisted in a 
hungry grin. 

“D-Dad!” I finally managed to stammer. Dad was bent over, fumbling 
through the papers in the glove compartment. 

“Wow!” I heard Luke cry. 

I turned and saw that Luke was staring up at it, too, his blue eyes wide with 
fright. 

“Dad? Mom?” My heart was pounding so hard, I thought my chest might 
explode. 

“Lizzy, what is it?” Mom asked impatiently. 

The monster lowered its head over us. Its mouth opened wide, ready to 
swallow the whole car. 

And then Luke started to laugh. “Wow! Cool!” he cried. 

And I realized at the same time that the monster wasn’t alive. It was a 
mechanical figure, part of a giant billboard display. 

Ducking my head to get a better view through the side window, I saw that 
Dad had pulled the car up right beside the billboard. My parents were so busy 
arguing about maps, they hadn’t even noticed it! 

I stared up at the red-eyed monster. It lowered its head and opened its jaws. 
Then the jaws snapped shut, and the enormous head slid back up. 

“It looks so real!” Clay exclaimed, staring up at it. 

“Didn’t fool me,” I lied. I wasn’t going to admit that I nearly leaped out 
through the sunroof. I’m supposed to be the calm one, after all. 

I rolled down the window and stuck my head out to read the billboard in 
front of the mechanical monster. In huge red letters it said: WELCOME TO 
HORRORLAND, WHERE NIGHTMARES COME TO LIFE! 

There was a dark red arrow in the upper left-hand corner with the words: 
ONE MILE. 

“Can we go there?” Luke demanded eagerly. He leaned forward and 
grabbed the back of Dad’s seat with both hands. “Can we, Dad? How about it?” 



“It looks kind of scary,” Clay said softly. 

Dad slammed the glove compartment shut with a sigh. He was giving up on 
the map idea. “Luke, stop pulling my seat,” he snapped. “Sit back.” 

“Can we go to HorrorLand?” Luke asked. 

“HorrorLand? What’s HorrorLand?” Mom demanded. 

“Never heard of it,” Dad muttered. 

“It’s only a mile from here,” Luke pleaded. “It looks great!” 

The monster lowered its head over the car, staring in through the sunroof. 
Then it raised its head again. 

“I don’t think so,” Mom said, looking out at the huge billboard. “Zoo 
Gardens is such a wonderful park. HorrorLand doesn’t look very nice.” 

“It looks great!” Luke insisted, pulling at Dad’s seat back again. “It looks 
really excellent!” 

“Luke, sit back,” Dad pleaded. 

“Let’s go,” I urged. “We’re never going to find Zoo Gardens.” 

Mom hesitated, chewing her lower lip. “I don’t know,” she said fretfully. 
“Some of these places aren’t safe.” 

“It’ll be safe!” Luke declared. “It’ll be very safe!” 

“Luke—sit back!” Dad growled. 

“Can we go?” Luke demanded, ignoring Dad’s request. “Can we?” 

“It could be fun,” Clay said quietly. 

“Let’s give it a try,” I urged them. “If we hate it, we can always leave.” 

Dad rubbed his chin. He sighed. “Well, I guess it would be better than 
sitting here in the middle of nowhere arguing all day.” 

“YAAAAAY!” Luke screamed. 

Luke and I reached over Clay to slap each other a high five. HorrorLand 
sounded like a pretty cool place to me, too. I love scary rides. 

“If the rides are as scary as that monster,” I said, pointing at the billboard, 
“this park will be awesome!” 

“You don’t think it’s too scary—do you?” Clay asked. I saw that he had his 
hands clasped tightly in his lap. And he had that frightened owl look on his face 
again. 

“No, it won’t be too scary,” I told him. 

Oh, wow—was I wrong ! 


“I can’t believe someone would build a big theme park out in the wilderness,” 



Dad declared. 

We were driving through what seemed like an endless forest. Tall old trees 
leaned over the two-lane road, nearly blocking out the late morning sun. 

“Maybe they haven’t built the park yet,” Mom suggested. “Maybe they’re 
going to clear out these trees and build the park here.” 

All three of us in the backseat were hoping Mom was wrong. And she was. 

The road curved sharply. And as we came out of the curve, we saw the tall 
gates to the park straight up ahead. 

Behind a tall purple fence, HorrorLand seemed to stretch for miles. Leaning 
forward in my seat, I could see the tops of rides and strange, colorful buildings. 
As we drove across the enormous parking lot, eerie chords of organ music 
invaded the car. 

“YAAAAAY! This looks great!” Luke exclaimed. 

Clay and I enthusiastically agreed. I couldn’t wait to get out of the car and 
see everything. 

“The parking lot is nearly empty,” Dad said, glancing uneasily at Mom. 

“That means we won’t have to wait in long lines!” I quickly exclaimed. 

“I think Lizzy is excited about this place,” Mom commented, smiling. 

“Me, too!” Luke cried. He punched Clay enthusiastically on the shoulder. 
Luke always has to be punching or pinching somebody. 

We crossed the wide parking lot. I saw a few cars parked near the front 
gate. At the far side of the lot stood a row of purple-and-green buses with the 
word HORRORLAND across the side. 

As we rode closer, I got a good look at the front gate. The same monster we 
had seen behind the billboard rose up behind a big purple-and-green sign over 
the gate. The sign read: THE HORRORLAND HORRORS WELCOME YOU 
TO HORRORLAND! 

“I don’t get that sign,” Mom said. “What are the HorrorLand Horrors?” 

“We’ll find out!” I exclaimed happily. 

The solemn, eerie organ music floated heavily over the parking lot. Dad 
pulled into a space in an empty aisle to the right of the front gate. 

Luke and I pushed open the back doors before the car had even stopped. 
“Let’s go!” I cried. 

Luke, Clay, and I started trotting toward the gate. As I ran, I stared up at the 
green monster over the sign. This one didn’t move its head like the billboard 
monster. But it looked very real. 



I glanced back and saw that Mom and Dad were hurrying to catch up with 
us. “This is going to be way cool!” I exclaimed. 

And then I gasped as a deafening explosion made the ground shake. 

And I stared back in horror as our car burst apart, exploding into a million 
pieces. 



3 


It took me a long while to stop screaming. Finally, I swallowed hard, choking 
back my cries. 

We all stared in shock. Small chunks of twisted metal and a few burning 
cinders were all that was left of our car. 

“How—?” was all Dad managed to say. 

“I—I d-don’t believe it!” I stammered. 

“Thank goodness we were all out of the car!” Mom cried. She gathered us 
up in a big hug. “Thank goodness we’re all okay.” 

Luke and Clay still hadn’t uttered a sound. They stood wide-eyed, staring at 
the spot where the car had stood. 

“My car!” Dad choked out in a horrified whisper. “My car... How? How?” 

“We’re safe,” Mom murmured. “We’re all safe. What a terrifying explosion. 
I can’t get the sound of it out of my ears.” 

“I—I’ve got to call the police!” Dad sputtered. 

He began trotting to the gate, shaking his head, muttering to himself. 

“How could the car just blow up like that, dear?” Mom asked, hurrying 
after him. “What would make it do that?” 

“How should I know?” Dad snapped angrily. “I—I don’t get it! I really 
don’t! And now what are we going to do?” He sounded really panicked. 

I didn’t blame him. The explosion was really scary. 

And when I realized that we could have all been inside the car when it went 
off, I had cold chills down my back. 

“Maybe there’s a car rental place we can call,” Mom suggested. 

Mom is like me, calm in any emergency. 

We followed Dad as he went running up to the ticket booth at the entrance. 
A green monster stood in the booth. He had bulging yellow eyes and dark horns 
curled over his head. It was a really great costume. 

“Welcome to HorrorLand,” he said in a gruff, low voice. A loud stab of 
organ music rose up from inside the ticket booth. “I am a HorrorLand Horror. 
All of the Horrors and I hope you have a scary day.” 

“My car!” Dad cried frantically “There was an explosion. I need a phone!” 

“I’m sorry, sir. No phones,” the guy in the monster costume replied. 



“Huh?” Dad’s face was bright red again. His forehead was drenched with 
sweat. “But I need a phone! Right away!” Dad insisted, glaring angrily at the 
green monster. “My car exploded! We’re stuck here!” 

“We’ll take care of you,” the Horror replied, lowering his gruff voice nearly 
to a whisper. 

“You’ll what? Dad cried. “We need a car. I need to get to a phone! Don’t 
you understand?” 

“No phones,” the monster repeated. “But, please, sir. Allow us to take care 
of you. I promise we will take care of everything. Don’t let this spoil your visit 
to HorrorLand.” 

“Spoil my visit?!” Dad shrieked, his face growing even redder. “But my car 

_ !” 

Another loud stab of organ music made me jump. The creepy music made 
me feel as if I were actually in a horror movie! 

“We will take care of you. I promise,” the Horror said. A strange smile 
crossed his face. His yellow eyes lit up. “Please enjoy your stay, and do not 
worry about transportation. The other Horrors and I will see that you are 
properly taken care of.” 

“But—but—” Dad sputtered. 

The Horror gestured toward the park. “Please enter as our guests. Free 
admission. I apologize for your car. But, please, do not worry. I promise you will 
have no need to worry about your car.” 

Dad turned back to us, sweat dripping down his forehead. I could see that 
he was really upset. “I—I can’t enjoy an amusement park now,” he said. “I can’t 
believe this happened. I really can’t. We’ve got to get a car somehow, and—” 

“Oh, please, Dad!” Luke cried. “Please! Can’t we go inside? He said he’ll 
take care of it for us.” 

“Just for a little while?” I joined my brother in pleading. 

“We’ve had such a long drive,” Mom told Dad. “Let’s go in for a short 
while. Let them blow off some steam.” 

Dad thought about it, frowning hard. “Okay. Just for a little while,” he 
agreed finally. 

The organ music grew louder as we stepped through the gate. “Wow! Look 
at this place!” I cried. “It really is like being in a horror movie.” 

We were standing on a brown cobbled street. Strange dark cottages tilted up 
on both sides of the street. Tall trees along the street nearly blocked out all the 



sunlight. The air carried a chill. 

Low howls, like wolf howls, floated out from the cottages. 

“Cool!” Luke declared. 

A sign proclaimed: WELCOME TO WEREWOLF VILLAGE. DO NOT 
FEED THE WEREWOLVES. IF YOU CAN HELP IT. 

The frightening howls grew louder. 

Luke and I laughed at the sign. 

I saw a green monster, one of the Horrors, staring out at us through a dark 
window in the cottage across the narrow street. Another Horror walked past 
carrying a very real-looking human head. He grasped it by its long blond hair 
and bounced it up and down, sort of like a yo-yo, as he walked. 

“Cool!” Luke proclaimed again. It seemed to be his word of the day. 

We walked along the cobbled street. The sound of our thudding sneakers 
echoed off the cottage walls. 

“Ohh!” We ah let out cries of surprise as a long, low, gray wolf ran in front 
of us. It disappeared around the side of a cottage before we really got a good 
look at it. 

“Was that a real wolf?” Clay asked, his voice shaking. 

“Of course not,” I told him. “It was probably a dog. Or else it was 
mechanical.” 

“Well, they certainly keep this park clean,” Mom said, trying to sound 
cheerful. “There isn’t a piece of trash or dirt anywhere. Of course, it isn’t very 
crowded.” 

Dad lingered behind. “I—I’ve got to find a phone,” he said fretfully. “I 
can’t enjoy this until I know we have a way to get home.” 

“But, dear—” Mom started. 

“There’s got to be a phone somewhere,” Dad interrupted. “Go on without 

me.” 

“No. I’ll come with you,” Mom said. “You’re in such a frantic state. You’ll 
need me to make the calls for you. The kids will have a better time without us 
hanging around anyway.” 

“Leave them?” Dad cried. “You mean, let them go on their own?” 

“Of course,” Mom said, hurrying back to him. “They’ll be perfectly fine. 
This looks like a very nice place. What could happen?” 

What could happen? 

With those words, Mom and Dad rushed off to find a phone. 



“Meet back here!” Mom called to us. 

Luke, Clay, and I were suddenly on our own. 

I turned to watch Mom and Dad hurry away. 

I turned back in time to see a gray wolf edging out from behind the cottage. 
It lowered its head and let out a rumbling warning growl. 

All three of us froze as we realized its hungry red eyes were locked on us. 



4 


I cried out and pulled Luke and Clay back. 

The wolf slithered out, holding its head low, glaring up at us with wide red 
eyes, its mouth open hungrily. 

“It—it’s real!” Clay declared, swallowing hard. I had my hand on his 
shoulder. I could feel him trembling. 

The wolf let out a deep growl. 

Then it slid back behind the cottage wall. 

“I think it’s some kind of robot or something,” I told Clay. 

“Let’s go somewhere else,” Clay replied, suddenly very pale. 

“What does that sign up there say?” Luke asked. He went running over the 
dark cobblestones to the sign, and Clay and I followed. 

The sign read: NO PINCHING. 

Luke laughed. “That’s stupid.” 

“What a dumb sign!” Clay agreed. 

“That sign was meant just for you, Luke!” I exclaimed. I gave him a hard 
pinch on the arm. 

“Hey! Can’t you read?” he shouted angrily, pointing to the sign. 

I saw a green Horror watching us from down the street. Then I saw a family 
making its way behind the row of cottages. There was a mother, a father, and a 
little girl. The little girl was crying for some reason. The parents had their hands 
on her shoulders and looked very upset. 

A wolf howl cut through the air. 

“Let’s find some rides!” Clay suggested. 

“Some scary rides!” Luke added. 

Walking side by side, keeping close together, we made our way out of the 
Werewolf Village. The street widened into a round plaza. Bright sunlight 
returned as soon as we stepped out of the village. 

Several purple-and-green buildings surrounded the plaza. I saw a few more 
families and several green-costumed Horrors keeping an eye on everything. A 
pudgy Horror behind a purple-and-green cart was selling ice cream cones 
—black ice cream! 

“Yuck!” Luke declared, making a face. 



We hurried past the cart, past another no pinching sign, and stopped in front 
of what appeared to be a tall purple mountain. 

“It’s a ride!” I told them. 

A doorway was cut into the side of the mountain. 

And above the doorway was a sign: DOOM SLIDE. WILL YOU BE THE 
ONE TO SLIDE FOREVER? 

“Cool!” Luke cried, slapping Clay a high five. 

“Til bet you climb to the top, then slide all the way down,” I said, pointing 
to the top of the mountain-shaped building. 

“Let’s go!” Luke cried excitedly. 

We ran to the building, then through the open doorway in its side. It was 
dark and cold inside. A wide ramp curved up toward the top. 

I could hear kids squealing and laughing, but I couldn’t see them. The three 
of us half walked, half ran up the ramp, eager to get to the top. 

About halfway up, we stopped to read another sign: WARNING! YOU 
MAY BE THE ONE TO SLIDE TO YOUR DOOM! 

Now I could hear kids screaming as they slid down. But it was too dark to 
see anything. “Are you scared, Clay?” I asked, noticing his tight expression. 

“No way!” he insisted, embarrassed by my question. “I’ve seen these things 
before. They’re like really huge sliding boards. You just sit on them and slide 
down.” 

“Hurry!” Luke shouted, running ahead of us. 

“Hey—wait up!” I called. I followed them to the top of the ramp. We found 
ourselves on a wide platform. A row of long, curving sliding boards stretched to 
the end of the platform. The sliding boards were numbered from one to ten. 

In the dim light, I saw two Horrors watching us approach. They stood in 
front of the sliding boards. Their bulging yellow eyes lit up as we hurried over to 
them. 

“Do you slide all the way down?” Luke asked one of them. 

The Horror nodded. 

“Do you go really fast?” Clay asked, lingering a few feet behind us. 

The Horror nodded again. “It’s a long way down,” he rumbled. 

“Be careful which slide you pick,” the other Horror warned. “Don’t pick the 
Doom Slide.” He gestured to the number painted in black in front of each slide. 

“Yes. Don’t pick the Doom Slide,” his partner repeated. “You’ll slide down 
forever and ever.” 



I laughed. 

He was just trying to scare us— wasn’t he? 



5 


I chose slide number three because three is my lucky number. Luke sat down on 
top of the slide next to mine, slide number two. And Clay scrambled over to the 
far end and dropped down onto slide number ten. 

I glanced back to see what the Horrors were doing. But before I could focus 
on them, I felt the bottom tilt underneath me. 

I let out a long, high-pitched shriek as I began to slide. 

I raised my arms over my head, leaned back, and screamed all the way 
down. My cries echoed in the enormous dark canyon of the Doom Slide 
building. 

It felt great. The slide curved and curved, and I swirled down in the 
darkness, faster and faster. 

In the shadowy light, I could see Luke in the slide next to mine. He was 
lying on his back, staring straight up with his mouth wide open. 

I tried to call out to him. But the slide curved away, and I curved with it. 

Down, down. 

I was sliding so fast, the darkness became a solid blur. 

The slide curved up, then around, then down again. I’m a human roller 
coaster, I thought happily. 

Down, down. Darker and darker. 

I’m sliding faster than the speed of light, I thought. 

I glanced from one side to the other, trying to see Luke and Clay. But it was 
too dark, and I was moving too fast. 

Too fast. 

And then, bump. 

A chute opened up. I hit the ground hard, landing on the seat of my jeans. 

Outside. I was back outside. 

Bump. 

Luke bounced out beside me. He hit the ground, still lying on his back, and 
made no attempt to get up. He grinned up at me. “Where am I?” 

“Back on the ground,” I told him, climbing to my feet. I brushed off the 
back of my jeans, then reached behind my head to straighten my braid. “Great 
ride, huh?” 



“Let’s go again,” Luke said, still lying there. 

“We can’t go again if you don’t get up,” I said. 

“Help me.” He reached up a hand. 

I groaned as I tugged him to a sitting position. “Get up yourself,” I said 
impatiently. 

“You were screaming in there,” he told me. 

“I did it on purpose,” I said. “I wanted to scream.” 

“Yeah. Sure.” He rolled his eyes. Then he pulled himself to his feet. “Wow. 
I’m a little dizzy. How fast do you think we were going?” 

I shrugged. “Pretty fast, I think. It’s so dark in there, it’s hard to know how 
fast you’re going.” 

And then I realized we were missing a member of our sliding party. I stared 
at the closed chutes on the wall of the building. “Hey—where’s Clay?” 

“Huh?” Luke had forgotten about him, too. 

We both stared at the side of the building, waiting for Clay to pop out. 

“Where is he?” Luke demanded shrilly. “He couldn’t be that much slower 
than us—could he?” 

I shook my head. I was starting to feel really nervous. I had a heavy feeling 
in the pit of my stomach. And my hands were suddenly cold and clammy. 

“Come on, Clay,” I pleaded, staring at the wall. “Come on out.” 

Luke scratched his black hair. “Where’d he go?” he asked. “Why didn’t 
Clay come out?” 

“Maybe he came out the front,” I said. “Maybe slide number ten dumps you 
out in front. Let’s check it out.” 

As we ran around the building toward the front, I scolded myself for getting 
scared so easily. Of course Clay came out in a different chute. He was probably 
waiting for us in front of the building. He was probably worried about us. 

As we rounded the purple building, the wide, circular plaza came into view. 
I searched for Mom and Dad, but they weren’t there. I saw a couple of other 
families on the other side of the circle, and the pudgy green Horror leaning on 
his ice cream cart. 

No sign of Clay. 

Luke and I kept running, up to the front entrance of the Doom Slide. We 
stopped a few feet from the dark opening. 

“He isn’t here!” Luke cried, struggling to catch his breath. 

I was breathing hard, too. And the heavy feeling of dread in my stomach 



grew even heavier. “No. No Clay,” I muttered. 

“What are we going to do?” Luke asked. His blue eyes were wide with fear. 

I saw a green Horror woman standing just inside the entrance. “Hey!” I 
called as I ran over to her. “Did you see a kid come out of there?” I asked 
breathlessly. 

The yellow eyes on the Horror’s mask bulged and appeared to light up. 
“No. This is the entrance. No one comes out here,” she replied. 

“He’s blond and sort of chubby. He wears glasses,” I told her. “He’s 
wearing a blue T-shirt and denim shorts.” 

The Horror shook her head. “No. No one comes out this way. Did you 
check the back? Everyone comes out the back.” 

“He didn’t!” Luke said shrilly. “We were there. He didn’t come out.” My 
brother’s voice was high and squeaky. He was breathing so hard, his chest was 
heaving up and down. He was in a panic. 

I was frightened, too. But I knew I had to stay calm. For Luke’s sake. 

“He didn’t come out the back,” I told the Horror, “and he didn’t come out 
the front. So what happened to him?” 

The Horror was silent for a long moment. Then she said in a low voice just 
above a whisper, “Maybe your friend chose the Doom Slide.” 



6 


I stared at the woman in the Horror costume. “You—you’re joking, right?” I 
stammered. “I mean, the Doom Slide—that’s just a joke.” 

She stared back with her bulging yellow eyes and didn’t reply. “The signs 
give a warning,” she said. “There’s always a warning.” 

She turned and disappeared into the dark entrance. Luke and I goggled at 
each other. I swallowed hard. My throat suddenly felt very dry. My hands were 
cold as ice now. 

“This is stupid,” Luke muttered. He jammed his hands into his jeans 
pockets. “It’s just a dumb slide. Why is she trying to scare us?” 

“I guess that’s her job,” I told him. 

“We’ve got to find Mom and Dad,” Luke muttered. 

“We’ve got to find Clay first,” I told him. “If Mom and Dad find out we lost 
Clay, they’ll get angry and make us go home as soon as we find him.” 

“If we find him,” Luke said glumly. 

I glanced back across the plaza. No Mom and Dad. Two teenagers were 
buying black ice cream cones from the Horror at the cart. Two Horrors were 
sweeping the plaza with push brooms, working side by side. 

Far in the distance, I could hear the howl of a wolf from the Werewolf 
Village. 

The sun was high in the sky now. I could feel it beaming down on top of my 
head and on my shoulders. But I still felt cold all over. 

“Clay—where are you?” I asked, thinking out loud. 

“He’s sliding forever,” Luke said, shaking his head. “Sliding forever and 
ever on the Doom Slide.” 

“That’s dumb,” I replied. But Luke had given me an idea. “Come on,” I 
said, tugging the sleeve on his T-shirt. I started pulling him to the dark entrance. 

“Huh? Where?” Luke pulled back. 

“We’ll go on the slides again,” I told him. 

His mouth dropped open in protest. “Without Clay? We can’t go on it again 
without Clay.” 

“We’re going to find Clay,” I said, grabbing his arm this time and pulling 
him to the dark open doorway. 



“You mean—?” My brother was starting to catch on. 

I nodded. “Yes. We’ll follow him. We’ll take the same slide he took.” 

“Slide number ten,” Luke murmured. And then he added in a solemn 
whisper, “The Doom Slide.” 

“We’ll take it, and it will lead us right to him,” I said. 

We climbed the ramp in silence. The rapid thud of our sneakers echoed in 
the vast hollow mountain. 

We ran past the sign about halfway up to the top. I read it again as I passed 
it by: WARNING! YOU MAY BE THE ONE TO SLIDE TO YOUR DOOM! 

Clay—are you still sliding? I wondered. 

I shook my head hard, shaking away the thought. Of course he wasn’t still 
sliding. What a stupid idea! 

The two Horrors were still standing at the top of the slides. “Be careful 
which slide you pick,” one of them warned. 

“We know which one we want,” I said breathlessly. “Slide number ten. 
Both of us. Together.” 

The Horror nearest the slide motioned for us to sit down. I glanced at Luke, 
who stood right behind me, his features tight with fear. 

He tugged me back a few steps. “Maybe we shouldn’t,” he whispered. 

“Why not?” I demanded impatiently. 

“What if the warning is true ? ” Luke demanded. 

“Don’t be dumb,” I scolded him. “This is an amusement park—remember? 
They don’t kill kids or send them sliding to their doom. It’s all for fun!” 

Luke swallowed hard. “You sure?” 

“Of course I’m sure,” I replied. “Now, do you want to find Clay or not?” 

Luke nodded. 

“Then let’s go,” I ordered. 

I sat down at the top of slide number ten. Luke plopped down right behind 
me, stretching his legs outside of mine. 

I felt the floor tilt up beneath us. 

We started to slide. 

“Clay, here we come!” I cried. 



7 


I didn’t scream this time. I clasped my hands in my lap and gritted my teeth. 

There was no way I was going to enjoy this ride. I just wanted to get to the 
end of it. I wanted to solve the mystery and find Clay. 

As we slid down together, Luke grabbed onto me, his hands gripping my 
waist. He cried out when we slid over a big bump, and it felt as if we were going 
to go flying off the slide. 

Then we both screamed as the slide took a steep dive—almost straight 
down—and we started to fall. 

We landed hard, and then the slide curved sharply to the right. We were 
both screaming our lungs out now. 

We were sliding faster and faster, in total darkness, blacker than black. I 
tried to see if we were moving alongside the other slides. But it was so dark, I 
couldn’t even see my sneakers in front of me! 

Luke squeezed my waist so hard, I could hardly breathe. I tried to tell him 
to loosen his grip, but he was screaming too loud to hear. 

Down, down. 

Darker and darker. 

We hit another bump that sent us bouncing up into the air. Then the slide 
dipped and curved sharply to the left. 

We should be at the bottom by now, I realized. 

We’d been sliding a very long time. 

I gritted my teeth harder and tried to brace myself to go flying out the chute 
and bumping onto the ground. 

But no chute opened. 

The ride didn’t end. 

We began to slide faster. I gasped in mouthfuls of the hot, damp air, 
struggling to catch my breath. 

The slide dipped and curved, sending us down into the thick, heavy 
blackness. 

We’re going to slide forever. 

The warning sign didn’t lie. 

I struggled to force those frightening thoughts from my mind. 



Luke suddenly got very quiet. “Are you okay?” I called back to him. 

“I don’t know,” he replied, holding on even tighter. “Why are we sliding so 
long?” 

“You’re hurting me!” I cried. 

He loosened his hold a little. “I don’t like this!” he shouted in my ear. 

We hit another bump. His hands flew off me. 

Another bump. Even harder. I thought I was going to fly off the slide and 
fall to the bottom—if there was a bottom. 

Down, down. 

Luke and I both cried out in disgust as something sticky covered our faces. 
I reached up with both hands and tried to pull it off. 

“Yuck!” Luke screamed. “What is it? My face—!” 

“It’s like cobwebs,” I shouted back at him. “Hot, sticky cobwebs.” 

My whole face itched. The sticky threads covered my face like a net. I 
pulled frantically at them. 

“Oh!” I cried out as the slide took another sharp dip. 

Tearing at the sticky cobwebs, I managed to pull most of them off. But my 
face still itched like crazy. It felt as if a thousand ants were crawling around on 
it. 

“It’s so gross!” Luke yelled behind me. “My face—it hurts!” 

Down, down into the heavy darkness. 

And then a flare of bright light made me shut my eyes. 

Was it daylight? Were we heading outside? 

No. 

I forced my eyes open and squinted at the yellow light. 

And realized I was staring at blazing flames. 

The slide ahead of us was on fire! 

The yellow-and-orange flames raged up, topped by a curtain of billowing 
black smoke. 

I raised my hands to my face and started to shriek. 

We were sliding right into the blazing flames. 

“We’re going to burn up!” Luke screamed. “Help—somebody! Help us!” 



8 


I shut my eyes and felt a powerful burst of heat, almost like an explosion. 

I’m burning up! I thought. 

Burning up! 

A whoosh of cool air made me open my eyes. 

The fire was behind us now. We had sailed right through it. 

Curving gently, we slid through cool darkness. I could still see the orange 
flicker of flames reflected on the dark walls above us. 

Luke and I were both silent. I was waiting for my heart to stop thudding in 
my chest. 

“Great special effects!” Luke cried. He let out a wild laugh, a frantic laugh 
I’d never heard before. 

The fire was fake, I realized. Some kind of projection or something. 

I sucked in mouthfuls of the cool air. I had never been so terrified in my 

life. 

“When does this ride end?” Luke cried. His voice had become high and 
frightened. 

Never, I thought glumly. We really are going to slide forever. 

And as that frightening thought lingered in my mind, a chute opened in 
front of us. Daylight streamed in. 

Bump. 

I landed hard on soft grass. 

A second later, Luke dropped out behind me. 

I blinked several times, waiting for my eyes to adjust to the bright sunlight. 

Then I climbed slowly to my feet, my heart still pounding. 

A yellow-and-green sign on a wooden pole stood directly in front of us. It 
read: WELCOME TO DOOM, POPULATION: 0 HUMANS. 

Standing next to the sign was Clay. He came rushing over to greet us, a 
happy smile on his round, pink face. “Hey, guys—hey!” he called. “Where’ve 
you been?” He slapped Luke a high five. Then Luke gave him a playful punch in 
the stomach. 

“Where’ve we been?” I asked. “Where’ve you been?” 



“Right here,” Clay replied. “I didn’t know where I was. I think this is the 
other side of the park or something. So I just waited for you.” 

“We went back on the Doom Slide,” Luke explained. “We took your slide. 
Number ten. What a ride! It was so cool!” 

A few seconds ago, Luke had been shrieking in real terror. Now here he 
was, pretending he loved it, telling Clay how cool it was. 

“You picked the good slide!” Luke told Clay. “Wow! It was excellent!” 

“I was kind of scared,” Clay confessed. “I mean, the fire—” 

“Great special effects!” my brother exclaimed. “This park is awesome!” 

Luke was such a phony. There was no way he would ever admit that he had 
been worried about Clay. And no way he’d admit that the long slide to Doom 
had terrified him. 

But I was glad to see his old enthusiasm return. I really didn’t like seeing 
my brother frightened and in a panic. 

“It was kind of a long slide,” Clay said, frowning. His feathery blond hair 
glowed in the bright sunlight. “A little too long, I think.” 

“I’d like to go on it again!” Luke boasted. 

I turned and gazed around. We were definitely in another section of 
HorrorLand. Nothing looked familiar. 

Across the wide walkway, I saw several kids in bathing suits heading down 
a sandy path. A sign over the path read: HORROR RAPIDS. 

To our right, a square-shaped building made of glass reflected the bright 
sunlight. The glass walls shimmered brightly as if on fire. Squinting into the 
light, I could just barely make out the sign in front of it: HOUSE OF MIRRORS. 

“Let’s try the House of Mirrors!” Luke urged, pulling Clay by the arm. 

“Whoa! Wait a minute!” I cried. “Don’t you think we should try to find 
Mom and Dad?” 

“They’re way over on the other side of the park,” Luke replied, tugging 
Clay along with him across the pavement. “Let’s have some fun and then find 
them.” 

“They’re probably looking for us,” I said fretfully. 

“The park isn’t very crowded. They’ll find us,” Luke replied. “Come on, 
Lizzy—it looks like fun!” 

I hesitated, thinking about Mom and Dad. I stared into the white glare of the 
glass building. 

Suddenly, I felt someone tap my shoulder. 



Startled, I cried out and spun around. 

It was a green-costumed Horror. His bulging eyes stared into mine as he 
leaned close to me. “Get away while you can!” he whispered. 

He turned his eyes quickly from side to side, as if making sure no one was 
watching him. “Please — I’m serious! Get away while you can!” 



9 


I was so stunned, I didn’t say anything. I watched him run off, moving 
awkwardly in the bulky Horror costume, his purple tail dragging over the 
pavement behind him. 

“What did he want?” Clay called. He and Luke were nearly up to the House 
of Mirrors entrance. 

“He—he said we should get out while we can,” I stammered, running over 
to them. I lost them for a moment in the blinding sunlight reflected off the glass 
building. 

Luke laughed. “These Horror guys are great!” he declared. “They really try 
to scare you in this place!” 

Behind his glasses, Clay’s eyes narrowed thoughtfully. “He was kidding— 
right?” he asked quietly. “I mean, it was just a joke, wasn’t it?” 

“I don’t know,” I told him. “I guess so.” I watched the Horror disappear 
quickly behind a tall, blue, pyramid-shaped building. 

“That’s his job,” Luke insisted. “He goes around scaring people all day.” 

“Maybe he was really warning us,” Clay murmured, staring at me. 

“No way!” Luke declared. He gave Clay a hard slap on the back. “Stop 
looking so gloomy all the time. This is a great place! You like to be scared, don’t 
you?” 

Clay’s expression remained worried. “I guess,” he replied uncertainly. 

I started to tell Clay I was sure it was just a joke, but Luke interrupted. 
“Hurry up! Let’s check out the House of Mirrors. Let’s have some fun before 
Mom and Dad show up and make us leave.” 

He dragged Clay toward the entrance, and I followed. We passed another no 
pinching sign as we made our way to the shimmering glass building. 

Outside the entrance, I stopped to read the yellow-and-green sign. It read: 
HOUSE OF MIRRORS. REFLECT BEFORE YOU ENTER. NO ONE MAY 
EVER SEE YOU AGAIN! 

“Hey—wait up!” I called to the boys. They had already hurried inside. 

I stepped in and found myself in a narrow, dark tunnel. My eyes were still 
filled with the bright glare from outside. I couldn’t see a thing. 

“Luke, Clay—wait up!” I shouted. My voice echoed through the low 



tunnel. I could hear them laughing up ahead. 

I jogged blindly, ducking my head because the ceiling was so low. Finally, 
my eyes adjusted to the darkness. 

The tunnel ended, and I found myself in a narrow corridor with mirrored 
walls and a mirrored ceiling. 

“Oh!” I uttered a low cry. I could see my reflections—dozens of them. I 
seemed to surround myself! 

I stopped for a moment and adjusted my long black braid. It was always 
coming loose. Then I called again to the boys, “Where are you? Wait up!” 

I could hear them giggling somewhere up ahead. “Try and find us!” Luke 
called. More giggling. 

I made my way quickly through the mirrored walkway. The walls curved to 
the right, then the left. My reflections followed me, stretching deep into the 
mirrors, dozens and dozens of me, getting smaller and smaller, stretching to 
infinity! 

“Hey—don’t get too far ahead!” I cried. 

I heard them giggling. Then I heard a rumble of footsteps that seemed to 
come from the other side of the mirrored wall. 

I followed the corridor, walking slowly, carefully, until I saw a narrow 
opening up ahead. 

“Wait right there. I’m coming through!” I called. 

I started through the opening and— BONK !—hit my forehead on solid 
glass. 

“Ow!” I cried out as the pain jolted across my forehead, then down the back 
of my neck, all the way down my spine. 

I raised my hands to the glass and waited for my dizziness to fade away. 

“Lizzy, where are you? Try to find us!” I heard Luke call. 

“I hit my head!” I shouted, rubbing my forehead. 

I could hear him and Clay laughing. Their voices seemed to be behind me 
now. I turned back, but there were only mirrors behind me. No opening. 

My head still ached a little, but the dizziness had gone away. I started 
walking again, more carefully this time. I kept both hands out in front of me so I 
wouldn’t bump into anything again. 

I turned a corner and stepped into a different room. To my surprise, the 
floor in this room was a mirror. The walls, the ceiling, the floor—were all 
mirrors. I felt as if I were standing inside a mirrored box. 



I took a few careful steps. It felt so weird walking on my own reflection. 

I could see the tops and the bottoms of my sneakers as I walked. It made it 
really hard to walk. I kept having the feeling that I was going to fall into myself! 

“Hey, guys—where are you?” I called. 

No reply. 

I felt a sharp stab of fear in my stomach. 

“Luke? Clay? Are you there?” I saw the mouths of my reflections move as I 
called out, dozens of mouths. But only one voice came out, my voice, tiny and 
shrill. 

“Luke? Clay?” 

Silence. 

“Don’t fool around, guys!” I shouted. “Where are you?” 

Silence. No reply. 

I stared at the dozens of reflections on all sides of me. They all looked very 
frightened. 

“Luke? Clay?” 

Where had they gone? 



10 


I stared at my reflections as horrifying thoughts swept over me. 

Had the hoys really disappeared? 

Had they fallen into some kind of trap? Were they lost in the maze of glass 
and mirrors ? 

HorrorLand was too scary, I decided. It was fun to be scared. But it was too 
hard to tell whether the scares here were for fun—or for real. Were there dangers 
in this place? Or was it all a big scary joke? 

“Luke? Clay?” I called to them in a trembling voice, turning all around, 
searching for an exit. 

Silence. 

Then I heard a muffled giggle. 

Then I heard whispering voices. Nearby. 

Another giggle, louder this time. Luke’s giggle. 

They had been playing a little joke on me. “Hey, you’re not funny!” I 
screamed angrily. “Really! Not funny!” 

I could hear them both burst out laughing. “Come and find us, Lizzy!” Luke 
called. 

“What’s taking you so long?” Clay added. 

More giggling. It seemed to come from just up ahead. 

Sliding my hands along the mirrors, I followed the hallway around to the 
right. I had to duck my head to slip through a narrow opening between the 
mirrors. 

I found myself in another small room surrounded by mirrors above and 
below and on all sides. The mirrors were tilted at strange angles so that my 
reflections appeared to bounce off each other as I moved. 

“Where are you? Am I getting closer?” I called. 

The light grew dim as I made my way through this room. My reflections 
darkened. The shadows grew longer. 

“We can’t see you!” Clay called. 

“Hurry up!” Luke shouted impatiently. 

“I’m going as fast as I can!” I screamed. “Just don’t move, okay? Stay in 
one place.” 



“We are! ” Luke called back. 

“How will we ever get out of here?” I heard Clay ask him in a low voice. 

“Ow!” I bumped my head again on a section of clear glass. 

I pounded my fist angrily on the glass. 

This wasn’t any fun, I decided. It was too painful. 

“Hurry up!” Luke called from somewhere nearby. “It’s boring waiting here 
for you!” 

“I’m coming,” I muttered, rubbing my poor aching forehead. 

I turned a corner and stepped into a wider room. No mirrors here. The walls 
were all glass. I stopped to gaze around—and there was Luke. 

“Finally!” he cried. “Why couldn’t you find us?” 

“I kept hitting my head,” I told him. “Let’s get out of here. Where’s Clay?” 

“Huh?” Luke’s mouth dropped open in surprise. He spun around, searching 
for his friend. “He was standing right here,” he said. 

“Luke—I’m in no mood for any more dumb jokes,” I said sharply. “Clay, 
where are you hiding?” 

“I’m not hiding. I’m over here,” Clay called. 

I took a few steps closer to my brother, and Clay came into view. He was 
standing in deep shadows behind a glass wall, his hands pressed against the 
pane. 

“How’d you get over there?” Luke asked Clay. 

Clay shrugged. “I can’t find a way out.” 

I moved toward my brother, then stopped. I suddenly realized that he was 
behind a wall of glass. Luke and I were in different rooms. 

“Hey—where’s the opening?” I asked him. 

Luke glanced around. “What do you mean, Lizzy?” 

“You and I—we’re not in the same room,” I replied. I walked up to the 
glass wall and tapped on it with my fist. 

“Huh?” Luke’s face filled with surprise. He made his way over to me. Then 
he tapped on his side of the glass, as if making sure it really did exist. 

“How’d that get there?” he murmured. 

Clay started moving around his room, sliding his hands along the panes of 
glass, searching for the opening. 

“Stand right there,” I told Luke. “I’ll find a way into your room.” 

I followed Clay’s example. I moved slowly around the room, keeping a 
hand pressed against the glass. The light was dim. My shadow fell over the glass 



as I walked. I could see my face reflected darkly in the glass. My eyes stared 
back at me, dark and desperate. 

Before I realized it, I had made a complete circle. 

I was back where I had started. And there was no opening. No doorway. 

No way out. 

“Hey! I’m trapped in here!” Clay called shrilly. 

“So am I,” I told him. 

“There’s got to be an opening,” Luke said. “How did we get in?” 

“You’re right,” I replied fretfully. “We should be able to get out the way we 
came in.” I began to search along the walls again, moving quickly. 

My heart began to pound. I had a fluttering feeling in my chest. There had 
to be a way out. There had to be. 

Luke pounded hard on the glass. In the other room, I could see Clay jogging 
frantically around his room, pushing on the walls as he moved. 

I went all the way around twice, then stopped. 

There was no way out. 

“I—I’m trapped,” I stammered. “It’s like a box. A glass box.” 

“We’re all trapped!” Clay cried. 

Luke was still pounding frantically on the glass with his fists. “Luke— 
stop!” I cried shrilly. “That isn’t helping!” 

He lowered his fists to his sides. “This is ridiculous,” he muttered. “There’s 
got to be a way out.” 

“Maybe there’s a trapdoor or something,” I suggested. I began to search the 
mirrored floor. It was too dark to see well. The floor appeared solid to me. 

I returned to the glass wall. “This isn’t much fun,” I said glumly. 

Luke and Clay nodded. I could see they were both really frightened. So was 
I. But I decided I was two years older than them, so I had to try to be the brave 
one. 

I wasn’t feeling very brave, though. Uttering a worried sigh, I leaned 
against the wall that separated Luke and me. 

And as I leaned, the wall started to move. 

I jumped back with a sharp cry. 

The wall was sliding toward me, closing in on me. 

I took another step back. 

Glancing around frantically, I saw that all the walls were sliding in. 

“Luke!” I cried. I turned to see him backing up, too. 



“The walls!” Clay called. “Help me!” 

“They’re sliding in on me, too!” Luke screamed. “Each room must have its 
own glass walls!” 

All three of us were trapped. 

With a desperate groan, I threw myself against one of the walls and tried to 
push it back. 

But I couldn’t stop it. 

The box was closing in, growing smaller. Smaller. 

“We’re going to be crushed!” I cried. 



11 


“Do something! Please—do something!” Clay was screaming. 

Luke lowered his shoulder to the glass and struggled to stop it from 
moving. But he wasn’t strong enough. The walls kept sliding in on him. 

I backed up, my hands raised like a shield. 

Closer, closer. The glass walls moved slowly, silently. 

I backed up until my back hit the wall behind me. 

There was nowhere to go. 

“Do something! Somebody —do something!” Clay’s terrified screams rang 
in my ears. 

“The glass—it’s squeezing me!” Luke shrieked. “Lizzy!” 

“I—I can’t move!” I shouted to him. 

The panes of glass began to press in on me from all sides. Above and 
below, too. 

I suddenly pictured one of those crushed cars. 

You know. The ears that are crunched into a perfect square in those big 
compactor machines. 

My entire body shuddered as I realized I was going to be crushed into a 
perfect square, too. 

“Ow!” I cried out as the glass pressed down on me. “Somebody—help!” I 
tried to scream, but my voice came out a muffled yelp. 

It was getting hard to breathe. 

The glass panes moved in. Tighter. Tighter. 

I gasped for air. 

I tried to push with all my might against the glass. 

But it was no use. 

I was being crushed into a human square. 



12 


I couldn’t hear Luke or Clay anymore. 

I could only hear my gasping, choked breath. 

I shut my eyes. 

And felt the floor drop away. 

And before I realized what was happening, I was falling, falling rapidly 
down. 

I opened my eyes in time to see the glass walls roll above me as I slid 
down, down, down through an open chute. 

And in a few seconds, I was back outside. I landed sitting up on the grass 
with a gentle thud. 

Luke and Clay came sliding out beside me. 

For a long moment, we sat on the grass, blinking in the bright sunlight, 
staring at each other in disbelief. 

“We’re okay,” Clay said uncertainly, finally breaking the silence. He slowly 
climbed to his feet. His round face was bright red, and his glasses were crooked 
and nearly falling off his nose. “We’re okay!” 

Luke let out a laugh. A gleeful laugh. He stood up and began jumping up 
and down for joy. 

I didn’t exactly feel like jumping up and down. I was still picturing the 
crushed car. 

Luke reached down, grabbed both of my hands, and pulled me to my feet. 
“What should we do next?” he demanded, grinning. 

“Huh? Next?” I cried. “Are you for real?” 

“That was really scary,” Clay said, his face still red. “I thought we were 
going to be scrunched flat.” 

“It was awesome!” Luke declared. 

Once again, he was forgetting that a few seconds before, he’d been 
screaming in total panic. 

“It was way too scary,” Clay murmured, shaking his head. 

“Clay’s right,” I agreed. “It was too scary to be fun. One more second, 
and...” 

“Don’t you see? That’s the whole idea!” Luke cried. “That’s how they scare 



you here. It’s so awesome! They make you think that one more second and 
you’re a goner. But it’s all perfectly timed. They want you to be terrified—and 
then— poof —you’re okay!” 

“I guess you’re right,” said Clay doubtfully. He pushed up his glasses, then 
mbbed his chin. 

“We’re not really going to get hurt or anything,” Luke continued. “This is 
an amusement park, remember? They want you to come back again and again. 
So they’re not going to really hurt anybody.” 

“Maybe,” Clay said. 

“But, Luke, what if they mess up?” I asked him. “What if the machines get 
goofed up? What if the timing gets off? Let’s say the floor underneath us got 
stuck. Then what?” 

Luke didn’t reply. He stared back at me thoughtfully. 

“What would have happened to us if the floor hadn’t dropped away at the 
right moment?” I demanded. 

Luke shrugged. “They make sure everything works okay,” he answered 
finally. 

I rolled my eyes. “Yeah. Sure.” 

“Is it possible to really be scared to death?” Clay asked me, a solemn 
expression on his face. “I mean, I know it happens in books and movies. But 
does it happen in real life?” 

“I don’t know. Maybe,” I replied. 

“I’ll bet people could get scared to death in that House of Mirrors,” Clay 
continued seriously. 

“No way!” Luke insisted. “Listen to me. This is just a place for fun. Scary 

fun.” 

He was watching something over my shoulder. I turned to see one of the 
guys in a green Horror costume walking by, carrying a huge bouquet of black 
balloons. 

Luke hurried up beside the Horror. “Hey, has anyone ever died here in this 
park?” Luke asked. 

The Horror kept walking. The black balloons bobbed above his head. “Only 
once,” he told Luke. 

“One person died here?” Luke asked. 

The Horror shook his big green head. “No. Not what I meant.” 

“What did you mean?” Luke demanded. 



“A person can only die once here,” the Horror said. “No one has ever died 
twice.” 



13 


“Do you mean people have really died here?” I shouted. 

But the Horror walked quickly on, the black balloons bouncing against each 
other, floating darkly against the clear blue sky. 

The Horror’s answer made me shiver. It wasn’t just his words. It was the 
cold tone of his voice, the way he made it sound like a warning. 

“He was joking—right?” Clay asked in a trembling voice. He scratched his 
blond hair nervously. 

“Yeah. I guess,” I replied. 

A family walked past us, heading toward the House of Mirrors. They had 
two little boys with them, both about five or six, and both of them were crying. 

“I’ve seen so many crying kids in this park!” I commented. 

“They’re just wimps,” Luke replied. “Scaredy-cats. Let’s go find another 
ride or something.” 

“No, I really think we should find Mom and Dad,” I told him. 

“Yeah. Let’s go find them,” Clay said eagerly. The poor kid. I think he was 
really scared. But he was trying his best not to let my brother see how frightened 
he was. 

“Aw, what’s the hurry?” Luke protested. “Let them find us. ” 

“But they’re probably really worried,” I insisted. I started walking toward 
the front gate. 

“Dad will only make us leave,” Luke grumbled. But he followed anyway. 
And Clay gratefully came along, keeping close to my side. 

Following the trail, we passed by a rickety old wooden roller coaster. It rose 
up as high as a four-story building, casting a wide, dark shadow over the walk. A 
sign in front read: OUT OF ORDER, DO YOU DARE TO RIDE IT ANYWAY? 

The gate was open. There was no attendant. 

“Hey, Lizzy, want to ride it?” Luke asked, staring at the beat-up old cars 
parked at the bottom of the tracks. 

“No way!” Clay and I replied in unison. We kept on walking. 

The trail curved under thick trees, and we were suddenly in the shade. A 
sign read: BEWARE OF TREE SNAKES. 

Clay covered his head with his hands. All three of us raised our eyes to the 



trees. 

Were there really snakes up there? 

It was too dark to see anything. The leaves were so thick, no sunlight 
filtered through. 

Suddenly, I heard a gentle hissing sound. 

At first I thought it was just the rustle of the leaves. 

But then the hissing grew louder—until all of the trees seemed to be hissing 
down at us. 

“Run!” I cried. 

The three of us started running along the trail, ducking low, our sneakers 
thudding hard on the pavement. The hissing in the trees above us grew louder, 
angrier. 

I thought I saw a long, dark snake slithering in the grass beside the trail. But 
it might have just been a shadow. 

We kept running even after the trees ended and we were in sunlight again. 
The trail curved past a row of evil-looking statues. They were made of stone. 
They were statues of grinning monsters, eyes narrowed menacingly, fangs 
lowered from their twisted mouths. Their arms were outstretched, ready to grab 
anyone who came close. 

I slowed to a trot, my eyes on the ugly statues. Suddenly, I heard low, evil 
laughter. 

“It—it’s coming from the statues!” Clay exclaimed. “Keep running!” 

Did the statues move toward us? Did they raise their arms higher? Did they 
beckon to us to come closer? 

I’m not sure. With their evil laughter in my ears, I lowered my head and 
turned on the speed. 

All three of us were panting hard as we ran along the trail. I didn’t see any 
other people. I didn’t see anyone in a Horror costume, either. 

We slowed as we came to another sign. This one had an arrow pointing in 
the direction we were running. It read: FRONT EXIT, DON’T BOTHER, YOU 
WILL NEVER ESCAPE. 

I caught the worried expression on Clay’s face as he read the sign. “It’s only 
a joke,” I told him. “The signs are supposed to be funny.” 

“Ha-ha,” he said weakly. He was panting hard, struggling to catch his 
breath. 

Without warning, Luke jumped on Clay’s shoulders. “Hey, Clay—how 



about a ride?” 

Clay cried out angrily, “Get off!” 

Luke laughed and hung on. Clay dropped to his knees, trying to throw Luke 
off. 

“Come on, guys,” I pleaded. “Luke, stop being such a goof. We’re trying to 
find Mom and Dad.” 

But now they were laughing and wrestling on the ground. 

“Come on, guys!” I shouted, rolling my eyes. “Let’s go!” I tugged my 
brother to his feet. 

Clay’s glasses had flown off. He stopped to pick them up from the grass. 
Then we continued on our way. 

The path led past a rectangular flower garden—filled with black flowers! 
Then it suddenly came to a stop in front of a large red barn. 

The boys walked up to the open doorway of the barn. I stayed back, 
searching for a path that led around the barn. I couldn’t see one. 

“The path goes right through the barn to the other side,” Luke called to me. 
“Come on, Lizzy!” He motioned for me to join them. 

I spotted a small sign painted to the right of the barn’s double doors. It read: 
BAT BARN. 

“Hey—are there bats in there?” I called, feeling a cold shudder run down 
my back. I like most animals. But bats really give me the creeps. 

Luke stepped inside the barn. Clay hung back, standing just outside the 
door. “I don’t see any,” Luke called out to me. “It’s kind of dark.” 

A strange odor invaded my nostrils. It was strong and sour. It came from the 

barn. 

I didn’t want to go in there. 

“Come on, Lizzy!” Luke called. “The path goes right out the other side. 
Don’t be chicken. You can run straight through.” 

I stepped up beside Clay at the doorway and peered inside the barn. 

“It looks okay,” Clay said quietly. 

The sour odor was much stronger. “Yuck,” I said, making a face. “It really 
stinks.” 

Luke stood inside the barn, his eyes raised to the rafters. “I don’t see 
anything up there,” he reported. 

Doors on the opposite wall were wide open. It would only take ten seconds 
to run through the barn and out the other side, I realized. 



“Let’s go,” I told Clay. 

He and I stepped into the barn. The sour smell was overpowering. I held my 
breath and pinched my fingers over my nose. 

We started running to the doors on the opposite wall—and they slammed 

shut. 

With a gasp of surprise, I turned back to the doors we had entered. They 
slammed shut, too. 

“Hey!” I shouted angrily. 

“What’s going on?” Clay cried in a whisper. 

We were in total darkness, blacker than black. 

The sour odor swept over me. I started to feel sick. 

And then I heard the rapid flutter of wings. Soft at first, then louder, closer. 

I screamed as I felt something brush against the back of my neck. 



14 


“Go away!” I let out a low moan of horror and swung my hands wildly above 
my head. 

The rapid fluttering retreated, then returned. 

“Bats!” Clay cried in a terrified, tiny voice. I felt him grab my arm. 

“I can’t see!” Luke shouted. “It’s so dark!” 

“I—I hate bats! ” I stammered. 

I felt a cold whoosh of air as a bat flapped over my head. 

I swung my hands wildly. 

The flapping, fluttering sounds were all around us. 

As my eyes slowly adjusted to the darkness, I began to see shadowy shapes 
shooting past. Back and forth. Faster and faster. 

I felt one brush my shoulder. 

“Oh, help!” I cried. 

Clay started to shriek. “Help us! Help us!” 

“They’re zooming right at me!” Luke wailed. 

Something bumped into my shoulder. I screamed. 

“Help us! Help us!” Clay continued to plead at the top of his lungs. His 
shouts were nearly drowned out by the flapping of wings. 

I felt another bat brush against my shoulder. Covering my face, I tried to 
make my way blindly to the door. 

The sour odor choked me. My terror made my legs shaky. I could barely 
walk. 

And then I felt a hard tug in my hair. 

Another tug. Loud flapping right on my head. 

A shrill whistling hiss. So close, it could have been coming from me. 

I screamed. I screamed again. 

“It—it’s caught in my hair!” I cried, falling to my knees. 

Another shrill hiss. Another tug of my hair. 

I swung my hands. I hit it. I felt a warm body, felt the brush of fluttering 
wings. 

I shoved it hard—shoved it from my hair. 



“Ohhh, help!” I cried. 

The flapping wings and shrill whistles surrounded me. I could hear Luke 
and Clay shouting. But they seemed far, far away. 

Another one brushed my cheek. Another one bumped my shoulder. 

The shadows darted back and forth. The barn was alive with flying, 
chittering bats. 

“Ohh, help! Help us, please!” Another one brushed my face. I felt a rush of 
air, beating wings on the top of my head. “Help us! Help us!” But there was no 
one around to help. 



15 


I covered my eyes with one hand and thrashed out wildly with the other hand, 
trying to beat the bats away. 

Choking and sobbing, I could barely breathe. 

I heard Luke calling far, far away. He seemed to be behind a curtain of 
flapping, chittering bats. 

And then, suddenly, sunlight invaded the barn. 

On my knees, I lowered my hand from my eyes and saw that the barn door 
had slid open. 

Luke, standing at the door, his mouth open in shock, turned back to Clay 
and me. “I—I touched the door, and it opened,” he explained. 

Clay’s glasses were hanging off one ear. His blond hair was totally messed 
up. His eyes darted around the barn. “Where are the bats?” he cried. 

I raised my eyes to the rafters. “Hey!” I cried out. No bats. No sign of any 
bats anywhere. 

I climbed to my feet, pulling my hair back with both hands. “Let’s get out 
of here!” I cried. 

Clay and I followed Luke out of the barn. The warm sunshine felt so good! 

I was still itchy from the bats. I rubbed my shoulders and the back of my 
neck. “I hate bats! I really do!” I exclaimed with a shudder. 

“But there weren’t any bats,” Luke said, grinning at me. “It was all a fake.” 

“Huh? It was not!” Clay cried angrily. “Those were bats. I could hear them 
—and feel them!” 

“All special effects,” Luke claimed. 

“It wasn’t special effects when one got tangled in my hair!” I cried. Just 
thinking about it gave me cold shivers. 

“Special effects,” Luke repeated. “Really excellent special effects. I was 
almost scared, too.” 

“Almost!” I cried. I walked over, grabbed him, and pretended to wring his 
neck. “Almost? I heard you screaming your head off, Luke! ” 

He pulled out of my grasp, laughing. “I knew it wasn’t real. I was just 
screaming like that to scare you!” 

What a liar! I really didn’t believe my brother. He was scared. He was 



plenty scared. I knew he was! 

“They were bats, not special effects,” I insisted angrily. 

“Then where did they go when the door opened?” Luke demanded. “As 
soon as the door opened, the bats all vanished.” 

“Let’s stop talking about it,” Clay pleaded. “Let’s find your parents— 
okay?” 

“Yeah, okay,” I agreed, glaring at Luke. “You really are nuts, you know 
that?” I told him. 

He stuck his tongue out at me. 

I wanted to punch his lights out. But I try to be a nonviolent person. So I 
just gave him one hard punch on the shoulder. 

He howled in protest. “You’re stupid, Lizzy. You’re really stupid,” he 
muttered. “And you’re afraid of pretend bats!” 

I ignored him and led the way down the path toward the front gate. Two 
people in Horror costumes appeared on the path, going the other way, chatting 
enthusiastically. 

“Is this the way to the front gate?” I called to them. 

They ignored my question and walked right past us. 

“Hey!” I called to them. 

But they both kept jabbering away and didn’t even seem to see or hear me. 

The sun beamed down on us. The air had become hot and still, with no 
breeze at all. 

I wiped sweat off my forehead with one hand. I could still smell the sour 
aroma of the Bat Barn. The odor was on my hands, on my clothes. 

I saw four teenagers in bathing suits, two boys and two girls, hurrying over 
the grass toward a large brown pond. A sign came into view near the shore. It 
read: ALLIGATOR POND, FEEL FREE TO SWIM HERE. 

Luke laughed. “Are those guys crazy?” 

We stopped to watch them step into the water. 

“Do you think there are really alligators in there?” Clay asked, biting his 
lower lip. 

I shrugged. “Who knows? I don’t know what to think about this park!” 

We continued along the path. A few minutes later, I recognized the 
mountain-shaped structure of the Doom Slide. The wide, circular plaza came 
into view. It was nearly deserted. Even the ice-cream-selling Horror had 
vanished from his cart. 



“Where do you suppose Mom and Dad are?” I asked. 

“They’ve probably been looking for us for hours, and now they’re really 
mad,” Luke said, frowning. 

“Where are they?” Clay cried. He was starting to sound really stressed out. 
“We’ve got to find them.” 

“Is that them?” Luke asked. He was pointing to a man and a woman in the 
shade of a large stone fountain. 

I shielded my eyes from the sun with one hand. The woman was tall, with 
dark hair. The man was short and blond. 

“Yes! That’s them!” I cried happily. I started running to the fountain, calling 
to them, “Mom! Dad!” 

The boys came racing after me. 

“Mom! Dad! Hey!” I shouted happily. 

They both turned around, surprised expressions on their faces. 

“Oh!” I cried out when I saw it wasn’t them. I stopped short, and Luke 
bumped right into me. 

“Sorry,” I told the confused couple. “We thought you were someone else.” 

The three of us hurried across the plaza. I could hear the wail of wolf howls 
from the Werewolf Village. The ice cream cart stood lonely and deserted near the 
entrance to the Doom Slide. 

“Where are they?” Clay asked, whining. “I’m starting to get hungry.” 

“Yeah. It’s way past lunchtime,” I agreed. 

“They could be anywhere,” Luke said unhappily, kicking a pebble across 
the pavement. “They could be anywhere in this giant park.” 

I sighed. “Let’s look for them in the shade. The sun is really getting hot.” 

We headed toward the shade of the Doom Slide building. Suddenly, two 
green-costumed Horrors came into view. Their big yellow eyes bulged in front of 
their heads. 

Without thinking, I went running up to them. “Have you seen our parents?” 
I asked breathlessly. 

They stared at me in surprise. “Your parents?” one of them repeated. 

“Yeah.” I nodded. “My mom has black hair. My dad is kind of short and he 
has blond hair.” 

“Hmmmm.” The two Horrors glanced at each other. 

“Mom was wearing a bright yellow sundress,” I told them. 

“And Dad had a Chicago Cubs cap on his head,” Luke added. 



“Oh, yeah. Right,” one of the Horrors, a woman, replied. 

“You saw them?” I asked eagerly. 

She nodded. “Yeah. I remember them. They left. They left about half 
hour ago.” 

“Huh?” I gaped at her in disbelief. 

“They asked me to give you a message,” the Horror said. 

“Message? What message?” I asked. 

“Good-bye,” the Horror replied. 



16 


“You’re wrong!” I cried. “They wouldn’t leave.” 

“About half an hour ago,” the Horror repeated. She shrugged her shoulders 
under the bulky monster costume. “I was at the gate when they left.” 

“But—but—” I sputtered. 

The two Horrors turned and began walking toward a small white shed at the 
edge of the plaza. 

“Hey, wait!” I called, chasing after them. “You made a mistake. Our parents 
wouldn’t leave without us.” 

They disappeared into the shed. The door slammed behind them. 

I turned back to Luke and Clay. They stared at me blankly. 

“She was wrong,” I told them. “Mom and Dad are still here. I know it.” 

“Then why did she say—” Clay started, but his voice broke. I could see that 
he was very worried and upset. Beads of sweat ran down his pink forehead. 

Luke tried to make a joke. “I guess that means we have the whole park to 
ourselves!” he exclaimed, forcing a smile. 

“Very funny,” I replied sarcastically. “We also have no money, and we’re 
about three hundred miles from home.” 

“We could call somebody,” Luke suggested. 

“No phones,” Clay muttered. He lowered his head, shoved his hands into 
the pockets of his shorts, and turned away from us. 

“Oh, right,” Luke remembered. “They told Dad there are no phones in the 
park.” 

“That’s crazy,” I said heatedly. “They’re liars. The Horrors are all liars.” 

“I guess that’s their job,” Luke said. “Telling us lies to scare us to death. 
That’s why they call it HorrorLand.” 

“They should call it DumbLand,” Clay muttered bitterly. 

“But it’s so cool!” Luke protested. “I love being scared out of my wits. 
Don’t you?” He gave Clay a hard shove. 

“No,” Clay replied softly. He made no attempt to shove Luke back. 

“Well, she was lying about Mom and Dad,” I insisted, gazing at the white 
shed. “She was just trying to scare us. Mom and Dad are still here. We just have 
to find them.” 



“Come on, let’s go,” Luke urged. “I hope we find them soon. I’m getting 
really hungry.” 

We wandered through the park for what seemed like hours. We searched through 
dark, mysterious woods and strange monster villages. We passed through a 
carnival area with dozens of scary-looking rides. 

On the other side of Vampire Village, we passed a building marked Monster 
Zoo. It was closed. But we could hear the most terrifying grunts, howls, and 
moans coming from inside. 

A long yellow building had a sign outside that proclaimed: GUILLOTINE 
MUSEUM, PLEASE HOLD ON TO YOUR HEAD. Luke wanted to go inside, 
but Clay and I talked him out of it. 

HorrorLand was surprisingly empty. We passed several Horrors scurrying 
along the paths in their bright green costumes. And we saw a few families 
wandering around, always with crying kids. 

The rides in the carnival area were all running empty. All of the food stands 
and restaurants were empty, too. 

We walked clear across to the other end of the park. I was feeling more and 
more worried. 

Why hadn’t we run into Mom and Dad? 

Surely we should have seen them by now. 

Clay had become very quiet. I could tell he was really scared. Even Luke 
trudged along with his shoulders slumped and his head down. 

By the time we found ourselves back at the Alligator Pond, I was feeling 
pretty bad. I crossed the grassy shore and walked up to the edge of the brown 
water. 

“What do you think happened to those teenagers who went swimming 
here?” Luke asked, staring across the pond. “Think the alligators ate them?” 

“Maybe,” I replied. I wasn’t really listening to him. I was thinking about 
Mom and Dad. 

“Hey, look!” Clay cried, pointing to the water. 

I saw two long, greenish-brown logs floating toward us on top of the water. 
It took me a while to realize that the logs were alligators. 

“Big ones!” Clay declared in a hushed whisper. 

“Better step back,” I warned them. 

All three of us were standing at the water’s edge. The alligators floated 



silently just below the surface of the still water, hardly creating a ripple. 

“Mom and Dad didn’t leave without us,” I repeated for the thousandth time. 

“But we searched everywhere,” Luke said quietly. 

“They didn’t leave without us,” I said. “They would never leave without us. 
So...” I hesitated. I was thinking hard, and my thoughts were all frightening. 

“So?” Clay asked eagerly. 

“So if they’re not in the park,” I continued, “it means something happened 
to them. Something bad happened to them.” 

Clay gasped. Luke narrowed his blue eyes at me. “What do you mean, 
Lizzy?” he asked. 

“I mean maybe this place really is evil,” I said. “And maybe the Horrors or 
somebody did something bad to Mom and Dad.” 

I stared down at the brown alligator backs gliding so smoothly, so 
effortlessly toward us. 

“That’s crazy,” Luke muttered. 

I knew it was crazy. But I had no other explanation. 

“I have such a bad feeling about this park,” I told them. “A real bad 
feeling.” 

And as I said that, I felt strong hands grab me from behind and push me 
into the Alligator Pond. 



17 


I screamed. 

Then I realized I wasn’t being tossed into the water. 

The hands were holding on to my shoulders. 

I spun around. “Dad!” I cried. 

“Lizzy!” he exclaimed, still holding on to me. “Where have you guys 
been?” 

“We’ve searched this entire park twelve times!” Mom declared. She was 
standing behind us on the grass, hands pressed tensely on her waist. 

“We were looking for you!” I cried. 

“They told us you left!” Luke said. 

“We were kind of scared,” Clay added. 

We all started talking at once. I was so happy to see them. And I could see 
that Luke and Clay were really happy, too. 

I had imagined all sorts of terrible things happening to Mom and Dad. It 
wasn’t like me to let my imagination run away like that. 

But HorrorLand was such a scary place. It was impossible not to have scary 
thoughts here. 

“I want to go home,” I said. 

“Did you find a phone?” Clay asked. “Did you find a car?” 

Dad shook his head. “No. No phones. The guy in the monster costume 
didn’t lie. There are no phones in the park.” 

“But the Horrors were very nice to us,” Mom broke in. “They told us not to 
worry about a thing.” 

“They said to just come to the ticket booth when we were ready to leave,” 
Dad reported. 

Mom ran a hand tenderly through Luke’s hair. “Did you go on any rides or 
anything?” 

“We did a lot of scary stuff,” Luke told her. 

“Very scary,” Clay added. 

“I’m really hungry,” Luke said. 

Dad glanced at his watch. “It’s way past lunchtime. I think we’re all 



hungry.” 

“The restaurants and foodstands are all on the other side of the park,” Mom 

said. 

“Can we just eat lunch and then leave?” I asked eagerly. I still had a bad 
feeling about the place. I wanted to get away from HorrorLand, far away. 

“Your mom and I have spent all our time searching for you,” Dad said, 
wiping sweat off his sunburned forehead with one hand. “We haven’t had any 
fun at all.” 

“We should all at least go on one ride together before we leave,” Mom said. 

“I just want to go,” I urged. “I really do.” 

“Lizzy, that’s not like you,” Mom scolded. 

“She’s scared,” Luke told them. “She’s a chicken.” 

“Maybe there’s a ride that will take us to the front of the park,” Dad 
suggested. “We could all take it, then have some lunch and leave.” 

“That sounds good,” Mom said. She stared at me. “Okay with you?” 

“I guess,” I told her, sighing. “It’s just that the rides here are all too scary. 
They aren’t any fun.” 

Luke laughed. “They’re too scary for Lizzy—but not for Clay and me,” he 
said. “Right, Clay?” 

“I was a little scared in the Bat Barn,” Clay confessed. 

We headed away from the Alligator Pond, across the grassy shore to the 
paved walkway. A couple of costumed Horrors walked past, chattering in low 
voices. 

A girl’s high-pitched shrieks of terror floated in the air from somewhere in 
the distance. The same frightening cry repeated over and over. 

Wolf howls rose up in front of us. And from a speaker hidden somewhere in 
the trees, I heard evil laughter, a hideous cackle that repeated over and over. 

“It’s like being in a horror movie,” Mom commented. 

“Very clever,” Dad added, walking with a hand on my shoulder. “It’s 
strange that we never heard of this park.” 

“They should put some ads on TV,” Mom said. “Then they’d get more 
people to come here.” 

We passed by a tall, narrow green building with a sign in front that read: 
FREE FALL, THE ONLY BUNGEE JUMP WITHOUT A CORD. 

“Want to try that?” Dad asked, squeezing my shoulder and grinning at me. 

“I don’t think so,” I quickly replied. 



Luke was way ahead of us. He turned around and walked backward, 
waiting for us to catch up. “Mom and Dad should try the Doom Slide,” he said, 
grinning. “It’s awesome!” 

Had he really forgotten how terrified he was? 

“I don’t think they’d like it,” I said quietly. 

“Maybe we could find something that’s just a little scary,” Clay suggested. 

Dad laughed. “Are you having a good time, Clay?” 

Clay hesitated. “A little,” he replied finally. 

“I’m having a great time!” Luke declared. 

The path curved along a narrow brown river. Millions of tiny white insects 
flitted over the surface of the water. Catching the bright sunlight, they looked 
like little sparkling diamonds. 

A small brown boathouse came into view. Behind it, I could see slender 
canoes bobbing beneath a wooden dock. 

A sign beside the boathouse read: COFFIN CRUISE. 

A RELAXING FLOAT TO THE GRAVE. 

“This might be fun,” Mom said, her eyes on the small boats. 

“I think the river flows toward the front of the park,” Dad said. “Let’s take 
it!” 

Luke cheered and went running to the dock. 

I lingered behind the others. When I finally stepped out onto the dock, it 
took me a while to realize that the objects bobbing in the brown water weren’t 
canoes—they were coffins! 

They were made of black polished wood. The lids were pulled back, 
revealing red satin interiors. Each coffin was big enough for one person. 

I felt a cold chill run down my back. “We’re really going to climb into 
coffins?” I asked. 

“They look comfy,” Mom said, smiling at me. “The water is flat and gentle, 
Lizzy. It won’t be a scary ride.” 

“Me first!” Luke cried, running to the end of the wooden dock. 

Two costumed Horrors appeared to help us into the coffins. “Lie back. 
Enjoy the ride,” one of them said. 

“It will be your last,” the other Horror added with a low chuckle. 

When we were all inside coffins, the Horrors untied them and gave us a 
hard push away from the dock. 

Here I am, I thought, lying in my coffin. 



Here we all are, my entire family, on our backs in our coffins. 

The coffin floated gently, bobbing in the water. I stared up at the bright blue 
sky. Trees shimmered on both banks as I floated past. 

It was so pretty, so relaxing. 

Why did I think something terrible was about to happen? 



18 


Lying on my back, I couldn’t see the others over the coffin sides. But I could 
hear the splash of their coffins around mine. 

“This is nice,” Mom said. “Very relaxing.” 

“It’s boring!” Luke declared from up ahead of me. “Where’s the scary 
part?” 

“It’s just a nice ride in a coffin,” Dad said. “Do you think we’re really 
floating? Or do you think the coffin is on some kind of track?” 

“I could float like this for hours,” Mom said. 

“The rides here are pretty long,” Clay told her. 

“Is that a hawk up in the sky?” Dad asked. “Can everyone see it?” 

Shielding my eyes from the sun with one hand, I searched the sky. Directly 
above, a dark shadow hovered high in the sky, a little bigger than a dot. 

“It’s not a hawk. I’ll bet it’s a vulture!” Luke declared. “It sees the coffins, 
and it’s waiting to eat our flesh!” He laughed. 

“Luke—where do you get these hideous ideas?” Mom demanded. 

“Maybe Luke should live in HorrorLand!” Dad exclaimed. “We could get 
him one of those green monster costumes, and he’d fit right in perfectly!” 

“He doesn’t need a costume!” I joked. I was starting to feel a little better. 
The ride was gentle and relaxing. And I figured nothing terrible could happen 
with my whole family around. 

I settled back on the coffin bottom, my hands resting at my sides, and stared 
up dreamily at the bird circling high in the clear sky. The coffin bobbed gently, 
making soft splashing sounds. 

So pleasant... 

So quiet... 

And then, before I could utter a sound, the coffin lid slammed shut over me. 
And I was trapped in total darkness. 



19 


“Hey!” I shouted. My voice was muffled by the heavy lid over me. 

I could hear the dull thud of the other coffin lids slamming shut. 

“Hey—let me out!” 

I pushed against the lid with both hands. But it wouldn’t budge. 

I took a deep breath and tried again. This time, I pushed with my hands and 
my feet. The heavy lid still didn’t move. 

My heart was pounding so hard, I thought my chest would explode. The air 
inside the closed coffin was already getting hot and stuffy. 

“Open up! Open up!” I screamed. 

I tried pushing the lid again. I could hear Clay’s muffled cries in the coffin 
next to mine. The poor guy was screaming his head off. 

I let out a loud groan as I pushed up with all my strength. The lid wouldn’t 
give an inch. 

Calm down, Lizzy. Calm down, I instructed myself. It’s just a stupid ride. 
The coffin lid will open any second. 

Breathing hard, I waited. 

I counted to ten. 

I counted to ten again. 

The lid didn’t snap open. 

I tried shutting my eyes and counting to fifty. When I reach fifty, I told 
myself, I’ll open my eyes, and the lid will be open. 

“...twenty-two, twenty-three, twenty-four...” I counted out loud. My voice 
sounded tiny and choked. It was getting hard to breathe. The air began to feel 
really stale. 

I stopped counting at twenty-five and opened my eyes. The lid hadn’t 
popped open. 

It’s so hot in here, I thought. The sun is beating down on the lid. There’s no 
air, and I’m going to fry! 

I tried to scream, but no sound came out. 

I gasped for air. 

Outside, I could hear muffled shouts and cries. 



Was that my mother screaming like that? 

“It’s just a ride,” I said out loud. “Just a stupid ride. The lid is going to pop 
— now! ” 

But it didn’t. 

The air was so hot, so hot and stale. 

Why didn’t the lid open? 

Why? 

I tried to force back my panic, but I couldn’t. My entire body was shaking 
and shivering. I felt cold perspiration drip down my forehead. 

“Something has gone wrong!” I cried out loud. “The lid is supposed to open 
—but it doesn’t!” 

Frantically, I pushed up with both hands. My arms ached from pushing so 
hard. But the lid didn’t move. 

The coffin bobbed and rocked in the water. 

I lowered my hands in defeat. I sucked in a mouthful of the hot, stale air. 
My chest was heaving. My body trembled. 

And then I felt my legs start to itch. A tingly feeling down near my ankles. 

Moving up my legs. 

An itchy, crawly feeling. 

Something was crawling slowly up my legs. 

Something small and prickly. 

“Ohh.” I let out a low, terrified groan. 

Spiders! 



20 


I tried to scratch my legs, but my arms weren’t long enough. Unable to move or 
bend in the cramped coffin, I couldn’t reach down to them. 

The tingling moved higher. 

I wanted to scream, but I started to cough. 

And then the coffin lid popped open. Bright sunlight made me shut my 

eyes. 

“Oh!” I pulled myself up to a sitting position. Blinking against the light, I 
saw the others already scrambling up out of their coffins. 

I scratched my legs furiously. To my surprise, there were no spiders. No 
bugs of any kind. 

The coffin had pulled up to a small dock. I braced both hands against the 
sides of the coffin and heaved myself to my feet. 

“Let’s get out of here!” I heard Clay cry. 

“That was horrible /” my mom shrieked. 

Luke didn’t say anything. His face was pale, and his black hair was matted 
to his forehead with sweat. 

“They really went too far!” Dad said angrily. “I’m going to complain.” 

“Let’s just go!” Mom told him. 

We all scrambled onto the dock. I helped pull Clay up. Then I took several 
deep breaths of fresh air. 

Dad ran off the dock toward the open plaza, and the rest of us hurried after 
him. “To the ticket booth!” he called back to us. “Right up there!” He pointed. 

The coffin ride had taken us to the front of the park. I could see the front 
gate and the row of green ticket booths to the right. 

“That ride was really gross!” Clay said, shaking his head. 

“My legs got all itchy. I thought it was ants!” Luke declared. 

“I thought it was spiders!” I told him. 

“I wonder how they did that,” Luke said thoughtfully. 

“I don’t care,” I replied. “I just want to get out of here. I hate this place!” 

“So do I,” Clay agreed. 

“They just go too far,” Mom said breathlessly, jogging to keep up with us as 



we followed Dad. “It isn’t any fun when a ride is that scary. I really had trouble 
breathing.” 

“So did I,” I told her. 

“Hey, how do we get home?” Luke suddenly demanded, staring at Mom. 
“Our car blew up.” 

“I think those people in the monster costumes will lend us a car,” Mom 
replied. “They told your father just to come to the ticket booth.” 

“Can we stop and get pizza?” Luke asked. 

“Let’s get out of this place and then worry about lunch,” Mom told him. 

The main plaza was totally empty. Not another living person. 

We followed Dad to the first ticket booth. He turned back to us, making a 
disappointed face. “Closed,” he said. A metal grate had been pulled over the 
window. 

Dad was breathing hard from running all the way. He pushed his blond hair 
off his sweaty forehead with both hands. “Over here,” he said. 

We followed him to the next ticket booth. Also closed. 

Then the next. Closed. 

It didn’t take us long to discover that all of the ticket booths were closed. 

“Weird,” Luke said, shaking his head. 

“Don’t they expect any more visitors today?” Mom asked Dad. “How can 
they just close up like that?” 

Dad shrugged. “We’ll have to ask someone.” His eyes searched the empty 
grounds. 

I turned and checked out the plaza along with him. Still no one in sight. No 
visitors. No Horrors. 

“Let’s try over there,” Dad said. He started walking to a low green building 
that stood beyond the ticket booths. It looked like some kind of office. 

It was closed, too. Dad tried the door. It was locked. 

Dad scratched his head. “What’s going on here? Where’d everyone 
disappear to?” he demanded. 

Mom took his arm. “It’s very strange,” she said softly. 

I glanced at Luke and Clay. They were standing tensely side by side on the 
walk in front of the office. Neither of them spoke. 

“Are you sure these are the right ticket booths?” I asked. 

“Yes,” Dad replied wearily. “This is the front entrance.” 

“So where can everyone be?” Mom asked, chewing her lower lip. 



“Maybe we can find someone in the parking lot,” I suggested. “You know. 
A parking attendant or something. They’ll be able to tell us how to get a car to 
go home.” 

“Good idea, Lizzy,” Dad said. He patted the top of my head, the way he 
used to when I was a little girl. 

I waited for Luke to make fun of me. But he didn’t say a word. I guess he 
was too worried and upset. 

“Come on,” I urged. I turned and ran past the empty ticket booths. The tall 
metal front gate to HorrorLand stood just beyond the booths. 

I stopped for a second to read a sign on the side of one of the ticket booths. 
It said: NO EXIT, NO ONE LEAVES HORRORLAND ALIVE! 

“Ha-ha,” I said sarcastically. “These signs are a riot, aren’t they?” 

I jogged the rest of the way and reached the gate first. I pulled it, and it 
wouldn’t open. So I tried pushing it. 

It didn’t move. 

Then I saw the heavy chain and the large steel padlock on the gate. 

Swallowing hard, I turned back to the others. 

“We’re locked in!” I told them. 



21 


“What?” Dad stared at me, his face twisted in confusion. I don’t think he 
believed me. 

“We’re locked in!” I repeated. I lifted the heavy metal padlock with both 
hands and then let it fall back with a loud clang against the bars of the gate. 

“But that’s impossible!” Mom cried, raising her hands to her cheeks. “They 
can’t lock people inside an amusement park!” 

“Maybe it’s another joke,” Luke suggested. “Everything in this place turns 
out to be a joke. Maybe this is one, too.” 

I lifted the heavy padlock again. “It doesn’t look like a joke, Luke,” I said 
unhappily. 

“Then there must be another gate where they want us to exit,” Mom 
suggested. 

“Maybe,” Dad said doubtfully. “Maybe there’s a side exit. But I haven’t 
seen one.” 

“What are we going to do?” Clay asked, whining. His face was red, and he 
was breathing hard. 

“Where is everyone?” Luke demanded, whining, too. “They’ve got to let us 
leave. They’ve got to!” 

“Let’s try to stay calm,” Dad said, putting a hand on Luke’s shoulder. 
“There’s no reason to panic. This is a strange place, but we’re not in any 
danger.” 

“He’s right,” Mom broke in. “There’s no reason to be afraid. We’ll be out of 
here and on our way home in no time.” She forced a smile. 

“As soon as we get out, I’ll buy you guys pizzas and big, cold drinks,” Dad 
promised. “And we’ll all have a good laugh about our terrifying adventures 
today in HorrorLand.” 

“But how do we get out?” Luke demanded shrilly. 

“Well...” Dad rubbed his chin. 

“Do you think we could climb the fence?” I asked. 

We all raised our eyes to the top of the iron fence. It was way over our 
heads. It must have been about twenty feet tall. 

“I can’t climb that!” Clay cried. “I’d fall!” 



“It’s too high,” Mom said quickly. 

“Bad idea,” I murmured. 

A large white cloud drifted over the sun. Our shadows grew longer over the 
pavement. The air quickly grew cooler. 

I felt a chill run down my back. 

“There’s got to be a way out of this stupid park!” I cried angrily. I hoisted 
up the padlock and slammed it against the bars of the gate. 

“Hold on, Lizzy,” Dad said soothingly. “We just have to find one of those 
costumed park workers. They’ll tell us how to get out.” 

“Uh... Dad...” I turned and saw Luke grab Dad’s arm. “Here they come.” 

We all uttered astonished cries as we saw the Horrors crossing the plaza. 
Dozens of them. They moved quickly, with a steady rhythm. Silently. 

A few seconds before, the plaza had been empty. Now it was filled with 
green-costumed Horrors marching toward us, spreading out, preparing to 
surround us. 

I could feel the panic rise up from my stomach. My knees began to shake. I 
stared in horror at them as they drew closer, closer. I couldn’t speak. I couldn’t 
move. 

“What are they going to do?” Clay cried, his features twisted in terror. He 
slipped behind Dad. “What are they going to do to us?” he cried. 



22 


We huddled together as the Horrors marched silently toward us. The only sound 
was the soft thud of their monster feet on the pavement, and their long purple 
tails dragging on the ground. 

“There are hundreds of them!” Mom murmured. She grabbed Dad’s arm 
with one hand. She slipped her other arm around my shoulders and pulled me 
closer. 

We had our backs against the iron fence. We stared helplessly at the 
grinning green faces, the bulging yellow eyes, which appeared to be laughing 
cruelly at us. 

Finally, they stopped a few feet in front of us. 

The plaza was still and silent. Terrifyingly silent. 

The sun was still hidden behind the big cloud. Two large blackbirds 
swooped low in the gray sky. 

We stared at the Horrors, and they stared back at us. 

I swallowed hard, leaning against my mother. I could feel her entire body 
trembling. 

I took a deep breath and then cried out: “What do you want?” The sound of 
my own voice startled me. 

One of the Horrors, a young woman, stepped forward. 

Frightened, I tried to back up. But my back was already pressing against the 
fence. 

“What do you want?” I repeated in a trembling voice. 

The costumed Horror stared at us one by one. “I want to thank you,” she 
said in a cheery voice. 

“Huh?” I uttered. 

“I’m the HorrorLand MC. We all want to thank you for being our guests 
today.” She flashed us a warm smile. 

“You mean we can go ? ” Luke demanded, half hidden behind my dad. 

“Of course,” the Horror said, grinning warmly. “But first we all want to 
thank you for appearing on HorrorLand Hidden Camera. ” 

The dozens of Horrors behind her broke into applause and loud cheers. 

“Huh? You mean this is some kind of show?” Dad demanded, frowning. 



“See the cameras?” the MC asked. She gestured up to two tall poles in the 
plaza. 

Raising my eyes to the top, I saw two TV cameras. 

“You mean we were on TV?” Luke cried. 

“Since the moment you arrived,” the MC replied. “Our hidden cameras 
followed you everywhere. From the hilarious scene where we blew up your car, 
our cameras were with you. And I know our home audience loved the terrified 
expressions on your faces and all of your horrified screams as you took our 
HorrorLand rides!” 

“Now, wait a minute,” Dad said angrily. He took a step forward. His hands 
were balled into tense fists at his sides. “You say this is a TV show? How come 
I’ve never seen it?” 

“We’re seen every weekend on The Monster Channel,” the Horror replied. 

“Oh,” Dad replied quickly, lowering his eyes. “We don’t have cable.” 

“You should get it,” the Horror told him. “You’re missing a lot of great 
scary shows on The Monster Channel.” 

The Horrors all clapped and cheered. 

“Well, you’ve been very good sports,” the MC continued, her yellow eyes 
bouncing in front of her head as she talked. “We’ve enjoyed having you. And to 
show our appreciation, we have a brand-new car waiting for you in the parking 
lot!” 

More cheers and applause from the Horrors. 

“Anew car? Excellent!” Luke exclaimed. 

“Does that mean we can leave?” Clay asked timidly. 

The Horror nodded. “Yes, it’s time for you to leave. The real exit is right 
over there, through that doorway.” 

She pointed to a tall green building near the end of the fence. I saw a yellow 
door on the side. 

“Take the yellow door,” the Horror instructed. “And thanks again for 
appearing on HorrorLand Hidden Camera /” 

As all the Horrors clapped their big green hands, we stepped away from the 
fence and hurried toward the exit. “I can’t believe we were on TV the whole 
time!” Mom declared. 

“And we’re getting a new car!” Luke exclaimed happily. He started 
jumping up and down. Then he leaped onto Clay’s back, nearly knocking him 


over. 



I laughed. It was good to see the old Luke back with us. 

“We’ve got to get cable!” Luke told Dad. “I want to see The Monster 
Channel. It’s got to be awesome!” 

“We’ll have to order it so we can see ourselves,” Mom said. 

I reached the yellow door first and pulled it open. I stepped into an 
enormous room, with white walls that shone under the bright white lights from 
the ceiling. 

“Is this the exit?” I cried. 

As soon as we were all inside, the door slammed shut with a bang that 
made my heart skip. 

Then all the lights went out. 

“Welcome to the HorrorLand Challenge!” boomed a deep, frightening voice 
over a loudspeaker. 

“Huh?” I gazed blindly around, trying to see something—anything—in the 
total darkness. 

“You have one minute to go through the Monster Obstacle Course,” the 
voice thundered. “Please keep in mind that the games are now over. This is real. 
You’re playing for your life!” 



23 


“We’ve been tricked!” I heard Dad cry angrily. And then he shouted at the top of 
his lungs, “Let’s get out of here!” 

“Run!” the deep voice boomed over the loudspeaker. “You have fifty-six 
seconds.” 

Dad started to shout again. But we stopped when a dim light came up, and a 
disgusting four-armed creature stepped toward us. 

“Ohhh!” I cried out without even realizing it. 

The size of a gorilla, the monster had huge green eyes surrounded by thick 
red fur over its face. Saliva drooled from its mouth. And as it opened its jaws 
wider, two rows of long fangs slid over its thin purple lips. 

“Don’t just stand there! Run! This is an obstacle course!” the voice boomed 
impatiently. “You have fifty seconds to live! At least make a good race of it.” 

The monster uttered a low growl and lumbered toward us in the dim light. 
Its jaws were opened wide as if preparing to bite. Its four enormous clawed 
hands swiped at the air in front of it. 

I was too stunned to move, too frightened to run. 

But suddenly, I felt a hand grab mine and tug me hard. 

It was Dad, I realized, trying to pull me to safety. 

I heard the boys screaming in fear. I felt Mom brush beside me as we 
started to stumble forward. 

“Run! Run!” the deep voice urged over the shrieks of the two boys. 

I couldn’t see where I was running. The light was so dim, so shadowy. I 
saw only a blur now, a blur of running feet, of moving shadows. 

The monster let out a deafening roar. I covered my ears and kept running. 

Its four clawed hands swiped at Dad. Missed. 

We hurtled past it. 

Only to face two giant birds, at least ten feet tall. They looked like cranes. 
They squawked and flapped their enormous wings. It sounded like canvas tents 
flapping in a strong wind. 

“Ohh! Help!” 

Was that me shrieking like that? 

Was I really being wrapped in their hot, flapping wings? Smothered? 



Choked? 

“No—p/ease!” 

How did I break away? 

Was I being chased now by six growling piglike creatures with sharp, 
pointed teeth curling from their twisted mouths? 

The screams and terrified shrieks of my family rose over the beating birds’ 
wings, the monstrous growls and grunts. 

I heard Dad cry out. And in the dim light, I saw him struggling to free 
himself from the four-armed creature. 

“No!” I screamed as I felt something warm wrap around my ankle. A fur- 
covered snake! 

I screamed again and kicked wildly, sending it flying into the darkness. 

But before I could move away, another furry snake spun around my leg, 
tightening quickly. 

I bent and pulled at it as it hissed in protest. 

I tossed it aside. 

“Run! Run!” the voice on the loudspeaker boomed. “Twenty seconds to 
live!” 

More monsters loomed in front of us. Disgusting yellow lizardlike creatures 
with dark flicking tongues like bullwhips. A hopping furry ball that roared as it 
hopped, sharp teeth poking out of three mouths. 

Hissing snakes, enormous buzzing insects with glowing red eyes, more 
gmnting pig monsters. Then a giant bearlike creature came at us on two legs. It 
tossed its dark, round head back and laughed like a hyena as its paws punched 
the air. 

“Help me!” I heard Luke shriek. And then I saw him disappear, wrapped 
inside the beating wings of one of the giant birds. 

The bird cawed in triumph as its wings tightened around my brother. 

“Ten seconds!” the voice boomed. 

“No!” I cried. I lunged toward the bird, grasped the beating wing, and 
pulled it open. 

Luke slid out, and we both began to run. 

Monsters growled, and flapped, and grunted, and roared. 

“Are we... going to make it?” Luke asked in a tiny voice. 

I didn’t have a chance to answer. 

Two powerful paws grabbed me around the waist, hoisted me high in the 



air, then slammed me to the floor. 

I landed hard on my stomach. My forehead hit the floor. 

Dizzy and hurt, I looked up in time to see an enormous elephantlike 
creature about to flatten me with its huge furry back foot. 

I’m not going to make it, I realized. 

I’m not going to make it. 



24 


The enormous flat foot lowered over me slowly, steadily. The monster was 
taking its time. 

It all seemed to be happening in slow motion. 

I wanted to move. I wanted to roll out from under it. 

But the fall had taken my breath away. I lay there gasping, watching the 
monster foot coming down to crush me. 

“Ohhh.” I couldn’t catch my breath. I couldn’t squirm away. 

I could feel the heat of the monster foot. I could smell its putrid sweat. 

The foot pressed down on my stomach. 

I shut my eyes and waited for the pain. 

The jarring blast of a buzzer made my eyes shoot open. 

The monster raised its heavy foot from my body. The floor shook under its 
weight as it began to lumber away. 

Am I alive? I wondered. 

Or am I only dreaming that I’m still alive? 

Is that creature really leaving without crushing me? 

The buzzer echoed in my ear. Then it abruptly stopped. The loudspeaker 
crackled on. 

“Time’s up!” a woman’s voice said. The voice of the HorrorLand MC who 
had led us to this terrifying obstacle course. 

“Time is up. What a thrilling race!” she gushed. 

I groaned and started to pull myself up. In the dim light, I saw that all of the 
monsters had vanished. 

“That was a tough battle,” the MC continued over the loudspeaker. “Do we 
have any survivors?” 

“Yes, we do,” the deep, booming voice replied. 

“How many survivors do we have in there?” the woman asked. 

“Three,” the booming voice replied. “Three survivors out of five.” 



25 


A cold chill ran down my body. 

I opened my mouth in a silent cry of shock and leaped to my feet. 

Three out of five? 

Did that mean that two of us were dead? 

My chest still ached. My knees were trembling. I squinted into the dim 
light, searching desperately for the others. 

Halfway across the room, I saw Luke and Clay. They were huddled 
together, walking as if in a daze toward the far wall. 

“Hey!” I tried to call to them. But my voice came out a choked whisper. 

Where were Mom and Dad? 

Were they both killed by the monsters? 

Three out of five. Three out of five. 

“Nooooooooo!” I finally found my voice and let out a horrified wail that 
echoed off the walls. 

“Excuse me. A slight mistake,” the deep voice boomed. “Make that five out 
of five survivors.” 

“Five out of five!” the HorrorLand MC exclaimed. “A new record. We’ve 
never had a perfect score before. Let’s give them a round of applause, 
everyone!” 

I took a deep breath and held it, trying to stop my trembling. 

They’re okay! I thought happily. Mom and Dad are okay. 

And then I saw them. They had their arms around Luke and Clay and were 
making their way toward me. 

“We’re okay!” I cried, rushing to them, my arms outstretched. “We’re 
okay!” 

All five of us huddled in the center of the dark room, hugging each other 
and sobbing. 

Dad’s arm was bleeding from a deep gash. One of the monsters had clawed 

him. 

Aside from that, we were shaken but not hurt. 

“Now what?” Luke asked in a trembling voice. “Are they going to let us 



go?” 

“They can’t get away with this,” Dad said angrily. “They can’t do this to 
people and get away with it. I don’t care if it is TV!” 

“Those monsters were real!” I exclaimed with a shudder. “It wasn’t a fake. 
They were really trying to kill us.” 

“How do we get out?” Luke demanded. “Will they let us out?” 

We all started chattering at once, our voices high and frightened. 

Suddenly, the ceiling lights flashed on, flooding the room with bright light. 
And the MC’s voice broke through our frightened conversation. “Let’s bring our 
winners out with a round of applause! ” she announced cheerfully. 

We all cried out as the floor began to tilt beneath us. I grabbed on to Dad, 
and we started to slide. 

The floor tilted down like a sliding board. And we slid out of the room— 
and landed in the plaza outside. 

Still feeling dazed, I jumped quickly to my feet as the HorrorLand MC 
hurried to greet us. The big crowd of Horrors behind her was clapping and 
cheering. 

“You can’t do this to us!” I screeched. 

I was so angry, I didn’t know what I was doing. I just totally freaked. 

I leaped at the woman, grabbed the top of her mask, and started to pull it off 
with both hands. 

“You can’t do this! You can’t!” I shrieked. “Let me see your face! Let me 
see who you really are!” 

Using all of my strength, I gave the mask a hard tug. 

Then I screamed and let go as I realized the truth. 



26 


She wasn’t wearing a mask! 

The monstrous green face was her face. 

She wasn’t wearing a monster costume. None of the Horrors were wearing 
costumes, I realized. 

I stepped back, raising my hands in horror as if trying to shield myself. 
“You—you’re really monsters!” I stammered. 

They nodded back at me, pleased grins on their ugly faces. Their yellow 
eyes bobbed gleefully. 

“You—you’re all monsters!” I screamed. “But—but you said this was a TV 
show,” I stammered to the Horror MC. 

Her bulging yellow eyes gazed at me. “We’re happy to say it is the top- 
rated show on The Monster Channel,” she said cheerily. “Thanks to great 
contestants like you and your family. The Monster Channel is watched by nearly 
two million monsters all over the world.” 

“But—but—” I stammered, taking another step back. 

“People don’t always take us seriously,” she continued. “People come to 
HorrorLand and think it’s all a big joke. People laugh at the signs around the 
park. They laugh at the rides and attractions. But it’s all very serious to us. All of 
it.” 

My father stepped up beside me, shaking a fist angrily. “But you can’t do 
this to innocent people!” he shouted. “You can’t bring people into this park to 
torture them, and—and—” 

“Oh, I’m sorry. Our time is up,” the MC interrupted, shaking her enormous 
green head. “I’m sad to say it’s time to say good-bye to our special guests for 
this week.” 

“Now, wait—” Dad shouted, raising both hands for quiet. 

The crowd of Horrors silently pushed forward. We had no choice but to 
start moving with them. 

“Let me show you people the way we say good-bye on HorrorLand Hidden 
Camera, ” the MC said. 

Dad tried to hold back, to resist, but several Horrors bumped against him. 
They were bumping all of us now, pushing us toward what appeared to be a 



round purple pond just beyond the plaza. 

We couldn’t fight back. There were too many of them. 

We couldn’t run. They had us surrounded. 

They drove us like sheepdogs herding cattle. In a few seconds, we were 
standing at the edge of the purple pond. 

A foul smell rose up from the pond. The purple liquid bubbled and gurgled, 
making a sick sucking sound. 

“Let us go!” Luke cried shrilly. “We want to go home!” 

The HorrorLand MC ignored his frantic pleas and stepped to the edge of the 
gurgling pond. “Saying good-bye is always sad,” she said. “So we try to have a 
little fun with our farewells.” 

“Just let us go!” Luke insisted. Dad put a hand on his shoulder to try to 
comfort him. 

We all stared at the MC as she raised a large rock in one hand and held it 
over the disgusting, bubbling pond. “Watch,” she instructed us with a smile. 

She let the rock drop into the pond. 

As soon as it touched the thick surface, it was pulled down with a loud 
sucking sound. 

“See how easy it is to say good-bye?” the Horror said, turning to us. “Now, 
will you jump in—or do you want to be pushed?” 



27 


Silently, the Horrors began moving in on us. Closer. Closer. 

Backing up, Clay tripped over my foot and nearly fell into the gurgling 
purple pit. I grabbed him and held on to him until he regained his balance. 

All five of us were standing at the edge of the pit. 

The sour odor swept over me. I felt sick. The thick purple slime lapped up 
at my ankles as if reaching out to grab me. 

“Mom! Dad!” I cried. I didn’t know what I expected them to do. We were 
all helpless. 

I knew we weren’t going to escape this time. 

Without realizing it, we were all holding hands. 

“Will you jump in—or do you want to be pushed?” The MC repeated her 
question. 

“I’m real sorry,” Dad murmured to us, ignoring her. “I’m real sorry I 
brought you here. I—I didn’t know...” His voice broke. He lowered his eyes. 

“Dad, it’s not your fault!” I told him, squeezing his hand. 

And as I squeezed his hand, I had an idea. 

A wild idea. A stupid idea. A really crazy idea. 

I knew I had to try it. It was the only idea I had. 

“People laugh at everything in the park,” the HorrorLand MC had told us. 
“But it’s all very serious to us,” she’d said. 

All very serious ... 

Very serious... 

She stood right in front of me now, waiting for us to jump to our deaths, 
eager for us to get sucked down into the purple slime. 

I knew this was my last chance. I knew it was crazy. 

But I knew I had to try it. 

I stepped up to the MC, reached out, and pinched her arm as hard as I 
could. 



28 


Her mouth opened wide, and she let out a startled gasp. 

She tried to pull her arm away. But I held on and pinched harder. “The Mad 
Pincher strikes again!” I shouted, remembering Luke’s annoying cry. 

Her yellow eyes rolled around crazily. “No!” she pleaded. 

Harder. Harder. 

And then I was the one to cry out as her mouth opened wide, and, with a 
loud whoosh, a rush of air escaped her lips. 

I leaped back. 

As the air rushed from her mouth, she appeared to deflate, just like a 
balloon. 

I gaped in amazement as she folded helplessly to the ground. 

An angry cry rose up from the crowd of Horrors. “Inflate her!” one of them 
yelled. “Inflate her immediately!” 

They began moving in on us, growling and grumbling menacingly. 

“Pinch them!” I shouted to my family. “Pinch them! The ‘No Pinching’ 
signs that we thought were so stupid—they were serious! The Horrors deflate if 
they’re pinched!” 

A Horror stepped up, arms outstretched to push me into the pond. I pinched 
his arm hard, and a few seconds later, he deflated. 

I heard the whoosh of air escaping to my right and saw that Luke had 
deflated one, too. 

Whoosh! Another one deflated and folded to the pavement. 

That’s all it took. 

The plaza filled with frightened cries and gasps of horror. 

The alarmed Horrors turned and ran. Stampeded is a better word. They 
scattered through the park, screaming as they ran. 

Taking a long, deep breath, I happily watched them flee. “See? I always 
come through in a pinch!” I said, amazing myself by making a joke. 

I don’t think anyone else in my family heard me. They were shouting for 
joy, hugging each other, jumping up and down. 

“Let’s get out of here!” I shouted. I started running toward the front gate. 
The others followed close behind. 



The gate was open now. I guess the Horrors had opened it, figuring the only 
place we were heading was to the bottom of the purple pond. 

Without looking back, we ran out into the empty parking lot. 

And stopped. 

“No car,” I murmured. 

In all the excitement, I had forgotten that our car had been blown up. 

I let out a weary sigh. I felt as if I were deflating, just like the Horrors. 
“Now what?” I asked, staring across the enormous flat parking lot. 

“It’s too far to walk!” Luke wailed. “How do we get out of here?” 

“The buses!” Mom cried, pointing. I turned my eyes to the row of purple- 
and-green buses parked on the side of the lot. They glowed under the bright 
afternoon sun. 

“Yeah!” Dad cried excitedly. “Maybe we can start one up and get away 
from here!” 

We started jogging over the pavement to the buses. “Cross your fingers,” 
Dad called, leading the way. “Maybe they leave the keys in them. It’s our only 
chance!” 

“Hurry!” Luke shouted suddenly. “They’re coming!” 

My heart leaped in my chest. I turned back toward the gate. 

Sure enough, the Horrors were pouring out of the park, chasing after us. 
“Give up! You cannot escape!” one of them screamed. 

“No one ever escapes!” another Horror shouted. 

“Hurry!” Luke cried. “Hurry! They’re going to catch us!” 



29 


With the Horrors close behind, shouting and threatening us, we ran full speed 
toward the row of buses. 

My heart was pounding almost as loud as my sneakers against the 
pavement. My throat ached, and I had a sharp pain in my side. 

But I kept running. 

“You cannot escape!” 

“Stop now!” 

“Give up!” 

The angry cries of the Horrors sounded even closer. But I didn’t turn back 
to see if they were catching up. 

The door to the first bus was open. Dad got there first and scrambled up the 
steps and inside. 

Mom stepped in, followed by the two boys. 

I pulled myself inside and the bus door slid shut behind me. “Dad—the 
keys!” I choked out. 

“Yes! They’re here!” he cried happily. “Hold on! We’re getting away!” 

The engine coughed, then started up with a roar. Dad lowered his foot on 
the gas pedal, and the bus shot forward. I stumbled down the aisle and fell into a 
seat behind Luke and Clay. 

“Hurry! They’re coming! They’re coming!” Luke and Clay were screaming 
in unison. 

I could hear the angry shouts of the Horrors through the closed bus 
windows. 

“We’re okay!” Dad cried, leaning over the big steering wheel. “We’re okay! 
We’re outta here!” 

“Yes!” I shouted happily. “Yes!” 

We all started to cheer. We kept cheering until we were out of the parking 
lot and back on the highway. 

We laughed and celebrated all the way home. 

The drive took hours and hours, but we didn’t care. We were safe! We had 
escaped! 

It was night when Dad pulled the bus up our driveway. “Home, sweet 



home!” I cried joyfully. 

We all piled eagerly out of the bus. I took a deep breath and stretched. The 
air smelled so sweet and fresh. A full moon made the front lawn shine. 

Then I saw him. It was a Horror, and he was clinging to the back of our bus. 
“Oh, no!” I cried out. 

“What are you doing there?” Dad demanded. 

“Did you ride there the whole way home?” Luke asked in disbelief. 

I shrank back as the Horror let go of the bus and slid to the ground. His 
yellow eyes studied us menacingly. He moved toward us quickly. 

Clay and Luke hid behind Dad. Mom’s mouth dropped open in fright. 

“What do you want?” I cried. 

He reached out his green hand. “Here,” he said. “We forgot to give you 
your free passes for next year!” 






WHY I'M AFRAID 
OF BEES 
Goosebumps - 17 
R.L. Stine 


1 


If you’re afraid of bees, I have to warn you—there are a lot of bees in this story. 
In fact, there are hundreds. 

Up until last month, I was afraid of bees. And when you read this story, 
you’ll see why. 

It all started in July when I heard a frightening buzz, the buzz of a bee. 

I sat up straight and searched all around. But I couldn’t see any bees 
anywhere. The scary buzzing sound just wouldn’t stop. In fact, it seemed to be 
getting louder. 

“It’s probably Andretti again,” I told myself. “Ruining my day, as usual.” 

I’d been reading a stack of comic books under the big maple tree in my 
back yard. Other kids might have better things to do on a hot, sticky summer 
afternoon—like maybe going to the pool with their friends. 

But not me. My name is Gary Lutz, and I have to be honest. I don’t have 
many real close friends. Even my nine-year-old sister, Krissy, doesn’t like me 
very much. My life is the pits. 

“Why is that?” I constantly ask myself. “What exactly is wrong with me? 
Why do all the kids call me names like Lutz the Klutz? Why does everybody 
always make fun of me?” 

Sometimes I think it might be because of the way I look. That morning, I’d 
spent a long time studying myself in the mirror. I’d stared at myself for at least 
half an hour. 

I saw a long, skinny face, a medium-sized nose, and straight blond hair. Not 
exactly handsome, but not terrible. 

Bzzzzzz. 

I can’t stand that sound! And it was coming even closer. 

I flopped over on my stomach. Then I peered around the side of the maple 
tree. I wanted to get a better view of my neighbor’s yard. 

Oh, no, I thought. I was right. The buzzing sound was coming from Mr. 
Andretti’s bees. My neighbor was at it again. He was always hanging out in the 
back by his garage, messing with those bees of his. 

How could he handle them every day without worrying about getting 
stung? I asked myself. Didn’t they give him the creeps? 



I climbed to my knees and edged a few inches forward. Even though I 
wanted to get a better look at Mr. Andretti, I didn’t want him to see me. 

The last time he caught me watching him, he made a big deal out of it. He 
acted as if there were some kind of law against sitting outside in your own back 
yard! 

“What’s this?” he bellowed at the top of his lungs. “Did someone start a 
neighborhood watch committee without informing me? Or is the FBI recruiting 
ten-year-old spies these days?” 

This last remark really steamed me, because Mr. Andretti knows perfectly 
well that I’m twelve years old. After all, my family has lived next door to him for 
my entire life. Which is bad luck for me. Mainly since I’m afraid of bees. 

I might as well confess it right away. I’m scared of a few other things, too, 
such as: dogs, big mean kids, the dark, loud noises, and swimming in the ocean. 
I’m even scared of Claus. That’s Krissy’s dumb cat. 

But, most of all, I’m scared of bees. Unfortunately, with a beekeeper for a 
neighbor, there are always bees around. Hairy, crawly, buzzing, stinging bees. 

“Meow!” 

I jumped up as Claus the cat came creeping up behind me. “Why do you 
have to stalk me like that?” I cried. 

As I spoke, Claus moved forward and wrapped himself around my leg. 
Then he dug his long, needle-sharp claws into my skin. 

“Ouch!” I screamed. “Get away from me!” I cannot understand how Krissy 
can love that creature so much. She says he only jumps on me because he “likes” 
me. Well, all I can say is that I don’t like him! And I wish he would keep away 
from me! 

When I finally managed to chase Claus away, I went back to studying my 
neighbor. Yes, I’m scared of bees. And I’m fascinated by them, too. 

I can’t seem to stop watching Mr. Andretti all the time. At least he keeps his 
hives in a screened-in area behind his garage. That makes me feel pretty safe. 
And he acts as if he knows what he’s doing. In fact, he acts as if he’s the world’s 
greatest living expert on bees! 

Today, Mr. Andretti was wearing his usual bee outfit. It’s a white suit, and a 
hat with a wire-screen veil hanging down to protect his face. His clothes are tied 
with string at the wrists and ankles. He looks just like some kind of alien 
creature out of a horror movie. 

As my neighbor carefully opened and closed the drawerlike sections of his 



hanging hives, I noticed he wasn’t wearing any gloves. 

Once, when I was with my dad, Mr. Andretti had explained this to us. “It’s 
like this, Lutz,” he said. Lutz is my father, Ken Lutz. Naturally, during this entire 
conversation, Mr. Andretti had acted as if I wasn’t even there. 

“Your average beekeepers usually wear gloves,” he explained. “A lot of the 
brave ones use gloves with no fingers and thumbs so they can work with the 
bees more easily.” 

Mr. Andretti thumped himself on the chest and went on. “But your truly 
outstanding beekeeper—such as myself—likes to work with his bare hands. My 
bees trust me. You know, Lutz, bees are really a lot smarter than most people 
realize.” 

Oh, sure, I said to myself at the time. If they’re really so smart, why do they 
keep coming back to your hive and letting you steal all their honey from them? 

Bzzzzzz. 

The humming from Mr. Andretti’s hives suddenly grew louder and more 
threatening. I stood up and walked over to the fence between our two back yards. 
I gazed into the screened-in area to see what was going on. 

Then I gasped out loud. 

Mr. Andretti’s white suit didn’t appear white anymore. It had become black! 

Why? Because he was totally covered with bees! 

As I stared, more and more of the insects oozed out of their hives. They 
crawled all over Mr. Andretti’s arms and chest, and even on his head. 

I was so grossed out, I thought I might puke! 

Mr. Andretti’s hat and veil shimmered and bulged as if they were alive! 

Wasn’t he scared of all those stingers? 

As I leaned over the fence, Andretti suddenly yelled at me: “Gary—look 
out/” 

I froze. “Huh?” 

“The bees!” Mr. Andretti screamed. “They’re out of control! Run!” 



2 


I never ran so fast in my life! I charged across the yard and stumbled up the back 
steps of my house. 

I flung open the screen door and almost fell into the house. Then I stopped 
and leaned against the kitchen table, gasping for air. 

When I finally caught my breath, I listened hard. I could still hear the angry 
buzzing of the bees from the next yard. Then I heard something else. 

“Haw haw haw!” 

Somebody was laughing out there. And it sounded suspiciously like Mr. 
Andretti. 

Slowly, I turned around and peered out through the screen door. My 
neighbor was standing at the bottom of the back steps. He’d taken off his bee 
veil, and I could see that he had a huge grin on his face. 

“Haw haw! You should have seen the expression on your face, Gary. You 
never would believe how funny you looked! And the way you ran! 

I stared at him. “You mean your bees weren’t escaping?” 

Mr. Andretti slapped his knee. “Of course they weren’t! I have complete 
control of those bees at all times. They come and go, bringing nectar and pollen 
back from the flowers.” 

He paused to wipe some sweat off his forehead. “Of course, sometimes I 
have to go out and recapture a few lost bees with my net. But most of them know 
my hives are really the best home they can possibly have!” 

“So this was all a joke, Mr. Andretti?” I tried to sound angry. But that’s hard 
to do when your voice is shaking even harder than your knees! “It was supposed 
to be funny?” 

“I guess that’ll teach you to get a life and stop staring at me all day!” he 
replied. Then he turned and walked away. 

I was so angry! What a mean trick! 

It was bad enough having kids my age pick on me all the time. But now the 
grown-ups were starting in! 

I pounded my fist on the kitchen table just as my mother walked into the 
room. “Hi, Gary,” she said, frowning. “Try not to destroy the furniture, okay? I 
was just about to make myself a sandwich. Would you like one?” 



“I guess so,” I muttered, sitting down at the table. 

“Would you like the usual?” 

I nodded. “The usual” was peanut butter and jelly, which I never get tired 
of. For a snack, I usually like taco chips, the spicier the better. As I waited for 
my sandwich, I ripped open a new bag of chips and started chewing away. 

“Uh-oh.” Mom was rummaging through the refrigerator. “I’m afraid we’re 
out of jelly. Guess we’ll have to use something else.” 

She pulled out a small glass jar. “How about this with your peanut butter?” 

“What is it?” I asked. 

“Honey.” 

“Honey!” I shrieked. “No way!” 

Later, I was feeling lonely. I wandered over to the school playground. As I 
walked by the swing set, I saw a bunch of kids I knew from school. 

They were standing around on the softball diamond, choosing up sides for a 
game. I joined them. Maybe, just maybe, they’d let me play. 

“Gail and I are captains,” a boy named Louie was saying. 

I walked over and stood at the edge of the group. I was just in time. 

One by one, Louie and Gail picked players for their teams. Every kid was 
chosen. Every kid except one, that is. I was left standing by myself next to home 
plate. 

As I slumped my shoulders and stared down at the ground, the captains 
starting fighting over me. “You take him, Gail,” Louie said. 

“No. You take him.” 

“No fair. I always get stuck with Lutz!” 

As the two captains argued over who was going to be stuck with me, I 
could feel my face getting redder and redder. I wanted to leave. But then they all 
would have said I was a quitter. 

Finally, Gail sighed and rolled her eyes. “Oh, all right,” she said. “We’ll 
take him. But remember the special Lutz rule. He gets four strikes before he’s 
out!” 

I swallowed hard and followed my teammates out onto the diamond. At that 
point, luck was with me. Gail sent me to the outfield. 

“Go way out in right, Lutz,” Gail ordered. “By the back fence. Nobody ever 
hits it out there.” 

Some kids might be angry about being stuck so far away from the action. 



But I was grateful. If no balls were hit to me, I wouldn’t have a chance to drop 
them the way I always did. 

As I watched the game, my stomach slowly tied itself into a tight knot. I 
was last in the batting order. But when my turn at the plate finally came around, 
the bases were loaded. 

I picked up the bat and wandered out toward the plate. A groan rose up 
from my teammates. “Lutz is up?” somebody cried in disbelief. 

“Easy out!” yelled the girl playing first base. “No batter, no batter, no 
batter!” Everyone on the other team hooted and laughed. Out of the corner of my 
eye I saw Gail put her face in her hands. 

I ground my teeth together and started praying. Please let me get a walk. 
Please let me get a walk. I knew I could never hit the ball. So a walk was my one 
and only hope. 

Of course I struck out. 

Four straight strikes. 

“Lutz the Klutz!” I heard someone cry. Then a lot of kids laughed. 

Without looking back, I marched off the baseball diamond and away from 
the playground. I was heading home toward the peace and quiet of my own 
room. It might not be perfect, I thought. But at least at home no one teased me 
about being a klutz. 

“Hey, look, guys!” a voice shouted as I turned onto my street. 

“Hey—wow—it’s Lutz the Klutz!” someone else answered. 

“Lookin’ good, dude!” 

I couldn’t believe my bad luck. The three voices belonged to the biggest, 
meanest, toughest creeps in the entire neighborhood—Barry, Marv, and Karl. 
They’re my age, but at least five times as big! 

These guys are gorillas! I mean, their knuckles drag on the sidewalk! 

And when they’re not swinging back and forth on a tire swing in their 
gorilla cage, what’s their favorite activity? 

You guessed it. Beating me up! 

“Give me a break, guys,” I pleaded. “I’m having a bad day.” 

They laughed. 

“You want a break, Lutz?” one of them shouted menacingly. “Here!” 

I only had time to blink as I watched a huge, mean-looking fist heading 
right for my nose. 



3 


A long, painful ten minutes later, I walked through the back door of my house. 
Fortunately, my mom was somewhere upstairs. She didn’t see my bloody nose, 
scratched, bruised arms, and torn shirt. 

All I needed was for her to start fussing over me and threatening to call the 
other boys’ parents. If that happened, Barry, Marv, and Karl really would kill me 
the next time they saw me. 

As I crept up the stairs, Claus the cat came leaping out at me. 

“Yowl!” 

“Whoooooa!” I was so shocked, I almost fell back down the stairs. “Get 
away from me, you monster!” 

I pushed the cat away and hurried down the hall to the bathroom. I gazed 
into the mirror and almost heaved. I looked like road kill! 

I rinsed off my nose with ice-cold water. Then I cleaned off all the blood 
and staggered to my room. 

I took off my ripped-up T-shirt and hid it behind my bed. Then I put on a 
winter shirt with long sleeves. It would be hot, but it would hide my scratched 
arms. 

Downstairs in the kitchen, I found Mom and Krissy. Mom was getting out 
mixing bowls and eggs, and Krissy was tying a big apron around her waist. As 
usual, Claus was purring and wrapping himself around Krissy’s legs. Why did he 
act like such an innocent little kitten around her, and such a monster around me? 

“Hi, Gary,” my mom said to me. “You want to help us make peanut butter 
cookies?” 

“No, thanks,” I said. “But I’ll lick the bowl for you later.” I walked over to 
the table and picked up the bag of taco chips I’d left there before. 

“Well, at least you can help by getting that new jar of peanut butter out of 
the cupboard and opening it for me,” Mom said. “This recipe calls for a lot of 
peanut butter.” 

“Sounds good,” I said. “Just so long as it doesn’t have any honey in it.” 

I opened the cupboard door and took out the peanut butter. I tried to twist 
off the cap. I twisted as hard as I could, but the top just wouldn’t move. I banged 
the jar on the countertop and tried again. Still no luck. 



“Do you have a wrench or something around, Mom?” I asked. “This thing 
just won’t budge.” 

“Maybe if you ran hot water on it,” my mother began. 

“Oh, puh-lease!” Krissy said with a snort. Wiping her hands on her apron, 
she crossed the room and grabbed the jar away from me. 

With two fingers, she twisted off the cap. 

Then she started laughing her head off. My mom started laughing, too. 

Can you believe it? My own mother was laughing at me! 

“I guess you forgot to eat your oat bran this morning,” Mom said. 

“I’m leaving,” I muttered to Mom and Krissy. “Forever.” 

The two of them were laughing together. I don’t think they even heard me. 

Totally miserable, I stepped out the front door and slammed it hard behind 
me. I decided to ride my bike around the block a few times. When I went around 
to the side of the house and got it out of the garage, I started to cheer up a little 
bit. 

My bike is really awesome. It’s a new, blue, twenty-one speed, and it’s real 
sleek and cool. My dad gave it to me for my twelfth birthday. 

I jumped on my bike and headed down the driveway. As I turned onto the 
street, I saw some girls walking down the sidewalk. Out of the corner of my eye, 
I recognized them. 

Wow! I thought. It’s Judy Donner and Kaitlyn Davis! 

Both Judy and Kaitlyn go to my school. They’re really pretty and very 
popular. 

To be honest, I’ve had a major crush on Judy since the fourth grade. And 
once, at the fifth-grade picnic, she actually smiled at me. At least, I think it was 
at me. 

So when I saw those girls walking down the street, I decided it was a good 
time to try to be really cool. 

I flipped my baseball cap around so the brim was at the back of my head. 
Then I folded my arms across my chest and started pedaling no-handed. 

As I passed them, I glanced over my shoulder and flashed my most 
glamorous smile at Judy and Kaitlyn. 

Before my beautiful smile faded, I felt a tug at my sneaker. I realized 
instantly that my shoelace was caught in the chain! 

A horrible grinding sound filled the air. The bike jerked and lurched from 
side to side—and I lost control! 



“Gary—!” I heard Judy shriek. “Gary—look out for that car!” 



4 


CRAAAAAAACK. 

I didn’t see the lamppost until I hit it. 

As I toppled off my bike and shot sideways through the air, I heard the 
sound of metal crumpling, ripping, and shredding. 

I landed on my face in a deep, warm puddle of mud. 

I heard the car rumble past me. 

Slowly, I pulled my face out of the mud. 

Guess I didn’t look too cool, I thought bitterly. Maybe at least I’ll get a little 
sympathy. 

No way. 

I could hear Judy and Kaitlyn laughing behind me on the sidewalk. “Nice 
bike, Gary!” one of them called. They hurried away. 

I had never been so humiliated in all my life. If I could have, I would have 
put down roots in that mud puddle and turned myself into a tree. It might not be 
the most exciting life in the world. But at least no one laughs at a tree. 

I’m serious. At that moment, I would have happily traded lives with a tree. 
Or a bird. Or a bug. Or just about any other living object on the planet. 

With that sad thought, I decided to get myself up and out of there before 
anyone else came along. It took all my strength to peel my wrecked bicycle off 
the lamppost. Luckily, I didn’t have far to drag it. 

For the second time in the same afternoon, I crept into my house and up the 
stairs so I could get cleaned up before anyone saw me. Now, as I studied my 
reflection in the bathroom mirror, I saw there was no way I could hide all my 
cuts and scrapes from my mom. 

“Oh, who cares?” I moaned as I washed the mud off my face and hands. 
“Who cares if Mom sees them? I’ll be doing her a favor by giving her something 
else to laugh at. It’ll really make her day!” 

I went back into my room and changed into my last clean shirt. Then I 
glanced around, trying to find something to do. 

I decided to boot up my computer. Playing with my computer is one of the 
few things I really like. When I’m lost in the world of a computer game, 
sometimes I can actually forget I’m a total jerk named Gary Lutz. Nobody in a 



computer game ever calls me Lutz the Klutz. 

I turned on the computer and decided to have another try at the Planet 
Monstro Fantasy game I’d been stuck on for two days. Monstro is a really cool 
game. 

When you play it, you’re a character named The Warrior, and you’re 
trapped on the planet Monstro. You have to get yourself out of all kinds of scary 
situations. 

Before I started to play, I thought I’d check Computa Note, one of the 
electronic bulletin boards I’m connected to on the computer. 

I’d left a message there on Monday, asking if anyone knew how to defeat 
the two-headed dragon that kept eating me on the thirteenth moon of Monstro. 
Sometimes other people in the country who are playing the same game will send 
each other hints. 

When I accessed Computa Note, I saw the following computer-game- 
related messages on the screen: 

To Arnold in Milwaukee: Have you tried rubbing smashed-up eucalyptus leaves 
all over yourself in the rain forest game? It’s an ecologically correct way of 
repelling the poisonous ants in EcoScare 95. From Lisa in San Francisco 

To R from Sacramento: The only way to escape from the flood on your spaceship 
in SpaceQuest 20 is to inflate your suit and float away. From L in St. Louis 

To Gary in Millville: Try stabbing the dragon between the eyes. It worked for 
me. From Ted in Ithaca 

Oh, terrific, I thought. I’d been trying to stab the dragon between the eyes. But 
the creature always ate me before I could do it! What was “Ted in Ithaca” doing 
that I wasn’t? 

I decided to leave another electronic note, asking Ted to explain what he 
meant. But, as I started typing, I noticed another message at the very bottom of 
the computer screen. 

I read it. Then I read it again very carefully: 


TAKE A VACATION FROM YOURSELF. 
Change places with someone for a week! 



5 


What could that mean? 

I pressed the Enter button so I could read what was next. I desperately 
wanted more information about the message. This is what I saw: 

TAKE A VACATION FROM YOURSELF. 

Change places with someone for a week! 

PERSON-TO-PERSON VACATIONS 
113 Roach Street, Suite 2-B 
or call 1-800-555-SWAP 

How could it possibly work? I asked myself. How could two people change lives 
without getting into all kinds of trouble? 

I had to admit it sounded totally crazy. 

Crazy, but interesting. 

I yawned and scratched the back of my head. 

“Ouch!” My hand grazed one of the painful bumps I’d gotten from Barry, 
Marv, and Karl. 

It really hurt. But the stab of pain helped me make up my mind. I was 
definitely ready for some changes in my life. 

“I don’t want to spend the rest of my life getting beat up!” I told myself. 
“Or crashing into lampposts, either! Or being the last person chosen for the 
team!” 

I took out a piece of paper and copied the address from the screen. As I did, 
I realized it was only a few blocks from my school. I knew just where it was. I 
could stop by the Person-to-Person office the next day. 

I’m really going to check it out, I decided. 

Making up my mind like that improved my mood a lot. I was beginning to 
feel almost cheerful when I went back downstairs. But not for long. When my 
family sat down in the dining room for dinner, my father noticed my banged-up 
face. 

“Gary!” he exclaimed. “What in the world happened to you?” 



“Er,” I said. “I had a little accident on my bike.” I winced as I said the word 
“bike”. I was thinking about the mangled wreck in the corner of the garage. 

“I don’t believe that for a minute,” Mom said. “I’m sure you’ve been 
fighting with those big kids in the neighborhood again. Why in the world can’t 
you children learn to settle your disagreements peacefully?” 

Krissy started laughing so hard, she almost choked on her tuna casserole. 
“Gary doesn’t have any disagreements with those guys, Mom!” she said. “They 
just like to beat him up!” 

My mother shook her head angrily. “Well, I think that’s just outrageous!” 
she said. “I have a good mind to call those boys’ parents up right now and give 
them a piece of my mind!” 

I groaned loudly. “I’m telling you, Mom, I really had an accident with my 
bike. If you don’t believe me, go check it out in the garage.” 

Then my father did believe me. He started lecturing me about bike safety 
and why I should have been wearing my helmet and how I was going to have to 
pay to have the bike fixed with my own money. 

After a while, I stopped paying much attention. As I pushed my casserole 
around on my plate, all I could think about was my plan for changing my life 
with Person-to-Person Vacations. 

The sooner the better, I thought. The sooner I get out of this life, the better 
off I’ll be. 

We finished dinner, and I went upstairs to play on my computer again. I 
spent the rest of the evening with my Planet Monstro game. 

I kept trying to stab the dragon between the eyes. But even though I 
followed Ted from Ithaca’s advice, I couldn’t do it. The dragon ate me twenty- 
three times. 

Finally, I gave up and crawled into bed. I was so wiped out, I started 
drifting off to sleep almost right away. I turned over and pulled the blanket up 
under my chin. I curled up into a ball. The toes on my right foot touched 
something. 

“Huh?” I said out loud. “What is that down there?” 

My heart pounded in my chest. 

Slowly, I moved my toes again. 

“Ohhhhhh.” My blood turned into ice. 

I jumped out of bed and let out a bloodcurdling scream. 



6 


Frantically, I ripped the blankets off my bed. In the dim light coming in through 
the window, I could see the rat—fat and hairy, its red eyes gleaming at me. 

I screamed again. 

Then I heard laughter down the hall. Krissy’s laughter. 

My stomach sank. I made my way to the switch and turned on the light. 

Sure enough. The rat still stared at me from my bed. But now I recognized 
it. A gray rubber rat. One of Claus’ favorite toys. 

In her room down the hall, Krissy squealed with laughter. 

“I’m going to get you, you little brat!” I screamed. I thought about going 
down the hall and really thumping her. But I quickly decided against it. 

Even though Krissy is only nine, she happens to be pretty strong. There was 
an excellent chance she could beat me up. 

With an angry growl, I grabbed the rat off my bed and heaved it into the 
corner of my room. Then, my heart still pounding with rage, I turned off the light 
and climbed back under the covers. 

“Tomorrow,” I promised myself in the dark room. “Tomorrow, you, Gary 
Lutz, are going to check out that ad and find out if you can change your life. 
Even if it’s only for a week, it has to be better than this miserable life you have 
now!” 

The next day I kept my promise to myself. After breakfast, I walked the six 
blocks to Roach Street and started reading the street numbers, trying to find 
number 113. 

I guess I was looking for some kind of big, glass office building. But when I 
finally found number 113, it was on a small, gray building that looked something 
like my dentist’s office. A little sign on the outside read: 

PERSON-TO-PERSON VACATIONS, 

Suite 2-B 

I opened the door and walked up a flight of steps. At the top, I opened another 
door and went into a kind of waiting room with beige carpeting and tan leather 



chairs. 

A dark-haired woman sat behind a big glass window. She smiled at me 
when I came in, and I walked over to talk to her. 

“Good afternoon,” she said into a microphone. 

I jumped. Even though the woman was right in front of me, her voice came 
out through a speaker on the wall. 

“Uh... um,” I stammered nervously. “I came about the message on the 
electronic bulletin board?” 

“Oh, yes,” the woman replied with another smile. “A lot of people learn 
about us from their computers. Pardon me for staying behind this glass shield. 
But the equipment behind me is so delicate, we have to be very careful about 
protecting it.” 

I peered over the woman’s shoulder. I could see gleaming metal counters 
and a wall of electronic equipment, including what appeared to be heart 
monitors, video screens, X-ray machines, and cameras. It looked like something 
right out of Star Trek! 

I suddenly had a heavy feeling in my stomach. Maybe this is a bad idea, I 
thought. “Y-you probably don’t like kids hanging around in here,” I stammered. I 
started backing away toward the door. 

“Not true,” she said. “Many of our customers are young people such as you. 
A lot of kids are interested in changing places with someone else for a week. 
What did you say your name was?” 

“Gary. Gary Lutz.” 

“Nice to meet you, Gary. My name is Ms. Karmen. How old are you. About 
twelve?” 

I nodded. 

“Come over here for a minute,” Ms. Karmen said, motioning with her hand. 

Cautiously, I walked back over to the glass booth. She opened a little slot at 
the bottom of her window and pushed out a book. I picked it up and saw that it 
was a photo album, like the one my parents have from their wedding. 

I opened it and started looking through it. “It’s kids!” I exclaimed. “All 
about my age.” 

“Correct,” said Ms. Karmen. “They’re all interested in switching lives with 
someone else for a week.” 

“Wow.” I studied the album. 

A lot of the kids in the pictures looked big and strong. And cool. Kids like 



that wouldn’t be afraid of anything, I told myself. I wondered what it would be 
like to be one of them. 

“You can pick a boy—or even a girl, for that matter—to trade places with 
for a week,” Ms. Karmen was saying. 

“But how does it work?” I asked. “Do I just go take over somebody’s room 
and live in his house for a week? Go to his school? Wear his clothes?” 

The woman laughed. “It’s far more interesting than that, Gary. With our 
getaway vacations, you actually become the other person for a week.” 

“Huh?” 

“What we have,” the woman explained, “is a safe, painless way to switch 
one person’s mind into another person’s body. So, while you’ll know you’re 
really you, no one else will recognize you. Not even the other boy’s parents!” 

I was still confused. “But... what about my body? Does it get stored here?” 

“No, no. We here at Person-to-Person will find someone else to take over 
your body for the week. Your parents will never even know you’re gone!” 

I looked down at my skinny body and wondered who could possibly want 
to borrow it for a week. Ms. Karmen leaned forward in her chair. “So what do 
you say? Are you interested, Gary?” 

I stared into her dark brown eyes and swallowed hard. I broke into a cold 
sweat. This whole thing was really weird—and scary! “Uh,” I said. “I don’t 
know. I mean I’m just not sure.” 

“Don’t feel bad,” Ms. Karmen said. “Many people take some time to get 
used to the idea of a body switch. You can think it over for as long as you wish.” 

She took out a small camera. “But in the meantime, would you mind if I 
took your picture? That way, we can find out if anyone is interested in being in 
your body for a week.” 

“Well, I guess it’s okay,” I replied. 

She snapped the picture, and the flash went off in front of my eyes. “But 
I’m still not sure I want to go through with it.” 

“There’s no obligation,” Ms. Karmen said. “Why don’t we leave it this 
way? You fill out a form describing yourself. Then I’ll put your picture into our 
display album. And, when we find someone to take your place, I’ll call you to 
see if you’ve made up your mind.” 

“Okay,” I replied. What harm could that do? I asked myself. There was no 
way she would ever find anybody who’d want my body for a week! 

I spent a few minutes filling out the form. I had to write down my name and 



address. Then I had to tell all about my hobbies, and how well I did in school, 
and things like that. When I was finished, I handed it to Ms. Karmen, said good¬ 
bye, and headed out the door. 

I made it most of the way home without getting into trouble. A block and a 
half from my house, I ran into my three most unfavorite people in the world— 
Barry, Marv, and Karl. 

“Hey, guys!” Barry cried with an ugly smile. “The Klutz is up and walking 
around. That must mean we didn’t do a very good job of pounding him 
yesterday.” 

“No,” I insisted. “You did a good job. You did a very good job, guys!” 

I guess they didn’t believe me. They all jumped me at once. 

When they were finally finished—about five minutes later—I lay on the 
ground and watched them walk away through one swollen black eye. 

“Have a nice day!” Marv called back to me. All three of them roared with 
laughter. 

I sat up and pounded the ground with my fist. 

“I’m sick of this!” I wailed. “I want to be somebody else —anybody else!” 

Slowly and painfully, I dragged myself to my feet. “I’m doing it,” I decided. 
“And nobody’s going to stop me. Tomorrow I’m going to call Person-to-Person 
Vacations. I want them to put me into somebody else’s body. As soon as they 
can!” 



7 


I spent the next few days changing my Band-Aids and hoping the woman from 
Person-to-Person Vacations would call me. 

At first, I ran to answer the phone every time it rang. But of course it was 
never for me. Usually, it was one of Krissy’s dumb friends, wanting to giggle 
and gossip. 

One afternoon, I was reading a science-fiction book in my usual spot 
behind the big maple tree. I heard a sound, and peered around from behind the 
tree. 

Sure enough, there was Mr. Andretti walking across the lawn. He was 
dressed in his beekeeping outfit. As I watched, Mr. Andretti went to the 
screened-in area off the garage and started opening up the little doors to his 
beehives. 

Bzzzzzz. 

I covered my ears, but I couldn’t shut out the loud, droning hum. How I 
hated that sound! It was just so frightening. 

I shivered and decided it was time to go back inside. 

As I climbed to my feet, a bullet-sized object shot right by my nose. A bee! 

Were the bees escaping for real this time? 

I gasped and stared over at Andretti’s house. Then I almost choked. There 
was a big hole in the screen around the beekeeping area. 

A lot of bees were flying out! 

“Ow!” I cried out as a bee landed on the side of my head and buzzed loudly 
into my ear. 

Frantically, I batted it away. Then I ran toward the house. For one wild 
moment, I thought about calling the police or maybe the paramedics. 

But, as I slammed the back door, I heard an all-too-familiar sound. “Haw 
haw haw!” 

Once again, Mr. Andretti was laughing at me. 

I pounded my fist into my other hand. Oh, how I’d like to sock that guy in 
the nose! I thought. 

I was interrupted by the sound of the phone ringing. 

“Give me a break!” I cried as I stomped off to answer it. “Don’t Krissy’s 



moron friends have anything better to do than talk on the phone all day long?” 

“Whaddya want?” I snarled into the mouthpiece. 

“Is this Gary?” a woman’s voice asked. “Gary Lutz?” 

“Uh... yes,” I answered in surprise. “I’m Gary.” 

“Hi, Gary. This is Ms. Karmen. From Person-to-Person Vacations? 
Remember me?” 

My heart started thumping in my chest. “Yes. I remember,” I answered. 

“Well, if you’re still interested, we’ve found a match for you!” 

“A match?” 

“Correct,” said Ms. Karmen. “We’ve found a boy who wants to switch 
bodies with you for a week. Are you interested?” 

I hesitated for a few seconds. But, then, as I gazed out the back door of the 
kitchen, I saw a big, fat bee throwing itself against the outside of our screen 
door. “Haw haw!” Mr. Andretti’s scornful laughter boomed across the back yard. 

My mouth tightened into a thin line. “Yes,” I said firmly. “I’m really 
interested. When can we make the switch?” 

“Why, we could do it now,” said Ms. Karmen. “If that’s all right with you.” 

My pulse raced as I thought. My parents were both out for the afternoon, 
and Krissy was playing at a friend’s house. The timing was perfect. I’d never get 
another chance like this! 

“Now is great!” I exclaimed. 

“Terrific, Gary. It will take me about twenty minutes to get to your house.” 

“I’ll be waiting.” 

The next twenty minutes seemed to take forever. While I waited, I paced back 
and forth in the living room, wondering what my new body would be like. 

What would my new parents be like? My house? My clothes? Would I 
actually have some friends this time around? 

By the time Ms. Karmen arrived, I was a wreck. When the doorbell rang, 
my hand was sweating so much, I could barely turn the doorknob to let her in. 

“Let’s go in the kitchen,” Ms. Karmen suggested. “I like to set up my 
equipment on a table.” She opened a small case and took out some black boxes 
with monitors on them. 

I showed her the way to the kitchen. “So who’s this kid who wants to 
switch places with me?” I asked. 

“His name is Dirk Davis.” 



Dirk Davis! I thought excitedly. Even his name sounded cool. “What does 
he look like?” 

Ms. Karmen opened up a white photo album. “Here’s his picture,” she said, 
passing it to me. 

I looked down at a picture of a tall, athletic-looking blond boy in black 
Lycra bike shorts and a blue muscle shirt. I blinked in surprise. 

“He looks like a surfer or something!” I cried. “Why in the world does he 
want to switch bodies with me? Is this some kind of trick?” 

Ms. Karmen smiled. “Well, to be honest, it’s not exactly your body he’s 
interested in, Gary. He wants your mind. You see, Dirk needs someone who is 
good in math. He has some very hard math tests coming up in summer school. 
He wants you to take them for him.” 

“Oh,” I said. I felt relieved. “Well, I usually do pretty well on math tests.” 

“We know that, Gary. Person-to-Person does its homework. You’re very 
good at math. Dirk’s good at skateboarding.” 

I sat down at the table. 

Bzzzzzz. 

A bee buzzed right under my nose. “Hey!” I yelled, jumping back up. 
“How’d that bee get in here?” 

Ms. Karmen glanced up from her equipment. “Your back door is open just a 
bit. Now please sit down and try to relax. I need to fasten this strap around your 
wrist.” 

With a nervous glance at the back door, I sat back down. Ms. Karmen 
strapped a black band around my wrist. Then she started fiddling with some 
wires attached to one of her machines. 

Bzzzzzz. 

Another bee flew in front of me, and I wiggled around in my chair. 

“Please sit still, Gary. Otherwise the equipment won’t work.” 

“Who can sit still with all these bees buzzing around in here?” I asked. I 
lowered my eyes and saw three fat bees walking across the table. 

Bzzzzzz. 

Another bee flew past my right eye. 

“What’s up with these bees?” I was starting to panic. 

“Don’t pay any attention to them,” Ms. Karmen said, “and they won’t 
bother you.” She made one more adjustment to her machine. “Besides, Dirk 
Davis isn’t afraid of bees. And, as soon as I flip this switch, you won’t be, 



either!” 

“But...!” 

ZZAAAAPPPP! 

A blinding white light flashed in front of my eyes. 
I tried to cry out. 

But my breath caught in my throat. 

The light grew brighter, brighter. 

And then I sank into a deep pool of blackness. 



8 


Something was wrong. 

Colors returned. But they were a total blur. 

I struggled to make everything come clear. But I couldn’t seem to focus on 
anything. 

My new body didn’t feel right, either. I was lying on my back, and I felt 
light as a feather, light enough to float away. 

Could this be Dirk Davis’ tall, muscular body? It certainly didn’t feel like it! 

Was this some kind of trick? I asked myself. Was the picture of Dirk Davis 
a phony? Was he really a lot smaller than he looked in the photo album? 

I reached out one of my hands and tried to touch my stomach. But my hand 
felt really weird, too. It was small, and my arm seemed to be bending in several 
places at once! 

What’s going on? I wondered, trembling with fright. 

Why do I feel so weird? 

“Whooooa!” I cried out as I finally managed to touch my body. “Yuck.” My 
skin was soft. And it was covered with a fine layer of fuzz. 

“Help! Ms. Karmen! Help! Something’s wrong!” I tried to shout. 

But there was something wrong with my voice. It came out all tiny and 
squeaky. Little mouse squeaks. 

I rolled over onto my stomach and tried to get up. I spread my arms to 
balance myself. 

I gasped as I realized my feet weren’t even touching the ground! 

I was flying! 

“What’s happening to me?” I cried in my squeaky little voice. I floated 
forward and crashed into a kitchen cupboard. 

“Ow! Help me!” 

I moved my strange new arms and realized I had some control over which 
way I flew. I felt some weird muscles in my back going into action. Testing my 
new muscles, I flew over to the kitchen window. 

Exhausted, I landed on the sill. I turned my head to one side. Then I gasped 
in fright. 

A hideous monster was reflected in the window glass! 



The creature had two huge glaring eyes. And it was staring right at me. 

I tried to scream. But I was too terrified to utter a sound. 

I—I have to get away! I decided. 

I moved my feet and started to run. The monster in the glass ran, too. 

I stopped and stared at the window glass. The monster stopped and stared 
back at me. 

“Oh, no! Please—no!” I cried. “Please don’t let it be true!” I reached up and 
tried to cover my eyes. The creature in the window did the same thing. 

And suddenly I knew the hideous truth. The monster in the mirror—it was 
me. 

Ms. Karmen had messed up. Totally. 

And now I was trapped inside the body of a bee! 



9 


I don’t know how long I stood there. 

I couldn’t stop staring at my reflection. 

I kept waiting to come out of this nightmare. I kept waiting to blink my 
eyes and find myself in Dirk Davis’ big, muscular body. 

But I didn’t look at all like Dirk Davis. 

I had two giant eyes—one on either side of my head—and two skinny little 
antennas sticking out of my forehead. 

My mouth was truly disgusting. I had some kind of long tongue, which I 
soon discovered I could move all around and make longer and shorter if I 
wanted. Which I didn’t. 

My body was covered with thick, black hair. I had three legs on either side 
of my body. And let’s not forget the wings sticking out of my shoulders! 

“This is the pits!” I cried. “I’m a bug! I’m a disgusting, hairy bug! Ms. 
Karmen—something went wrong! Help me!” 

Creeeeak. 

Slam! 

What was that? 

Oh, no! I realized that Ms. Karmen had just gone out the kitchen door. 

“No—wait! Wait!” I squeaked. She was my only hope! 

I had to catch her. I had to tell her what had happened! 

“Ms. Karmen!” I squeaked. “Ms. Karmen!” 

Frantically, I flew out of the kitchen into the living room. Out the window, I 
could see her car still parked out in front of the house. 

But the front door to the outside was shut. And bees can’t open doors. I was 
trapped inside my own house! 

The back door! I remembered. Ms. Karmen had said it was open just a bit. 

Yes! That was how all those bees got into the house in the first place! 

I fluttered my new wings and flew back into the kitchen. As I soared, I 
realized I was getting more and more control over my flight pattern. 

But I didn’t care about that right now. All I knew was that I had to get to 
Ms. Karmen before she drove away. 



I darted out the tiny opening in the back door. “Ms. Karmen!” I shouted as I 
flew around the side of the house. “Ms. Karmen! Help me! You messed up! I’m 
a bee! Help me!” 

My voice was so tiny, she couldn’t hear me. She opened her car door and 
started to climb behind the wheel. My only chance for a normal life was about to 
drive away! 

What could I do? How could I get her attention? 

Thinking quickly, I flew right toward her head. “Ms. Karmen!” I shouted in 
her ear. “It’s me. Gary!” 

Ms. Karmen uttered a startled cry. Then she drew back her hand and 
swatted me. Hard. 

“Ow!” My entire body vibrated with pain. The force of her swat sent me 
falling to the street. I hit the pavement with a painful splat. 

I shook my head, trying to clear my eyes. That’s when I realized I had an 
extra set of tiny eyes arranged in a kind of triangle on the top of my head. I used 
them to gaze straight up. 

And then I screamed in terror. 

I saw the tire rolling toward me. 

Ms. Karmen was about to drive right over me. I was about to be squashed 
like the bug that I was! 



10 


“Oh!” I froze in panic. 

Even with my blurred bee vision, I could see the deep treads in the tire as it 
rolled steadily toward me. 

Closer. Closer. 

I have to move! I told myself. 

Fly away! Fly away! 

But in my panic, I forgot how to use my new muscles. 

I—Fm going to be squashed! I realized. 

I uttered a final, weak cry. 

And the car stopped. 

“Huh?” My entire body was trembling. But somehow I managed to pull 
myself up. Up into the air. 

Yes. I was flying now. 

I could see Ms. Karmen inside the car. She was fastening her seat belt. She 
had stopped the car to put on her seat belt! 

“Hey, seat belts really do save lives!” I told myself. 

I called out to her. But of course she couldn’t hear me. I watched the car roll 
away until it was a blur of color. 

Then, exhausted and terrified, I buzzed over to a nearby lilac bush and 
dropped onto a leaf. “That was too close!” I told myself, in between gasps for 
air. “I’m going to get killed out here!” 

A green caterpillar inched its way up onto a nearby stem and started 
chewing noisily on the leaf I was resting on. I’d never really examined a 
caterpillar before. Up close, they’re real ugly. They look a little bit like dragons. 
Only scarier. 

“Keep away from me!” I yelled in my tiny voice. The caterpillar didn’t 
even turn its head. Maybe it didn’t hear me. 

I forgot all about the caterpillar when I heard footsteps coming up the front 
walk. I turned my head and used my sideways eye to see who it was. 

“Mom!” I screamed. “Mom! Over here!” 

She couldn’t hear me. She hurried up the steps and into the house. 



Suddenly, I was overcome by a wave of sadness. My own mother didn’t 
recognize me! 

Desperately, I fluttered my wings and flew away from the leaf. I made my 
way to the front of the house, and started buzzing around the front windows. 

I had my wings under complete control by now. But the scene I saw inside 
the house was enough to make me fall down onto the ground again. 

My mother stood in the living room talking to me! Or at least, that’s what 
she thought. Only I knew it couldn’t be me. / was stuck outside. But who was in 
there with my mom? Had Dirk Davis managed to get inside my body? 

I landed on the ledge and stared into the house. My mom was talking. The 
boy was nodding and laughing. He said something to her. If I stared closely, I 
could read his lips. 

“Hey, did you buy taco chips? I’m really starving, Mom.” 

That had to be Dirk talking inside my body. 

My mom smiled at him and patted him on the arm. I read his lips and saw 
that he was calling her “Mom” again. How could he do that? How could he call 
my mother “Mom”? 

If bees could cry—which I now know they can’t—I would have started 
bawling right then and there. Who did that boy think he was? For that matter, 
what kind of mom did I have, who couldn’t even tell that a total stranger was 
living inside her son’s body? 

As I watched “myself” and my mom chatting in the living room, I totally 
lost it. Like a crazed maniac, I started bashing my insect body into the window. 

“Buzz!” I cried. “Buzz! Buzz! Buzz! It’s me, Gary. Look out here! Help 

me!” 

Again and again, I smashed myself up against the glass. But no one inside 
the house noticed. 

After a few minutes, Mom brought the new me a bag of taco chips. I 
watched “Gary” rip the bag open and take out a handful of chips. Crumbs fell on 
the living room carpet as he crunched the spicy chips. 

I realized I was starving. 

But what do bees eat? I asked myself. Desperately, I tried to remember 
everything I’d ever read about the creatures. 

I thought of the hungry caterpillar, crunching away on the leaf. But I was 
almost positive bees didn’t eat leaves. 

But what did they eat? Other bugs? Ugh! The thought made me shudder. I’d 



die before I’d eat a bug! 

I buzzed around the yard, hoping to see something—anything—I could use 
for food. As I flew, I found that I was getting used to my strange new vision and 
learning how to work my different sets of eyes. 

I remembered something I’d once read in an old picture book called The 
Big Book of Bees. It said that bee eyes each have thousands of tiny lenses 
crowded together. But, because they don’t have pupils, they can’t really focus 
their eyes. 

Interesting, I thought. But not very helpful. If I could remember about bees’ 
eyesight, why couldn’t I remember what they ate? 

I settled onto another bush to think. And suddenly, I became aware of a 
wonderful odor nearby. I turned my head and saw a beautiful yellow flower. 

Then I remembered something else I’d read. “Pollen,” I said out loud. 
“Bees eat pollen. And they get it from flowers!” 

Excitedly, I flew up into the air and started hovering over the yellow 
blossom. I tried to open my mouth—before I remembered I didn’t have that kind 
of mouth anymore! 

Instead, I had my long, weird tongue. But how was I supposed to use it to 
get the stuff out of the flower? 

I didn’t have a clue! 

As I hummed around in the air, I realized I was becoming more and more 
exhausted. If I didn’t get something to eat soon, I was going to faint. 

I started to feel dizzy. I hardly knew where I was. 

I became more and more confused. My brain got so fuzzy, I even began to 
wonder if I’d ever actually been a boy at all. Maybe I’d really been a bee for my 
entire life, and I’d just dreamed about being a boy. 

Slam! 

Somebody closed a car door nearby, and I was startled out of my mental 
fog. I swiveled my head to look. 

Dad! 

He was closing the garage door. Now he was walking across the driveway 
and heading toward the back door of the house. 

“Dad!” I screamed. “Dad. It’s me. Gary! Help me!” 

“Hi, Gary,” Dad said. 



11 


“Dad! You can hear me!” I cried joyfully. “Dad—you’ve got to help me!” 

My heart sank when Dad walked right past me and started talking to the 
fake Gary. 

Desperately, I started buzzing round and round their heads. 

“Looks like Andretti’s lost one of his workers,” my dad laughed. He 
swatted at me with his rolled-up newspaper. 

A near miss. I darted away. 

“Uh, right,” the fake Gary laughed, pretending he knew what Dad was 
talking about. “Andretti.” 

“Let’s help get dinner on,” my dad said. He put a friendly hand on my 
former shoulder. “Okay, son?” 

“Sure thing, Dad.” 

Like best pals, my dad and his phony son crossed the lawn and opened the 
screen door. 

“Wait!” I shouted. “Wait!” 

Like a space rocket, I shot through the air after them. If I really put the 
speed on, I thought I could make it through the door before it closed. Fast, faster, 
and... 

BLAM! 

The screen door banged shut, right on top of my tiny bee body. Once again, 
I sank into a deep pool of blackness. 

“Ohhhhhh. Where am I? What happened? Am I still a bee?” 

Dazed, I fought my way back to the real world. When I was able to get my 
eyes open, I realized I was still a bee—a small, frail, slightly damaged bee— 
who’d just narrowly missed being scrunched by a screen door. 

Now I was lying on my back on the grass in our yard. My six legs were 
thrashing the air. 

“I was a klutz as a human—and I’m a klutz as a bee!” I wailed. I tried to 
flip myself over. “I’ve only been a bee for an hour, and I’ve almost been killed. 
Twice!” 

I suddenly knew what I had to do. I had to get to Ms. Karmen’s office and 
tell her what had happened. 



I didn’t know if I could do it. But I knew I had to try. 

I let out a small grunt, and with a huge effort, flipped over onto my 
stomach. Using all five of my eyes, I checked myself out. Both sets of wings 
seemed to be working. And all my six legs were still there. 

“Okay,” I told myself. “You can do it. Just fly to the Person-to-Person office 
and go inside.” 

I flapped my wings and started to take off into the air. But I’d only risen 
about an inch up off the ground when I heard a sound that made my blood run 
cold. 

It was Claus the cat. With his long, sharp claws extended, he leaped through 
the air. 

I let out a squeal as he pounced on me, grabbed me in one paw, and began 
to tighten his claws around my body. 



12 


As the cat’s claws closed around me, I saw his hideous mouth gape open. 

Sting him! Sting him! 

The thought burned into my mind. 

But something held me back. Something told me not to use my stinger. 

I suddenly remembered something else I’d read in The Big Book of Bees. 
Honeybees die once they use their stingers! 

No way! I thought. 

I was still hoping to come out of this alive. And back in my old body. 

So, if using my stinger was out, I’d have to use my wits instead. 

With a loud gnashing of his teeth, Claus snapped his huge mouth shut. He 
lowered his head, preparing to snap up his furry prize—me. 

At just the right moment, I burst out of his claws and ducked out from 
under his gnashing teeth. 

I tried to shoot off through the air. But the cat whipped out his paw and 
batted me down. 

Claus was playing with me as if I were one of the chewed-up catnip mouse 
toys Krissy always gives him for Christmas. 

With my last burst of strength, I spread my wings, shot up through the air, 
and flew as fast as I could. A backwards look out of one of my eyes told me that 
I’d left the surprised cat sitting in the grass. 

For one second, I experienced a wonderful sensation of triumph. “You did 
it, Gary!” I crowed to myself. “You, a tiny little bee, managed to fight off a great 
big vicious cat!” 

I was so pleased with myself, I decided to take a little victory lap. I spread 
my wings out wide and began a big, slow circle in the air. 

Whap! 

Oh, no! Now what? 

I’d crashed right into something! But what was it? It wasn’t hard, like a 
wall or a tree. Instead, it was soft and clinging, like cloth. And my feet were all 
tangled up in it. 

I struggled to squirm free. I wiggled and pushed. But my legs were caught. 

I was trapped. 



“Haw haw haw!” 

The booming laughter made my entire body shake. 

I suddenly realized where I was. 

I was caught in Andretti’s net. 

A wave of despair made me slump against the white netting. 
I knew exactly what would happen next. 

He would put me in his hives—and I would never get away. 



13 


“Time to go back home now, my little buzzing babies,” Mr. Andretti sang. “Time 
to get back to work, my honeys.” He started to laugh at his stupid pun. “My 
honeys! Haw haw! Oh, my, wasn’t that a good one?” 

Bzzzzz. Bzzzzzzz. 

From the loud humming sounds in my ears, I knew I wasn’t the only bee 
Andretti had caught in his net. In fact, out of my right eye, I could see another 
bee who looked just like me. He loomed right in front of me, and wiggled his 
antennas in my face. 

Whooa! What a monster! 

My wiry legs began trembling with fright. I twisted myself around and 
around, struggling to get away from him. 

I finally got myself turned the other way. But then I saw I was facing 
another bee. And another. Each one looked scarier than the last. 

They all had big, bulging eyes and creepy antennas! And they all buzzed 
menacingly at me. 

The frightening hum grew louder and louder as Mr. Andretti caught more 
bees in the net. Suddenly, the net began to shake. Up and down, up and down— 
like a violent earthquake—until I couldn’t even think straight! 

As the net shook, I lost my footing and fell into a big, squirming cluster of 
bees at the bottom of the net. 

Whooooa! I stumbled over the pile of wriggling, hairy bees. And as I 
staggered in terror, bees fell on top of me. 

A crawling, buzzing nightmare! 

I’ve never been so terrified. I screamed in my tiny voice. I tried to climb up 
the side of the net, but my feet were stuck under another bee’s body. How I hated 
the feel of his disgusting fuzz! 

In my terror, I knew I had to escape. I had to get away from here. I had to 
get to Ms. Karmen’s office and beg her to help me. 

Then I had the most terrifying thought of all. If I couldn’t escape, I 
suddenly realized, I would remain a bee for the rest of my life! 

As Mr. Andretti carried me and the other bees across his back yard, I started 
buzzing and shivering with panic. How could this have happened to me? I asked 



myself. How could I ever have been so stupid as to try to change bodies with 
somebody else? Why wasn’t I happy with the perfectly good body I’d already 
had? 

Mr. Andretti opened the door to the screened-in area off the side of his 
garage. “We’re back now, my little honeys,” he cooed. 

The net started to shake, and I figured out that Mr. Andretti was slowly 
turning it inside out. One by one, he started plucking us—his prisoners—off the 
side of the mesh cloth and plopping each one back inside his hanging drawer 
hives. 

As Andretti reached for the bees, they started buzzing louder than ever. 
Finally, it was my turn to be plucked out of the net. 

When I saw the ends of Andretti’s grasping fingers reaching for me, I hung 
back, clinging to the net. I suddenly remembered his bragging speech about how 
he never used gloves because his bees “trusted” him. 

I watched his fingers stretch toward me. 

It would be so cool to plunge my stinger into his soft, plump skin, I thought. 

Should I do it? 

Should I sting him? 

Should I? 



14 


I didn’t sting him. 

I really didn’t want to die. 

Sure, things really looked terrible for me right now. But I was still clinging 
to a shred of hope. 

Maybe, somehow, I’d find my way out of this bee prison and back into my 
own body. It didn’t seem very likely. But I was determined to keep on trying. 

“In you go, my fuzzy little friend,” Mr. Andretti said. He opened up one of 
the removable drawerlike parts of his hive and dropped me in. 

“Ohhhh,” I moaned. It was so dark inside the hive. And so confusing. 

Where should I go? What should I do? 

The air was hot and wet. Everywhere I turned, I was surrounded by a 
deafening, droning hum. 

“I—I can’t stand it!” I cried. I could feel myself totally losing it! 

All around me, bees scurried around in the darkness. I stayed where I was, 
too frightened to move. 

I suddenly realized I was still very hungry. If I didn’t get something to eat, I 
knew I’d never be able to find a way out of here! 

I spun around and started trying to explore. 

Out of my left eye, I saw another bee glaring at me. I froze in my tracks. 
Did bees attack each other inside their hives? I wondered. 

I didn’t remember reading anything about that in my bee book. But this bee 
really looked ready for a fight. 

“Please leave me alone,” I begged in my tiny voice. “Please give me a 
break.” 

The bee glared back at me. I’ve never seen such big, angry-looking eyes! 

Slowly, I started backing away from him. “Uh...” I squeaked nervously. 
“I’ve got to be going now. I... um... I have to get to work.” 

The bee bulged his eyes and waved his antennas in a threatening way. I was 
sure he planned to sting me. I turned and flew away as fast as I could. I tried to 
hide. 

I was so frightened, I couldn’t even make myself move. What if I bumped 
into another bee? I couldn’t even stand to think about what might happen if I did. 



I realized I had to move. I had to find something to eat. 

Shaking with fear, I tiptoed out into the open. I took a nervous look around. 

On the far wall, I could see a large cluster of bees, busily building 
something. A honeycomb! 

And where there was a honeycomb, I told myself, there was honey. 

I’ve always hated the sweet, sticky goo. But I knew I had to eat some. Right 
away! 

As quietly as I could, I crept over and joined the bee workers. Out of the 
corner of my eye, I saw them doing really gross things with their mouths. 

First, they used their legs to pick little flakes of waxy-looking stuff off their 
abdomens. Then they crammed the wax into their mouths and started working 
their jaws up and down like little chewing machines. Finally, they spit out the 
wax and used it to build part of the honeycomb they were working on. 

“Yuck!” It looked so disgusting. It made me sick! 

But what choice did I have? I had to eat some honey—even if it was 
covered with bee spit. 

I turned my head and practiced sucking my tongue up and down. Then I 
slurped up a big puddle of honey. 

Amazing! For the first time in my life, I actually liked that stuff. Soon, I 
was sucking it down as if it were chocolate milk. 

After a while, I got quite good with my tongue, which was actually more of 
a bendable tube than a tongue. It was really the perfect tool for guzzling honey. 

If I ever made it back to the outside world, I thought I’d now be pretty good 
at using it for gathering nectar and pollen. Why, I might turn out to be the best 
worker in the whole hive! 

I tried to smile, and then I almost gagged on my honey. 

What was happening to me? 

What was I thinking? I was actually starting to feel like a bee! 

I had to get out of this place. Before it was too late! 

I wanted to start searching for an escape route right away. But I suddenly 
felt so tired. So completely worn out... 

Was it the honey? Or was it the strain of so much fear? 

I could barely keep my eyes open. The droning hum grew louder. 

With a weary sigh, I sank against a clump of hairy bodies. 

I sank into the warm darkness of the hive, surrounded by the steady buzz. 
Breathing the sweet aroma of the honey, I sank beside my furry brothers and 



sisters. 

I’m one of them now, I told myself weakly. I’m not a boy anymore. I’m 
bee. A buzzzzzzzzzing bee. A bee sinking into the warm, dark hive. My home. 
Sinking... sinking... 



15 


I woke up with a start and tried to brush a bee away from my face. It took me a 
few moments to remember. I wasn’t lying in my back yard anymore, trying to 
keep the bees away from me. I was a bee—a bee trapped inside a hive! 

I jumped up, took a step, and immediately came face to face with another 
bee! I couldn’t tell if he was the same one I’d seen the night before. But he 
looked just as angry. His big eyes were bulging with rage. And he was moving 
deliberately toward me. 

As fast as I could, I spun around and flew away. Of course, I had no idea 
where I was going. 

The hive seemed to be made up of a lot of long, dark hallways. All around 
me, groups of bees were building honeycombs. As they worked, they kept up a 
steady buzz. The sound was really driving me off the wall! 

I began searching for a way out. I wandered in and out, in and out 
throughout the dark, sticky honeycombs. 

From time to time, I shot out my tongue and lapped up some honey. I was 
getting a little tired of the sweet stuff. But I knew I had to keep up my strength if 
I wanted to try to break out of the hive. 

As I searched for a way to escape, I noticed that every single bee seemed to 
have an assigned job, either building honeycombs, caring for the babies of the 
queen or whatever. And the little bugs never stopped working! They were “busy 
as bees” from morning till night. 

Darting through the tangled darkness, I began to lose hope. 

There’s no way out, I decided. No way out. 

I sank unhappily to the sticky hive floor. And as I dropped, three large bees 
moved in front of me. 

They buzzed angrily, bumping up against me with their hairy, damp bodies. 
It was easy to tell these bees were angry with me. 

Maybe it was because I wasn’t doing my “job.” But what was my job? How 
could I tell the bees I didn’t know what I was supposed to be doing? 

I tried to slip past them, but they moved to block my path. 

Three tough bees. They made me think of Barry, Marv, and Karl. 

I shrank back as one of them pointed his stinger at me. 



He was getting ready to kill me! And I didn’t even know what I’d done! 

I screamed and whirled around. As fast as my six legs would carry me, I 
darted back down the narrow passageway and turned another corner. 

“Oh!” I bumped hard into another bee. Luckily, he was hurrying off 
somewhere, and barely seemed to notice me. 

I gasped with relief. And then an idea came to me. Where was that bee 
going in such a hurry? Was he taking something somewhere? Could he be going 
to an area I hadn’t searched yet? 

I decided to follow him and find out. I needed to learn everything I could 
about the hive. Maybe, just maybe, it would help me escape. 

I hurried after the bee. I thought I’d find him quickly. But he was already 
long gone. 

I searched in and out among the different honeycombs, but I couldn’t find 
him anywhere. After a while, I gave up. 

Way to go, Lutz the Klutz, I scolded myself. I felt worse than ever. 

I shot out my tongue and slurped up a big helping of honey to keep myself 
going. Then I began my endless searching again. 

“Whoooa!” I stopped when I reached an area that looked familiar. I was 
pretty sure it was the place where Andretti had dropped me when he first put me 
into the hive. 

All at once, a large group of angrily buzzing bees crowded against me. 

“Hey—!” I protested as they shoved me forward. 

They replied with a sharp, rising buzz. 

What were they doing? Were they attacking me? Were they all going to 
sting me at once? 

They had me surrounded. I couldn’t run away. 

But how could I possibly fight off all these bees? I was doomed, I realized. 
Finished. Sighing in defeat, I closed my eyes and started to shake. 

And waited for them to swarm over me. 



16 


I waited to be crushed. 

And waited some more. 

When I opened my eyes, the angry bees had moved to the side of the hive. 
They weren’t paying any attention to me. 

I saw a single bee, standing in the center of the hive floor. He was 
performing a kind of jumping, twisting, hip-hop dance. 

How weird! I thought. The other bees were watching intently, as if this were 
the most interesting thing in the world. 

“Those bees didn’t care about me,” I told myself. “They were trying to get 
me out of the way so this bee could do his dance.” 

I realized I’d wasted a lot of time. I had to keep searching for an escape 
route. 

I tried to push myself away from the group of bees, but the hive floor had 
become too crowded to move. 

The bee danced faster and faster. He moved his body toward the right. All 
the other bees stared intently at him. 

What was going on? 

At that moment, something from my old Big Book of Bees came back to 
me. I remembered that bees send out scouts to find their food. Then the scouts 
“dance” to tell the other bees where to go get it! 

If the scout was reporting on where to get food, it meant he’d just been out 
of the hive. That meant there had to be a way out of this place! 

I was so excited, / almost started dancing! 

But I didn’t have a chance because, suddenly, all the bees in the hive rose 
up like a dark cloud. I spread my wings and flew up with them. 

As I followed, the bees formed a single, orderly line and shot out through a 
tiny hole in a far, upper corner of the hive. 

I buzzed around until I found the end of the line. Then I got ready to escape. 

Would I make it? 

The very last bee in line, I shot out of the tiny hole into open space. For a 
few seconds, I watched the other bees floating away, busily hunting for nectar 
and pollen. 



I knew I looked just like them. The difference was that they would willingly 
return to Andretti’s hive. But I never, ever would. At least, not if I could help it. 

“I’m out!” I cried joyfully in my tiny voice. “I’m out! I’m free!” 

Dazzled by the sudden bright light of the outer world, I flew around and 
around in the beekeeping area. Then I headed for the hole I’d seen in the screen 
when I was still in my own body. 

I knew it was on the wall that faced my family’s yard. But when I flew over 
to it, I stopped and gasped in disappointment. 

The hole had been patched up. Mr. Andretti had fixed it! 

“Oh, no!” I wailed. “I can’t be trapped! I can’the!” 

My heart started thumping crazily. My whole body was vibrating. 

I forced myself to calm down and look around. 

None of the other bees were in the screened-in area anymore. They’d 
already gone outside to collect pollen. And that meant there had to be another 
way out. 

I wasn’t thinking clearly because I was exhausted, worn out from all my 
flying around. I sat down on top of the hive to rest. 

At that instant, the door between the beekeeping area and the garage 
opened. “Good morning, my little bee friend,” Mr. Andretti’s voice boomed. 
“What are you doing, lying around on top of the hive? Why aren’t you busy 
inside making me some honey? Are you sick? You know we can’t have any sick 
bees around here.” 

As I gazed up weakly, Mr. Andretti moved closer. His huge, dark shadow 
fell over me. 

I tried to curl up into a ball and disappear. But it was no use. His large 
fingers were stretching right toward me! 

I yelled in terror. But of course, he couldn’t hear me. What is he going to do 
to me? I asked myself. What does he do with sick bees? 



17 


What does he do with sick bees? I wondered again, quivering in terror. 

He probably throws them in the garbage, I thought. Or even worse—he 
feeds them to his pet bird or frog. 

Despite my weariness, I knew I couldn’t wait around to find out. I had to 
get out of there! 

Just as Mr. Andretti’s fingers were about to fold around me, I shot up into 
the air and buzzed around his head. At the same instant, I saw some other bees 
flying in through a tiny hole in the screen. It was in the corner, near the ceiling. 

I buzzed Mr. Andretti’s face one more time. Then I raced toward the hole. 
As I tried to squeeze myself out the exit hole, I crashed right into another bee 
who was flying in. He glared at me and gave me an angry buzz. 

Frightened, I backed off and clung to the screen. I had to wait for a long 
fine of bees to come back inside. It seemed to take them forever. 

When I was finally sure the last bee had come in, I leaped forward and shot 
out of the hole. I was out in the open sky! 

“This time I really am free!” I screamed in celebration, forgetting my 
weariness. “And Andretti’s never going to catch this bee again!” 

I landed on a leaf and let the morning sun warm my back and wings. It was 
a beautiful day—a beautiful day for finding somebody who could help me get 
back into my human body! 

Like a rocket, I shot straight up into the air and gazed around. I recognized 
the familiar creak of my father opening the back door of my house. 

Panting hard, I raced forward. 

My father called, “Good-bye, hon! Tell the kids I’ll see them tonight!” over 
his shoulder and let go of the door. 

I darted into the house. The door slammed hard. Another near miss. 

I hummed with happiness. It felt so good to be back in my own house and 
out of that dark, sticky hive! I landed on the counter and gazed around at the old, 
familiar walls. 

Why hadn’t I ever realized how nice my house was before? 

Step, step, step. 

Someone was coming into the kitchen! I flew up onto the windowsill for a 



better look. 

Krissy! 

Maybe I could get her to listen to me. 

“Krissy! Krissy!” I buzzed. “Over here by the window. It’s me, Gary!” 

To my delight, she turned and stared in my direction. 

“Yes!” I cried excitedly. “Yes—it’s me! It’s me!” 

“Oh, terrific,” Krissy groaned. “One of Andretti’s dumb bees got in here 
again.” 

Okay, so it wasn’t exactly the reaction I’d been hoping for. But she’d still 
noticed me! Maybe, I thought, if I flew right onto her shoulder and spoke into 
her ear, she’d be able to understand me! 

My heart vibrating my entire body, I lifted myself up off the windowsill and 
soared toward my sister. “Krissy!” I buzzed as I approached her shoulder. “You 
have to listen to me!” 

“Aaaaiii!” 

Krissy screeched so loud, I was afraid the glass in the windows would 
shatter. “Get away from me, bee!” 

She started thrashing her hands in the air, trying to bat me away. 

“Ow!” I cried out as she slapped me. Stung with pain, I lost control and 
landed with a thud on the tiled countertop. 

I raised my eyes in time to see Krissy grab a flyswatter from out of the 
broom closet. 

“No, Krissy, no!” I screamed. “Not that! You don’t want to do that to your 
own brother!” 

My sister lifted up the flyswatter and thwacked it down right next to me. I 
could feel the rush of air from it. And I felt the entire counter shake. 

I screamed and quickly rolled to one side. 

Krissy, I knew, was a menace with a flyswatter. 

She was the champion in our family. She never missed. 

The eyes on top of my head spun in terror. And in the gray blur, I could see 
the shape of the flyswatter, rising up to slap me again. And again. 



18 


“Stop, Krissy!” I screamed. “Stop! You’re squashing me!” 

With a strangled gasp, I toppled off the counter. I hit the floor hard and 
struggled dizzily to my feet. 

Now I started to get angry. Why did Krissy have to be so bloodthirsty? 
Couldn’t she just open a window and shoo me out? 

Buzzing weakly, I floated up off the floor. Regaining my strength, I began 
darting wildly around the room, crashing into the walls and cupboards to show 
Krissy how upset I was. Then I shot out of the kitchen. 

In a rage, I headed up the stairs to my room. If my sister wouldn’t help me, 
I’d get someone else to help. Namely, the new Gary! 

The morning sun was high in the sky. But “Gary” was still sound asleep in 
my bed. 

Seeing him lying there so peacefully, so completely at home, made me even 
angrier. 

“Wake up, you slug!” I buzzed at him. He didn’t move. His mouth hung 
open as he slept, making him look like a real jerk. 

“Yuck! What a creep!” I was sure my mouth never hung open when I slept! 

I decided to take action. I landed on “Gary’s” head and started walking 
around on his face. I was sure my little insect legs would tickle him and wake 
him up. 

Nothing. He didn’t move. 

Even when I stuck a leg up his nose, “Gary” slept without stirring. 

“Why is he so wrecked?” I wondered. “Has he been wearing out my body?” 

Furious, I ran across “Gary’s” face and climbed down through his hair. 
Then I crawled onto his ear. “BUZZ!” I shouted as loudly as I could. “BUZZ! 
BUZZ! BUZZ!” 

Incredible as it seems, the new “Gary” didn’t even budge. 

Just my luck. Dirk Davis was turning out to be the world’s soundest 
sleeper! 

I sighed and gave up. I crawled off “Gary’s” ear and flew around my old 
room, gazing down at my bed, my dresser, and my computer. 

“My computer!” I cried excitedly. “Maybe I can put a message on the 



screen! Maybe I can tell my parents what has happened to me!” 

I swooped down to the computer, buzzing eagerly. 

Yes! The computer had been left on. 

What luck! I knew I wasn’t heavy enough to push the Power button. 

Would I be strong enough to type? 

A clear blue screen greeted me on the monitor. My heart pounding, I 
lowered myself to the keyboard and started hopping around on the letters. 

Yes! I was heavy enough to make the keys go up and down. 

I paused, resting on the Enter key. 

What should I type? What message should I put on the screen? 

What? What? What? 

As I frantically thought, I heard “Gary” stir behind me on the bed. He let 
out a groan. He was waking up. 

Quick! I told myself. Type something! Type anything! 

He’ll see it as soon as he gets out of bed. 

I hopped over to the letters and began to jump up and down, spelling out 
my desperate message. 

It was hard work. My bee eyes weren’t made for reading letters. And I kept 
leaping up and falling in the cracks between the keys. 

After eight or nine jumps, I was gasping for air. 

But I finished my message just as “Gary” sat up in bed and stretched. 
Floating up in front of the monitor, I struggled to read what I had typed: 

I AM NOT BEE. I AM GARY. HELO ME. 

Through my blurred vision, I saw that I missed the P in HELP and hit the O 
instead. I wanted to go back and fix it. But I was totally wiped out. I could barely 
buzz. 

Would they understand? 

Would they read the message and see me standing on top of the monitor and 
understand? 

“Gary” would understand. I knew he would. Dirk Davis would figure it out. 
I climbed wearily to the top of the monitor and watched him climb out of 

bed. 

Here he comes, I saw eagerly. He brushed his hair out of his eyes. He 
yawned. He stretched again. 



Over here! I urged. 

Dirk — please—check out the computer monitor! 

Dirk—over here! 

He picked up a crumpled pair of jeans off the floor and pulled them on. 
Then he found a wrinkled T-shirt to go with it. 

Come on, Dirk! I pleaded, hopping up and down on top of the monitor. 
Read the screen—please ? 



19 


Would he read it? 

Yes! Rubbing his eyes, “Gary” shuffled over to the computer. 

Yes! Yes! 

I nearly burst for joy as I watched him squint at the screen. “Go ahead, 
Gary! Read it! Read it!” I squeaked. 

He squinted at the screen some more, frowning. “Did I leave that thing on 
overnight?” he muttered, shaking his head. “Wow. I must be losing it.” 

He reached down and clicked off the power. Then he turned and made his 
way out of the room. 

Stunned, I toppled off the monitor, landing hard on the desk beside the 
keyboard. All that work for nothing. 

What was “Gary’s” problem, anyway? Doesn’t he know how to read? 

I’ve got to talk to him, I told myself, pulling myself together. I’ve got to 
communicate with him somehow. 

I lifted my wings and floated up after him. I followed him through the 
kitchen, and then slipped through the back door with him. 

As he strode across the grass, I started buzzing around his head. But he 
didn’t pay any attention to me. 

He crossed the yard and opened our garage door. Then he went inside and 
brought out my old skateboard. 

I hadn’t used that skateboard in at least two years. My uncle had given it to 
me for my tenth birthday, and I almost broke my leg trying to ride it. After that, I 
put it away and refused to touch it again. 

“Don’t get on that thing!” I yelled at “Gary”. “It’s dangerous. You might 
hurt my body. And I want it back in one piece!” 

Of course “Gary” didn’t even notice me. Instead, he carried the skateboard 
out in front of the house and put it down on the ground. 

A short while later, Kaitlyn and Judy walked up the sidewalk. I waited for 
them to start giggling and making fun of the new me. 

“Hi, Gary,” Kaitlyn said. She brushed some curly hair off her forehead and 
smiled. “Are we late for our skateboarding lesson?” 

“Gary” flashed her a big smile. “No way, Kaitlyn,” he answered in my 



voice. “Want to head over to the playground like we did yesterday?” 

I couldn’t believe my ears. Skateboarding lesson? Head over to the 
playground like we did yesterday? What was going on around here? 

“I hope you don’t mind, Gary,” Judy said. “We told some of the other kids 
—like Gail and Louie—how good you are. They all said they can’t wait to take a 
lesson from you, too. Is that okay? Because if it isn’t, we can call them, and—” 

“No problem, Jude,” “Gary” broke in. “Let’s get going, okay?” The new 
“me” hopped onto his skateboard and smoothly rolled his way down the 
sidewalk. Judy and Kaitlyn hurried after him. 

For a second, I was too shocked to move. But then I decided to follow 
them. 

As I swooped after them, I kept muttering to myself, “I can’t believe it! 
Lutz the Klutz is giving skateboard lessons at the playground? Everybody’s 
waiting for him to show up? What is going on?” 

A few minutes later, the four of us had reached the playground. Sure 
enough, a whole gang of kids was waiting there for “Gary”. He put down his 
skateboard and started giving everybody pointers on “boarding”, as he called it. 

I buzzed over to him and started shouting in his ear again. “Dirk!” I 
shouted. “Dirk Davis! It’s me. The real Gary Lutz!” 

Very casually, he swatted me away. 

I tried to speak to him again. This time he swatted me really hard, sending 
me spinning to the ground. 

Trying to shake off the pain, I gave up. Dirk isn’t going to help me, I 
realized. 

Ms. Karmen is my only hope. After all, she was the one with all the 
equipment. She was the only person who could reverse what she had done. 

I flew onto a tree and tried to figure out which way to fly. When you’re an 
insect, everything looks different to you. Things that seem small to a person 
appear huge to a bee. So I wanted to be sure I didn’t get myself mixed up and fly 
off in the wrong direction. 

Standing on a big leaf, I gazed up and down the block until I was sure I 
knew which way to go. As I got ready to take off, a large shadow suddenly 
loomed over my head. At first, I thought it was a small bird. But then I realized it 
was a dragonfly. 

“Stay calm,” I told myself. “A dragonfly is an insect, isn’t it? And insects 
don’t eat each other, right?” 



I guess no one had told the dragonfly. 

Before I could move, it zoomed down, wrapped its teeth around my middle, 
and bit me in two. 



20 


I uttered a last gasp and waited for everything to go dark. 

It took me a few seconds to realize that the dragonfly had turned and 
buzzed off in the other direction. 

My imagination was running away with me. That’s what always happened 
when I got overtired. 

I took a deep breath, grateful to still be in one piece. I decided I had to use 
my remaining strength to get to Ms. Karmen at the Person-to-Person Vacations 
office. 

I rose up into the air, looked both ways for oncoming dragonfly traffic, then 
fluttered away. 

After a long, tiring trip, I floated past a street sign that told me I’d made it 
to the right block. Roach Street. 

I buzzed along the sidewalk until I came to the Person-to-Person building. 
Then I sat down on the stoop and tried to figure out how I was going to get 
inside. 

Luckily, as I rested on the warm cement, I saw a mailman marching up the 
street, stopping at each house along his route. Quickly, I flew over to the Person- 
to-Person entrance and checked it out. Just as I’d hoped, there was a mail slot in 
the middle of the door. 

I buzzed over to the doorknob, and waited for my chance. Slowly, the 
mailman trudged up to the building. 

“Hurry up!” I screamed at him. “Do you think I have all day here?” Of 
course he couldn’t hear me. 

He fumbled around in his bag and pulled out a bundle of letters. Then, 
slowly, he reached out and pushed open the mail slot. 

Before the mailman had a chance to react, I swooped down in front of his 
nose and buzzed right through the mail slot. As I zipped along, I heard him gasp, 
and I knew he’d seen me. But for once, luck was with me. I moved so quickly, 
there hadn’t been any time for the mailman to try to swat me. 

My luck held when I flew up the stairs. 

I’d just reached the top when the door to Person-to-Person Vacations 
opened, and a girl about my age came out. She had long, curly red hair and had a 



serious, thoughtful expression on her face. Was she thinking of trading places 
with someone? 

“Go home!” I shouted at her. “And don’t come back. Stay away from this 
place! Just look what happened to me!” 

Even though I was screaming, the girl didn’t even turn her head. But she 
left the door open just long enough for me to buzz into the Person-to-Person 
office. 

I flew across the waiting room and saw Ms. Karmen, sitting in the same 
chair she’d been in when I first met her. 

I shot right toward her—and smacked into something hard. 

Pain roared through my body. I dropped to the floor, dizzy and confused. 

As my head began to clear, I remembered the glass wall separating Ms. 
Karmen from the waiting area. Like some kind of brainless June bug, I’d crashed 
right into it! 

I shook myself to clear my mind. “Ms. Karmen!” I yelled. “Ms. Karmen. 
It’s me—Gary Lutz. Look what happened! Can you help me? Can you?” 



21 


Ms. Karmen didn’t even glance up from her paperwork. Once again, I realized 
no one could hear my squeaky insect voice. 

With a defeated moan, I sank down onto the seat of the chair and curled up 
into a tiny ball. I’d come all this way for nothing, I realized. I’d found the one 
person in the world who might be able to help me. And she couldn’t even hear 
me! 

“I give up,” I whispered sadly. “It’s hopeless. I have to get used to the idea 
of being a bee forever! There’s no way I’ll ever get my old body back.” 

I had never been so miserable in all my life. I wished someone would come 
along, drop into the chair, and sit on me! 

A strange sound startled me from my unhappy thoughts. I sat up straight 
and listened hard. 

“Whoo-ah. Whoo-ah. ” It almost sounded like someone breathing. But how 
could that be? It was so loud! 

I floated up off the chair and buzzed around the room, trying to find out 
where the sound was coming from. I had circled the room twice before I figured 
it out. 

Ms. Karmen was bending over to pick up something she’d dropped on the 
floor. Her nose and mouth were only inches from the top of her desk. And the 
microphone she used to talk to people had picked up the sounds of her breathing! 

Suddenly, I had a brilliant idea. If I could get to the other side of the glass, I 
could use the microphone to make Ms. Karmen hear me. 

I swooped over to the wall and flew straight up to the ceiling. No luck 
there. The sheet of glass went all the way up. There was no space for me to 
wedge myself through to the other side. 

I buzzed down to the place where the glass met the top of Ms. Karmen’s 
desk. Yes! There was a small slot in the glass. I remembered how she had passed 
through the book of photographs on my first visit to the office. 

The slot wasn’t very large. But it was plenty big enough for my round little 
bee body. 

I shot through the hole and jumped up on top of the microphone. 

“Ms. Karmen!” I shouted, putting my mouth next to the hard metal. “Ms. 



Karmen!” 

Her eyes opened wide. Her mouth dropped open in confusion. She stared 
out into the waiting room, searching for the person speaking. 

“It’s Gary Lutz!” I called out. “And I’m down here on your microphone.” 

Ms. Karmen stared down at the microphone. Then her eyes narrowed in 
fear. “What’s going on? Who’s doing this? Is this a joke?” 

“No!” I cried. “It’s no joke at all. It’s really me—Gary Lutz!” 

“But—but—” she stammered, but no other words came out. “What’s the 
joke? How are you doing that?” 

Her voice was so loud, the sound waves nearly blasted me off the 
microphone. 

“You don’t have to yell!” I cried. “I can hear you.” 

“I don’t believe this!” she exclaimed in a trembling voice. She stared down 
at me. 

“It’s all your fault!” I shouted angrily. “You messed up the transfer 
operation. When you made the switch, one of my neighbor’s bees must have 
gotten into the machine. So, instead of putting me into Dirk Davis’ body, you put 
me into a bee! ” 

Ms. Karmen blinked. Then she slapped her forehead. “Well that explains 
it!” she cried. “That explains why Dirk Davis’ body has been behaving so 
strangely.” 

She picked up some papers on her desk and started putting them into her 
briefcase. “I really must apologize,” she said. “I feel really bad, Gary. We’ve 
never had a mix-up like this before. I hope... I hope it’s at least been interesting 
for you.” 

“Interesting?” I shrieked. “It’s been a nightmare! You wouldn’t believe 
what I’ve been through. I’ve been attacked by screen doors, cats, flyswatters— 
you name it! You yourself almost ran me over with your car!” 

All the color drained from her face. “Oh, no,” she cried, her voice a 
whisper. “I’m so sorry. I—I didn’t know.” 

“Well, what about it?” I asked her impatiently. 

“What about what?” 

“What about getting me back into my body! Can you do it right away?” 

Ms. Karmen cleared her throat. “Well, I could,” she replied slowly. 
“Normally, I could transfer you right back. But there’s a slight problem in your 
case.” 



“What kind of problem?” I demanded. 

“It’s Dirk Davis,” Ms. Karmen replied. “It seems he’s become very attached 
to your old body. He likes your house and your parents, too. In fact, he even 
likes your sister, Krissy!” 

“So?” I cried. “So what’s that supposed to mean?” 

Ms. Karmen stood up and pushed in her desk chair. “It means,” she said, 
“that Dirk Davis is refusing to give up your old body. He says he absolutely 
won’t go back to his old life. He plans to keep your body forever.” 



22 


“WHAT?” I screamed, hopping up and down angrily on the microphone. 

“Just what I said,” Ms. Karmen said. “Dirk Davis wants to keep your body 
for the rest of his life.” 

“But he can’t do that, can he?” 

“It is very upsetting,” she replied, biting her lower lip. “It wasn’t what he 
said in our original agreement. But if he refuses to get out of your body and your 
life, there’s really nothing I can do.” 

Ms. Karmen gazed down at me sympathetically. “I’m so sorry about this, 
Gary,” she said softly. “I guess I’ll have to be more careful in the future.” 

“What about my future? What am I supposed to do now?” I wailed. 

Ms. Karmen shrugged. “I don’t know. Maybe you could go back, wait in 
the hive—and maybe Dirk Davis will change his mind.” 

“Back to the hive?!” My antennas stood straight on end, quivering with 
rage. “Do you have any idea what it’s like in there? Cramped together with those 
hairy bees in the darkness? Listening to that deafening buzz day and night?” 

“It’s a way of staying alive,” Ms. Karmen replied bluntly. 

“I—I don’t care!” I stammered. “I’m never going back there! Never!” 

“This is tragic. Tragic!” Ms. Karmen cried. “I’ll give your case some 
thought tonight, Gary. I promise. Maybe I can come up with a way of getting 
your body away from Dirk.” 

She crossed the room and opened the office door. “I’m so upset. So upset,” 
she murmured. Then she disappeared out the door, slamming it behind her. 

Trembling with anger at Dirk Davis, I hopped down to the desk. “Hey, 
wait!” I called after her. “You’ve locked me in!” 

Ms. Karmen was so upset, she forgot about me! 

I rose up into the air and started after her. But, then, I happened to glance 
back down at her desk. Dirk Davis’ questionnaire was right on top of a pile of 
papers. His address was next to his name. He lived at 203 Eastwood Avenue. 

Eastwood Avenue was near the computer store, so I knew where it was. 
“Maybe the old Dirk Davis will know how to get my body back!” I told myself. 

It was worth a try. I ducked through the slot in the glass and flew around the 
waiting room. 



No exit. No open window. No crack in the door. 

Once again, I was trapped. 

Frantically, I buzzed all around the waiting room. Then I went back through 
the slot in the glass. I checked out the whole equipment room. Every window 
was closed tight. 

I flew past a calendar and happened to see the date. “Oh, no!” I cried. “It’s 
Friday! It’s the weekend. Ms. Karmen might not come back to work for two 
whole days.” 

In two days, I realized, I would starve to death! 

I had to get out! I went over to the far wall and noticed another door I 
hadn’t seen before. I zipped through it. 

The room turned out to be a tiny bathroom. With one small window. Which 
was open just a crack. It was all I needed. 

“Hurray!” I yelled. I shot out through the window and sailed into the open 
air. Then I turned right and headed for Eastwood Avenue. Luckily, it wasn’t very 
far away. All this flying around was really beginning to wear me out. 

I found Dirk Davis’ house without any trouble. When I got there, I saw 
“Dirk” himself—or whoever he was now—standing in the front yard. I 
recognized him from the picture I’d seen in the Person-to-Person album. 

“Hey!” I yelled to him. “Hey, er... Dirk!” 

The tall, good-looking boy turned around and stared at me. His mouth 
moved, and it looked as if he was saying something. 

But I couldn’t understand any words. All I heard was a humming sound. 

“I’m Gary Lutz!” I cried in my little voice. “Can you help me get Dirk 
Davis out of my body?” 

The boy stared at me. Then he grinned. 

I was confused. What was he grinning about? 

“Hey, you can hear me! ” I cried. 

Now “Dirk” motioned with his hand. 

“You want me to follow you?” I asked. I felt excited. “Are you taking me 
someplace where we can get help?” 

“Dirk” grinned again. Then he turned and walked around the corner of the 
house. I didn’t know where we were going. But I knew I had to follow him. 

I found “Dirk” in the back yard. “Hum,” he said to me. “Hum.” He pointed 
to a big rosebush and grinned. Then he stuck his nose deep inside one of the 
blossoms. “Hummmmmmmmm,” he said. “Yummmmmm.” 



I gaped at him in shock. “Of course!” I cried. 

“You got the bee’s mind when I got the bee’s body!” 

“Dirk” didn’t say anything. But when he pulled his face out of the rose, the 
end of his nose was covered with yellow pollen. 

“Dirk” looked a little surprised. And disappointed. I guess he missed his 
long, sucking tongue—the tongue that was now hanging off the front of my face. 

“You can’t help me,” I muttered to him. “You’re in worse shape than I am!” 

“Hum?” he replied. “Hum?” 

He looked kind of silly with that yellow nose. But I felt sorry for him. He 
and I had the wrong brains in the wrong bodies. I knew exactly how he felt. 

“I’m going to go get help for both of us,” I told him. “If I get my body 
back, maybe you’ll get yours, too.” 

With a loud buzz, I flew out of the Davises’ yard. As I left, I thought I heard 
“Dirk” buzz back at me. I glanced over my wing and saw him sticking his face 
into another rose. Maybe this time he’d have better luck getting the pollen out. 

I headed toward my own house. This time I planned to make Dirk Davis 
give me my body back. Or else. 

As I turned up my street, I suddenly heard a familiar voice coming from 
behind a tree. 

“Don’t mess with me! Don’t mess with me, man!” 

I couldn’t believe it. The voice belonged to Marv. But who was he talking 
to? 

I shot around the tree to find out. To my surprise, I saw that Marv was 
talking to me—or, Dirk Davis, in my body. Barry and Karl were right beside 
him. 

Look out, Dirk! I thought. Run! Run! 

Please don’t let them wreck my body! 

But I was too late. 

Barry, Marv, and Karl were closing in on him, about to give him the 
pounding of his life. 



23 


I flew closer. 

“Look out, Dirk! Look out!” I squeaked. 

But to my surprise, the three hulking creeps weren’t moving in on “Gary”— 
they were backing away from him! 

“Don’t mess with me!” Marv cried. “I said I was sorry.” 

“We apologized,” Barry whined. “Don’t hit us again, Gary! Please!” 

Karl whimpered behind him, nursing a bloody nose. 

“You guys are losers,” I heard “Gary” tell them. “Take a hike. Go get a 

life.” 

“Okay! Okay!” Marv cried. “Just no more rough stuff, okay, Gary?” 

“Gary” shook his head and walked away. 

I don’t believe this! I thought gleefully. Barry, Marv, and Karl were afraid 
of me! 

I decided I’d have some fun with them, too. 

I swooped down and landed on Barry’s nose, buzzing as loudly and 
menacingly as I could. 

“Yowwwww!” he shrieked in surprise—and swatted himself on the nose. 

I was too fast for him. I was already on Karl’s ear. 

Karl cried out and toppled backwards into a thorny rosebush. 

Then I buzzed round and around Marv. 

“Get away!” he shouted angrily. 

And I flew right into his mouth. 

His scream nearly deafened me. But it was worth it. 

Marv started spitting and choking and gagging. 

I flew up into the air, laughing so hard, I nearly popped my antennas. That 
was the most fun I’d had since becoming a bee! 

I watched the three gorillas run away. Then I flew up the block to my house. 

“Gary” had left the window open, and I was able to shoot in. He was lying 
on my bed, reading one of my comic books and eating crackers with honey on 
them. 

The honey smelled really good, and I realized I was hungry again. I 



reminded myself to stop by a flower and get a snack the next time I went 
outside. 

But, meanwhile, I had work to do. I flew over and landed on Gary’s 
earlobe. 

“Hey, you! Dirk Davis!” I yelled at the top of my little voice. “I need to talk 
to you!” 

He reached a hand up and flicked me off his face. I fell down and landed 
with a bounce on the bed. 

I buzzed angrily and shot right back up to his earlobe. “Hey, you! I want my 
body back! You have to get out of it. Now!” 

“Gary” folded up his comic book and swung it at me. I buzzed with rage 
and frustration. I wasn’t going to give up this time. No way! I had to make him 
hear me. 

I rocketed up in the air and landed on the top of his head. Then I climbed 
down to his other earlobe and tried one more time. “I’m not leaving you alone 
till you get out of my body!” I screeched. “Do you hear me?” 

He sighed and shrugged his shoulders. “Will you please quit bothering 
me?” he asked. “Can’t you see I’m trying to relax?” 

“You can hear me?” 

“Yeah. Sure,” he muttered. “I can hear you okay.” 

“You can?” I was so surprised, I almost fell off his ear. 

“Yes, I can hear you perfectly. Weird, huh? I’m not sure why. But I think 
some bee cells got mixed up with my human cells during our electronic transfer. 
I can hear all kinds of little bug noises now.” 

“Your human cells? Those are my human cells!” I cried. 

Dirk shrugged. 

“Enough chitchat,” I told him. “When do you plan to get out of my body?” 

“Never,” he replied. He picked up his comic book and started reading it 
again. “I like your body. I can’t understand why you gave it up to go become a 
bee.” 

“That wasn’t my idea!” I screamed. 

“You’ve got a good life here,” he continued. “I mean, you have great 
parents. Krissy is an okay sister. And Claus is an awesome cat. Too bad you 
didn’t know all that when you were in your body. Which is now my body!” 

“It’s not your body! It’s mine! Give it back!” I started to buzz furiously all 
around his head, swooping down in front of his nose, crashing into his ears, 



batting my wings in his eyes. 

Dirk Davis didn’t even flinch. 

“What’s the matter with you, anyway?” I yelled. “You’re me now. You’re 
supposed to be scared of bees!” 

“Gary” laughed. “You’ve forgotten something,” he said. “I’m not you. I’m 
just inside your body. I’m still me inside. And I’m not the least bit afraid of 
bees!” 

“And, now,” he went on, “take a hike, okay? Buzz off. I’m busy.” 

Frozen with anger and disappointment, I slumped on the bedspread without 
moving. “Gary” raised the comic book up into the air. “I’d hate to swat you,” he 
said. “But I will if I have to!” 

I dodged away just as the comic book slapped down on the bedspread. Then 
I shot back out the window. 

For a few minutes, I flew aimlessly around, lost in my sad thoughts. Finally, 
I remembered how hungry I was. I perched on top of a big, orange lily blossom 
and started sucking up some nectar. 

Not bad, I told myself as I drank. But honey on crackers would be much 
better. 

“What am I supposed to do now?” I asked myself. “Am I really doomed to 
be a bee for the rest of my life?” I pulled my head out of the orange blossom and 
looked around. “And how long is the rest of my life anyway?” 

I remembered a page from The Big Book of Bees. 

“The life of the average bee is not very long. While the queen can live 
through as many as five winters, the workers and drones die off in the fall.” 

In the fall? 

It was already nearly August! 

If I stayed in this bee body, I had only a month or two at most! 

I gazed sadly up at my house. “Gary” had turned the light on in my room, 
and it twinkled in the early evening dusk. 

How I wished I could be up there! Why, why had I ever been stupid enough 
to think I’d be better off in someone else’s body? 

Then I heard a buzz. I peered over the blossom. Sure enough, I saw a bee. 

He hopped up onto the flower. Two other bees quickly joined him. Then 
three more. They buzzed angrily. 

“Go away!” I cried. 

I tried to fly away. 



But before I could lift off, they all swarmed over me. 

I couldn’t move. The bees had taken me prisoner. 

“Don’t take me back to the hive!” I shrieked. “Don’t take me back!” 
But to my horror, they started to drag me away. 



24 


I struggled to squirm away. But they turned their stingers on me. 

Were they some kind of bee police? Did they think I was trying to escape 
the hive? 

I didn’t have a chance to discuss it with them. They lifted me up into the air. 
There were bees in front of me, bees behind, and bees on all sides. 

We flew past my bedroom window. “Help!” I called. 

“Gary” glanced up from his plate of crackers and honey. He smiled and 
waved at me. 

I was so angry, I thought I might explode. 

But then an idea came to me. A crazy idea. A desperate idea. 

I buzzed as loudly as I could. Then I darted out of line and shot into the 
open bedroom window. 

Were the others following me? Were they? 

Yes! 

They didn’t want to let me escape. 

“Gary” sat up when he saw me and my buzzing followers. He rolled up his 
comic book, preparing to swat us. 

I circled the room, and the other bees followed. 

“Get out! Get out!” “Gary” screamed. 

There weren’t enough of us, I decided. I needed a huge swarm. 

I flew back out the window. The others buzzed after me. 

Now I was the head bee. As fast as I could, I led my group back to Mr. 
Andretti’s garage, and in through the hole in the screen. 

I hesitated at the hive entrance. I took a deep breath. 

Was I really going to go back inside? 

I knew I had no choice. “Go for it, Lutz!” I shouted to myself. 

I shot in through the entrance hole. 

Then I began flying crazily through the hive, buzzing angrily, bumping the 
walls, bumping other bees. 

The hive stirred to life. 

The buzzing grew to a dull roar. Then a loud roar. Then a deafening roar! 



Round and round I raged, flying faster, faster, throwing myself frantically 
against the sticky hive walls, tumbling, darting, buzzing furiously. 

The entire hive was in an uproar now. 

I had turned the bees into an angry swarm. 

Out of the hive I flew. Out into the darkening evening. Out through the hole 
in the screen, up, up, and away. 

And the bees swarmed after me, like a black cloud against the gray-blue 

sky. 

Up we soared. Up, up. 

A buzzing, swarming funnel cloud. 

Up, up. 

I led them up to the bedroom window. 

Tumbling over each other, raging through the air, we swarmed into 
“Gary’s” room. 

“Huh?” He jumped off the bed. 

He didn’t have time to say a word. 

I landed in his hair. The raging swarm followed, buzzing angrily, 
surrounding him, covering his head, his face, his shoulders. 

“H-help!” His weak cry was drowned out by the roar of the bees. “Help 

me!” 

I dropped down onto the tip of Gary’s nose. “Have you had enough?” I 
demanded. “Are you ready to give me back my body?” 

“Never!” he cried. “I don’t care what you do to me! You’ll never get your 
body back! It’s mine, and I’m keeping it forever!” 

Whoooa! I could not believe my ears. 

I mean, he was covered in bees! And still he wouldn’t listen to reason! 

I didn’t know what to do. 

The other bees were starting to lose interest. 

Some of them drifted to the plate of honey. Most of them floated back out 
the open window. 

“You can’t get away with this, Dirk!” I screamed. 

With a furious wail, I whirled around. Then I stabbed my razor-sharp 
stinger deep into the side of “Gary’s” nose. 

“Owwwwwww!” He let out a high-pitched shriek and grabbed at his nose. 
Then he staggered backwards and fell over onto the bed. 

“Yaaaaay!” I cried out in celebration. 



For one instant, I felt triumphant. 

A tiny bee had defeated a huge enemy! I was victorious! I had won a fight 
against a giant! 

My celebration didn’t last very long. 

I suddenly realized what I had done. And I remembered what happens to a 
honeybee after it stings someone. 

“I’m going to die,” I murmured weakly. “I stung someone, and now I’m 
going to die!” 



25 


Weaker. 

I felt the strength drain from me. 

Weaker and weaker. 

“What have I done?” I asked myself. “I gave up my life for the chance to 
sting Dirk Davis! Why was I such a jerk?” 

I struggled to keep my wings moving, struggled to stay in the air. 

I knew I was doomed. But I wanted to stay alive as long as I could. Maybe, 
I thought, as I felt my strength fading, maybe I’ll have a chance to tell my family 
good-bye. 

“Mom! Dad! Krissy!” I buzzed faintly. “Where are you?” 

It was hard to breathe. I felt so tired, so weak. 

I floated out the window and sank to the grass below. 

I thought I recognized the shape of the old maple tree where I used to read 
books and spy on Mr. Andretti. But my sight was so bad, it was hard to be sure 
about anything. The whole world swirled in gray shadow. 

I could no longer hold up my head. The gray shadows grew darker and 
darker. 

Until the world faded completely from view. 

I sat up slowly. The ground spun beneath me. 

Where was I? 

My back yard? 

I blinked, struggling to bring it all into focus, waiting for my eyes to clear. 

“There’s the old maple tree!” I cried. “And there’s my house! And there’s 
Mr. Andretti’s house!” 

Was I alive? 

Was I really alive, sitting in my back yard, seeing all the familiar places? 

Did I have my strength back? 

I decided to test it. I tried to spread my wings and fly up into the air. 

But for some reason, my wings didn’t seem to be working. My body felt 
heavy and strange. 



I frowned and looked down, inspecting myself to see what was wrong. 
“Whoooa!” I cried out in surprise. Instead of six legs, I saw two arms and two 
legs and my skinny old body. 

Breathlessly, I reached up to touch my face. My extra eyes were gone—and 
so were my antennas, and my layer of feathery fuzz. Instead, I felt hair! And 
smooth, human skin! 

I jumped up and shouted for joy. “I’m a person again! I’m me! I’m me!” 

I threw my arms around my chest and gave myself a hug. Then I danced 
around the back yard, testing my arms and legs. 

They worked! They all worked! 

I couldn’t get over how wonderful it was to be human again! 

“But how did it happen?” I asked myself. “What happened to Dirk Davis?” 

For a chilling instant, I wondered if Dirk had been forced into a bee’s body 
the way I had. 

Probably not, I decided. 

But what had happened? 

How did I get my body back? 

Was it the bee sting? Did the shock of the sting send us all back to the 
bodies we belonged in? 

“I’ve got to call Ms. Karmen and find out!” I realized. 

But for now, all I wanted to do was see my family. 

I hurried up the back steps and into the house. As I ran through the kitchen, 
I crashed right into Krissy. As usual, she was carrying Claus under one arm. 

“Watch where you’re going!” Krissy snapped at me. 

She probably expected me to snap back at her and try to push her out of my 
way. But instead I grabbed her shoulders and gave her a big hug. Then I planted 
a kiss on her cheek. 

“Yuck! Gross!” she cried and wiped the cheek with her hand. 

I laughed happily. 

“Don’t give me your cooties, creep!” Krissy cried. 

“You’re a creep!” I replied. 

“No, you’re a creep!” she repeated. 

“You’re a jerk!” I shouted. 

It felt so good to be calling her names again! 

I gleefully called her a few more things. Then I hurried upstairs to see my 
parents. 



I met them as they were coming out of my room. 

“Mom! Dad!” I cried. I hurried to them, planning to throw my arms around 
them. 

But they thought I was just trying to get into my room. “Don’t go in there, 
Gary,” warned my dad. “You left your window open again, and a swarm of bees 
got in there.” 

“You’d better go next door,” Mom said. “Get Mr. Andretti. He’ll know how 
to get them out.” 

I couldn’t hold back any longer. I threw my arms around my mother’s neck 
and gave her a big kiss. “Mom, I missed you so much!” 

My mother hugged me back, but I saw her exchange a curious look with my 
dad. “Gary?” she asked. “Are you okay? How could you miss me when you’ve 
been right here in this house?” 

“Well...” I thought fast. “I meant that I missed spending time with you. We 
really need to do more things together.” 

My mother spread one hand over my forehead. “No. No temperature,” she 
told my father. 

“Gary,” Dad said impatiently. “Would you mind running over and getting 
Mr. Andretti? If we don’t get those bees out of your room, you’ll never be able 
to go to sleep tonight!” 

“Bees?” I said casually. “Hey, no problem. I’ll take care of them.” 

I reached out and started to open my door. Before I could, Dad grabbed my 
arm. “Gary!” he cried in alarm. “What’s the matter with you? There are bees in 
your room! B-E-E-S. Don’t you remember—you’re scared of bees!” 

I stared back at him and thought about what he’d said. To my surprise, I 
realized I was no longer the slightest bit scared of bees! In fact, I was actually 
looking forward to seeing them again. 

“No problem, Dad,” I told him. “I guess I must have outgrown that, or 
something.” 

I opened the door and went into my room. Sure enough, there was the old 
swarm, buzzing away over the plate of honey and crackers on the bed. 

“Hi, guys!” I said cheerfully. “Time to leave now!” 

I walked over to the bed and waved my hands at them, trying to shoo them 
back out the window. A few of them buzzed angrily at me. 

I laughed to myself. Then I picked up the plate of crackers and honey and 
dumped it out the window. “Go get it!” I told them. 



I shooed them gently out the window. 

“Good-bye!” I called to them as they left. “Thanks! Take good care of the 
honeycombs! I’ll try to come visit as soon as I can!” 

When the last bee was gone, I turned around and saw my parents. They 
were standing absolutely motionless in the doorway, staring at me, frozen with 
shock. 

“Dad?” I said. “Mom?” 

My dad blinked and seemed to come back to life. He crossed the room and 
put a hand on my shoulder. “Gary? Are you feeling all right?” 

“Just fine,” I replied, grinning happily. “Just fine.” 



26 


That whole crazy adventure happened about a month ago. 

Now it’s nearly fall. I’m sitting in my favorite place under the maple tree in 
the back yard, reading a book and chomping down taco chips. 

I just love coming out here. All the fall flowering plants are in bloom, and 
the yard is really pretty. 

I’ve been spending the last few days of my summer vacation relaxing back 
here. Of course, I also go to the playground a lot. 

The other day I ran into that girl with the red hair I saw coming out of the 
Person-to-Person office. We started talking, and I didn’t trip over my own feet or 
anything. She seems very nice. I hope she doesn’t plan to switch lives with 
anybody else! 

That conversation and a lot of things have made me realize that my short 
life as a bee really changed me. 

First of all, it taught me to appreciate my family for the first time ever. My 
parents are pretty nice. And my sister is okay. For a sister. 

And now, I’m not scared of any of the things I used to be scared of. 
Yesterday, I walked right by Marv, Barry, and Karl, and I didn’t bat an eye. 

In fact, when I remembered how I buzzed them, I almost burst out laughing. 

I’m not at all scared of them anymore. And I’m different in other ways, too. 

I’m a lot better at sports and bike riding and things. And I’m a great 
skateboarder now. In fact, I still give lessons. Judy and Kaitlyn hang around me 
all the time. And Gail and Louie, too. 

The other day, I actually ran into Dirk Davis at the playground. At first, I 
didn’t want to talk to him. But then he turned out to be pretty nice. 

He apologized to me. “I’m sorry I tried to steal your body,” he said. “But 
things didn’t turn out so well for me, either. That bee flunked all my math tests 
in summer school!” 

We both had a good laugh about that. And now Dirk and I are friends. 

So all in all, my life is back to normal. 

I feel terrific, totally normal. 

In fact, I feel much better than normal. 

It’s so great to sit here in the back yard, reading and relaxing, smelling the 



fresh fall air, enjoying the flowers. 

Mmmmmm. 

Those hollyhocks are really awesome. 

Excuse me a moment while I get up and take a closer look. 

That blossom down near the ground is so perfect. 

I think I’ll get down on my knees to take a quick taste. 

Do you know how to suck the pollen out? 

I’ve figured out the best way. It’s not as hard as it looks. 

You just pucker your lips and stick your tongue way out like this, see? 

Then you dip your face down into the blossom and suck up all the pollen 
you want. 

Try it. 

Go ahead. 

Mmmmmmmm. 

Go ahead. It’s easy. Really! 





Search

 UPLOADbrett_devan_wieler BRETT_DEVAN_WIELER
 
BOOKS
 
VIDEO
 
AUDIO
 
SOFTWARE
 
IMAGES
Upload files
My uploads
My loans
My favorites
My web archives
Account settings
Get help
Log out
 Search metadata
 Search text contents
 Search TV news captions
 Search radio transcripts
 Search archived web sites
Advanced Search
ABOUT BLOG PROJECTS HELP DONATE  CONTACT JOBS VOLUNTEER PEOPLE
Full text of "Goosebumps [All Books]"
See other formats
R.L.STINE 




















R.L. STINE 


1/ gpJk 





KWff ^ 








mmm 

'Ml; • 1 


MONSTER BLOOD I 

••SCHOLASTIC 






















MONSTER BLOOD II 


Goosebumps - 18 
R.L. Stine 





1 


Evan Ross backed into the corner of the den as he stared at his dog Trigger. 

The tan cocker spaniel lowered his head and stared back at Evan with wet, 
brown eyes. The old dog’s tail began to wag excitedly. 

“Trigger—” Evan cried angrily. “Did you eat Monster Blood again?” 

The dog’s tail began wagging faster. Trigger let out a low bark that rumbled 
like thunder. 

Evan’s back pressed against the dark-paneled den wall. 

Trigger took a few heavy steps toward him, panting hard. His huge pink 
tongue, as big as a salami, hung out of his enormous mouth. 

“Did you?” Evan demanded. “Did you eat more Monster Blood?” 

The answer to Evan’s question was obvious. 

Trigger had been normal cocker spaniel size that morning. Now the dog 
stared down at Evan, as big as a pony. 

Trigger’s furry paws, the size of elephant hooves, thudded on the den 
carpet. His enormous tail pounded louder than a bass drum against the side of a 
leather couch. 

Evan covered his ears as Trigger let out an excited, high-pitched bark that 
shook the den walls. “Stay! Stay!” Evan shouted. 

The enormous dog panted hard, his tail wagging furiously. 

Oh, no! Evan thought in horror. He wants to play! 

“Sit!” Evan screamed. “Sit!” 

But Trigger didn’t know how to sit. For ten years —seventy dog years !— 
Evan had tried to teach Trigger to sit on command. 

But Trigger just didn’t get it. 

“Where did you find the Monster Blood?” Evan demanded. “We all saw it 
disappear into thin air. Gone. It was just gone. You know that stuff makes you 
grow. And grow and grow and grow. Where did you find it?” 

Trigger tilted his big head at an angle, as if trying to understand Evan’s 
words. Then, wagging his huge tail excitedly, he started to run to Evan. 

No! Evan thought. He’s going to jump on me! He’s going to jump! If he 
jumps, he’ll crush me! 



An enormous glob of drool escaped Trigger’s open mouth and hit the carpet 
with a loud smack. 

“Sit!” Evan cried, his voice choked with panic. “Sit, boy! Sit!” 

Trigger hesitated, staring down at Evan. To Evan’s horror, the dog was 
growing even bigger. Trigger was now as tall as a horse! 

Where did he find the container of Monster Blood? Evan wondered, his 
back pressed against the wall. Where? 

The dog’s brown eyes gaped at Evan like shimmering, dark pools. Trigger 
uttered another deafening bark that shook the whole house. 

“Yuck!” Evan cried, squeezing his nose with two fingers. The dog’s breath 
rushed at him like a strong wind. And it smelled as sour as a dead mouse. 

“Back! Get back, Trigger!” Evan pleaded. 

But Trigger had never learned that command, either. 

Without warning, the giant dog leaped at Evan. 

“Down! Down!” Evan shrieked. 

Trigger’s mouth gaped open. The dog’s huge tongue licked the side of 
Evan’s face. The tongue felt scratchy and hot. Evan’s carrot-colored hair was 
matted down with sticky dog saliva. 

“No—please!” Evan screamed. “I’m only twelve! I’m too young to die!” 

He started to scream again. But Trigger’s big teeth clamped around his 
waist, cutting off his breath. 

“Trigger—put me down! Put me down!” Evan choked out. 

The dog’s wagging tail sent a lamp crashing to the floor. 

The teeth held Evan gently but firmly. He felt himself being lifted off the 
floor. 

“Put me down! Put me down!” 

Why wouldn’t the stupid dog listen? 

Evan thrashed his arms and legs frantically, trying to squirm free. But 
Trigger held on tightly. 

The dog’s enormous paws pounded on the carpet. He carried Evan through 
the hall and across the kitchen. Then he lowered his head and butted the kitchen 
screen door open. 

The door slammed hard behind them. Trigger began trotting over the grass. 

“Bad dog! Bad dog!” Evan cried. His voice came out in a tiny squeak. 

Had Trigger grown even bigger? 

Evan was at least three feet off the ground now! 



“Put me down! Down!” he cried. 

Evan watched the green grass of the back yard bounce beneath him. Trigger 
was panting as he walked. The panting sounds made Evan’s whole body vibrate. 
He realized his jeans and T-shirt were soaked from dog saliva. Trigger doesn’t 
mean to hurt me, Evan told himself. He’s just being playful. Thank goodness 
he’s such an old dog. His teeth aren’t very sharp. 

The dog stopped at the edge of the flower garden in the back of the yard. 
He lowered Evan nearly to the ground, but didn’t let go. 

His paws began to churn up the soft dirt. 

“Let me down!” Evan shrieked. “Trigger—listen to me!” 

Breathing hard, his hot, sour breath pouring over Evan, the big dog 
continued to dig. 

A wave of horror swept over Evan as he realized what Trigger was doing. 
“No!” Evan shrieked. “Don’t bury me, Trigger!” 

The dog dug faster, its front paws churning furiously. The soft dirt flew past 
Evan’s face. 

“I’m not a bone!” Evan cried frantically. “Trigger—I’m not a bone! Don’t 
bury me, Trigger! Please—don’t bury me!” 



2 


“Don’t bury me. Please don’t bury me!” Evan murmured. 

He heard laughter. 

He raised his head and glanced around—and realized that he wasn’t home 
in his back yard. He was sitting in his assigned seat in the third row near the 
window in Mr. Murphy’s science class. 

And Mr. Murphy was standing right at Evan’s side, his enormous, round 
body blocking the sunlight from the window. “Earth calling Evan! Earth calling 
Evan!” Mr. Murphy called, cupping his chubby pink hands over his mouth to 
make a megaphone. 

The kids all laughed. 

Evan could feel his face growing hot. “S-sorry,” he stammered. 

“You seem to have been somewhere in Daydream Land,” Mr. Murphy said, 
his tiny black eyes twinkling merrily. 

“Yes,” Evan replied solemnly. “I was dreaming about Monster Blood. I—I 
can’t stop thinking about it.” 

Ever since his frightening adventure the past summer with the green, sticky 
stuff, Evan had been dreaming and daydreaming about it. 

“Evan, please,” Mr. Murphy said softly. He shook his round, pink head and 
made a “tsk-tsk” sound. 

“Monster Blood is real!” Evan blurted out angrily. 

The kids laughed again. 

Mr. Murphy’s expression grew stern. His tiny eyes locked onto Evan’s. 
“Evan, I am a science teacher. You don’t expect a science teacher to believe that 
you found a can of sticky green gunk in a toy store that makes things grow and 
grow.” 

“Y-yes, I do,” Evan insisted. 

“Maybe a science-fiction teacher would believe it,” Mr. Murphy replied, 
grinning at his own joke. “Not a science teacher.” 

“Well, you’re dumb!” Evan cried. 

He didn’t mean to say it. He knew immediately that he had just made a 
major mistake. 

He heard gasps all around the big classroom. 



Mr. Murphy’s pink face darkened until it looked like a red balloon. But he 
didn’t lose his temper. He clasped his chubby hands over the big stomach of his 
green sportshirt, and Evan could see him silently counting to ten. 

“Evan, you’re a new student here, isn’t that right?” he asked finally. His 
face slowly returned to its normal pink color. 

“Yes,” Evan replied, his voice just above a whisper. “My family just moved 
to Atlanta this fall.” 

“Well, perhaps you’re not familiar with the way things work here. Perhaps 
at your old school the teachers liked it when you called them dumb. Perhaps you 
called your teachers ugly names all day long. Perhaps—” 

“No, sir,” Evan interrupted, lowering his head. “It just slipped out.” 

Laughter rang through the classroom. Mr. Murphy glared sternly at Evan, 
his face twisted in an angry frown. 

Give me a break, Evan thought unhappily. Glancing quickly around the 
room, Evan saw a sea of grinning faces. 

I think I’m in trouble again, Evan thought glumly. Why can’t I keep my big 
mouth shut? 

Mr. Murphy glanced up at the wall clock. “School is nearly over,” he said. 
“Why don’t you do us all a little favor, Evan, to make up for the time you made 
us waste today?” 

Uh oh, Evan thought darkly. Here it comes. 

“When the bell rings, go put your books away in your locker,” Mr. Murphy 
instructed. “Then come back here and clean Cuddles’ cage.” 

Evan groaned. 

His eyes darted to the hamster cage against the wall. Cuddles was 
scratching around in the wood shavings on the cage floor. 

Not the hamster! Evan thought unhappily. 

Evan hated Cuddles. And Mr. Murphy knew it. This was the third time Mr. 
Murphy had made Evan stay after school and clean out the gross, disgusting 
cage. 

“Perhaps while you clean the hamster cage,” Mr. Murphy said, returning to 
his desk, “you can think about how to do better in science class, Evan.” 

Evan jumped to his feet. “I won’t do it!” he cried. 

He heard shocked gasps all around him. 

“I hate Cuddles!” Evan screamed. “I hate that stupid, fat hamster!” 

As everyone stared in amazed horror, Evan ran over to the cage, pulled 



open the door, and grabbed Cuddles up in one hand. 

Then, with an easy, graceful motion, he flung the hamster across the room 
—and out the open window. 



3 


Evan knew he was having another daydream. 

He didn’t jump up screaming and throw the hamster out the window. 

He only thought about it. Everyone thinks about doing crazy, wild things 
once in a while. 

But Evan would never do anything that crazy. 

Instead, he said, “Okay, Mr. Murphy.” Then he sat quietly in his seat, 
staring out the window at the puffy white clouds in the bright blue sky. 

He could see his own reflection staring back at him in the glass. His curly, 
carrot-colored hair looked darker in the reflection. So did the freckles that dotted 
his cheeks. 

His expression was mournful. He hated being made fun of in front of the 
entire class. 

Why am I always getting myself into trouble? he wondered. Why can’t Mr. 
Murphy ever give me a break? Didn’t the teacher realize how hard it was to be 
the new kid in school? How am I supposed to make new friends if Murphy is 
always making me look like a total jerk in class? 

Bad enough that no one believed him about the Monster Blood. 

Evan had eagerly told the kids in his new school about it. How he had 
stayed with his great-aunt the past summer. How he and a girl he met named 
Andy had found the blue container of Monster Blood in a creepy, old toy store. 

And how the green, yucky Monster Blood had started to grow and grow. 
How it had bubbled out of its container, outgrown a bucket, outgrown a bath tub! 
And just kept growing and growing as if it were alive! 

And Evan had told kids how Trigger had eaten just a little of the Monster 
Blood—and had grown nearly as big as a house! 

It was such a frightening, amazing story. Evan was sure his new friends 
would find it really cool. 

But, instead, they just thought he was weird. 

No one believed him. They laughed at him and told him he had a sick 
imagination. 

Evan became known around his new school as the kid who made up stupid 
stories. 



If only I could prove to them that the story is true, Evan often thought sadly. 
If only I could show them the Monster Blood. 

But the mysterious green gunk had vanished from sight before Evan left his 
great-aunt’s house. Not a trace of it had been left. Not a trace. 

The bell rang. Everyone jumped up and headed for the door, talking and 
laughing. 

Evan knew that a lot of his classmates were laughing at him. Ignoring them, 
Evan picked up his backpack and started to the door. 

“Hurry back, Evan,” Mr. Murphy called from behind his desk. “Cuddles is 
waiting!” 

Evan growled under his breath and stepped out into the crowded hallway. If 
Murphy loves that stupid hamster so much, why doesn’t he ever clean out the 
cage? he wondered bitterly. 

A group of kids laughed loudly as Evan passed by. Were they laughing at 
him? Evan couldn’t tell. 

He started jogging to his locker—when something hit his leg just above the 
ankle. His feet flew out from under him, and he toppled face down onto the hard 
tile floor. 

“Hey—!” Evan cried angrily. 

He stared up at a big, tough-looking kid from his class named Conan 
Barber. All the kids called him Conan the Barbarian. For good reason. 

Conan was twelve, but he looked about twenty years older! He was taller 
and wider and stronger and meaner than any kid in the school. 

He wasn’t a bad-looking guy, Evan grudgingly admitted. He had wavy, 
blond hair, blue eyes, and a handsome face. He was very athletic-looking, and 
played all the sports at school. 

He was an okay guy, Evan thought wistfully. 

Except that he had one very bad habit. Conan loved to live up to his 
nickname. 

He loved being Conan the Barbarian. 

He loved strutting around, pounding kids who weren’t his size—which 
included everyone! 

Evan had not hit it off with Conan. 

He met Conan on the playground a few weeks after moving to Atlanta. 
Eager to make a good impression, Evan told him the whole Monster Blood story. 

Conan didn’t like the story. He stared back at Evan with his cold, blue eyes 



for a long, long time. Then his expression hardened, and he murmured through 
clenched teeth: “We don’t like wise guys down here in Atlanta.” 

He gave Evan a pretty good pounding that day. 

Evan had tried to stay away from Conan ever since. But it wasn’t easy. 

Now he gazed up at Conan from his position on the floor. “Hey—why’d 
you trip me?” Evan demanded shrilly. 

Conan grinned down at him and shrugged. “It was an accident.” 

Evan tried to decide whether it was safer to stand up or to stay down on the 
floor. If I stand up, he’ll punch me, he thought. If I stay down here, he’ll step on 
me. 

Tough choice. 

He didn’t get to make it. Conan reached down and, with one hand, pulled 
Evan to his feet. 

“Give me a break, Conan!” Evan pleaded. “Why can’t you leave me 
alone?” 

Conan shrugged again. It was one of his favorite replies. His blue eyes 
twinkled merrily. “You’re right, Evan,” he said, his grin fading. “I shouldn’t have 
tripped you.” 

“Yeah,” Evan agreed, straightening his T-shirt. 

“So you can pay me back,” Conan offered. 

“Huh?” Evan gaped at him. 

Conan stuck out his massive chest. “Go ahead. Hit me in the stomach. I’ll 
let you.” 

“Whoa. No way,” Evan replied, trying to back up. He stumbled into a group 
of kids. 

“Go ahead,” Conan urged, following after him. “Hit me in the stomach. As 
hard as you can. It’s only fair.” 

Evan studied his expression. “You really mean it?” 

Conan nodded, tight-lipped. He stuck out his chest. “As hard as you can. 
Go ahead. I won’t hit back. I promise.” 

Evan hesitated. Should he go ahead and do it? 

I may never get a chance like this again, he thought. 

A lot of kids were watching, Evan realized. 

If I hit him really hard, if I hurt him, if I make him cry out—then maybe 
kids around here will have a little respect for me. 

I’ll be Evan the Giant Killer. The guy who pounded Conan the Barbarian. 



He balled his hand into a tight fist and raised it. 

“Is that your fist?” Conan cried, laughing. 

Evan nodded. 

“Oooh—this is going to hurt!” Conan cried sarcastically. He made his knees 
tremble. 

Everyone laughed. 

I may surprise him, Evan thought angrily. 

“Go ahead. As hard as you can,” Conan urged. He sucked in a deep breath 
and held it. 

Evan pulled his arm back and swung his fist as hard as he could. 

The fist made a solid thud as it hit Conan’s stomach. 

It felt like hitting a concrete wall. 

Evan’s hand throbbed with pain. 

“Hey—!” a man’s voice called angrily. 

Startled, Evan spun around—to see Mr. Murphy glaring at him. 

“No fighting!” Mr. Murphy yelled at Evan. 

The teacher came bouncing up to them and stepped between the two boys. 
Huffing for breath, he turned to Conan. “Why did Evan hit you?” he demanded. 



4 


Conan shrugged. His blue eyes went wide and innocent. “I don’t know, Mr. 
Murphy,” he replied in a tiny, forlorn voice. “Evan just walked up and hit me as 
hard as he could.” 

Conan rubbed his stomach and uttered a short whimper. “Ow. He really hurt 

me.” 

Mr. Murphy narrowed his beady black eyes at Evan. His chubby face turned 
bright red again. “Evan, I saw the whole thing. I really don’t understand you,” he 
said softly. 

“But Mr. Murphy—” Evan started. 

The teacher raised a hand to silence him. “If you were angry about what 
happened in class,” Mr. Murphy said, “you shouldn’t take it out on other kids.” 

Conan rubbed his stomach tenderly. “I hope Evan didn’t break anything!” 
he murmured. 

“Do you want to see the nurse?” Mr. Murphy asked. 

Conan shook his head. Evan could see he was having trouble keeping a 
straight face. “I’ll be okay,” he said, and staggered away. 

What a phony! Evan thought bitterly. 

Did Conan know the whole time that Murphy was standing there? Probably. 

“Go take care of Cuddles,” Mr. Murphy told Evan, frowning. “And try to 
shape up, Evan. I’m going to be watching you.” 

Evan muttered a reply and trudged back into the classroom. Sunlight 
streamed in through the wall of windows. A strong breeze made the window 
shade flap over the open window near the teacher’s desk. 

Feeling angry and upset, his stomach churning, Evan made his way through 
the empty room to the hamster cage. Cuddles wrinkled his nose in greeting. The 
hamster knew the routine by now. 

Evan gazed into the metal cage at the brown-and-white creature. Why do 
people think hamsters are cute? he wondered. 

Because they wrinkle their noses? Because they run around and around on 
wheels like total jerks? Because of their cute little buck teeth? 

Cuddles stared up at him with his little black eyes. 

He has Mr. Murphy’s eyes, Evan thought, chuckling to himself. Maybe 



that’s why Murphy likes him so much. 

“Okay, okay. So you’re kind of cute,” Evan told the hamster. “But I know 
your secret. You’re just a big fat rat in disguise!” 

Cuddles wrinkled his nose again in reply. 

With a loud sigh, Evan went to work. Holding his breath because he hated 
the smell, he pulled out the bottom tray. 

“You’re a messy little guy,” he told the hamster. “When are you going to 
learn to clean up your own room?” 

Still holding his breath, he dumped out the old newspaper shavings and 
replaced them with fresh shavings from the box in the supply closet. 

He returned the bottom tray to its place as Cuddles watched with great 
interest. Then he poured fresh water into the water bottle. 

“How about some sunflower seeds?” Evan asked. He began to feel a little 
more cheerful, knowing his job was almost finished. 

He removed the seed cup from the cage and made his way across the room 
to the supply closet to get fresh sunflower seeds. 

“Okay, Cuddles,” he called, “these look yummy!” 

He started to carry the seeds back to the cage. Halfway across the room, 
Evan stopped and uttered a startled gasp. 

The cage door hung wide open. 

The hamster was gone. 



5 


A choking sound escaped Evan’s lips as he stared at the empty cage. 

His eyes darted frantically around the room. “Cuddles? Cuddles?” he called 
in a frightened voice. 

Why am I yelling? he asked himself, spinning around in a total panic. The 
dumb hamster doesn’t know its name! 

He heard footsteps out in the hall. 

Mr. Murphy? 

No, please—no! Evan pleaded silently. 

Don’t let it be Mr. Murphy. Don’t let him return until I have Cuddles safely 
back in his cage. 

Cuddles was Mr. Murphy’s most precious possession. He had told this to 
the class time and again. 

Evan knew that if anything happened to Cuddles, Mr. Murphy would be on 
Evan’s case for the rest of the year. No—for the rest of his life! 

Evan froze in the center of the room, listening hard. 

The footsteps passed by the room. 

Evan started breathing again. 

“Cuddles? Where are you, Cuddles?” he called in a trembling voice. “I have 
some delicious sunflower seeds for you.” 

He spotted the furry, brown-and-white creature on the chalk tray under the 
front chalkboard. 

“There you are! I see you!” Evan whispered, tiptoeing toward it. 

Cuddles was busily chewing on something. A small piece of white chalk. 

Evan tiptoed closer. “I have seeds for you, Cuddles,” he whispered. “Much 
tastier than chalk.” 

Cuddles held the stick of chalk in his front paws, turning it as he chewed. 

Evan crept closer. Closer. 

“Look. Seeds.” He held the plastic seed cup toward the hamster. 

Cuddles didn’t look up. 

Evan crept up closer. Closer. 

Close enough to dive forward— 



—and miss! 

The hamster dropped the chalk and scampered down the chalk tray. 

Evan made another frantic grab—and came up with nothing but air. 

Letting out a frustrated groan, Evan saw the hamster dive to the floor and 
scamper behind Mr. Murphy’s desk. The hamster’s feet skidded and slid on the 
linoleum floor, its toenails clicking loudly. 

“You can’t get away! You’re too fat!” Evan cried. He dropped to his knees 
and peered under the desk. 

He could see Cuddles staring back at him from the darkness. The animal 
was breathing rapidly, its sides swelling with each breath. 

“Don’t be scared,” Evan whispered soothingly. “I’m going to put you back 
in your nice, safe cage.” 

He crawled quickly to the desk. 

The hamster stared back at him, breathing hard. It didn’t move—until Evan 
reached for him. Then Cuddles scampered away, his tiny paws sliding on the 
floor. 

Evan jumped angrily to his feet. “Cuddles—what’s your problem?” he 
demanded loudly. “This isn’t a stupid game!” 

It wasn’t a game at all, Evan knew. 

If he didn’t get the hamster back in the cage, Mr. Murphy would flunk him 
for sure. Or suspend him from school. Or get his family kicked out of Atlanta! 

Calm down, Evan urged himself. Don’t panic. 

He took a deep breath and held it. 

Then he saw the hamster on the window ledge just inside the open window. 

Okay, Evan—go ahead and panic! he told himself. 

This was definitely panic time. 

He tried to call to the hamster. But his voice came out a choked whisper. 

Swallowing hard, Evan edged slowly toward the window ledge. 

“Come here, Cuddles,” he whispered. “Please, Cuddles—come here.” 

Closer, closer. 

Almost close enough to reach the hamster. 

Almost close enough. 

“Don’t move, Cuddles. Don’t move.” 

He reached out his hand slowly. Slowly. 

Cuddles glanced back at him with his soft black eyes. 

Then the hamster jumped out the window. 



6 


Evan hung back for only a second. 

Then he jumped out the window after the hamster. 

Luckily, the science classroom was on the ground floor. Evan landed face 
down in a low evergreen hedge. Struggling and squirming, it took him a while to 
climb to his feet. 

He took several steps over the grass, then turned and stared back along the 
bottom of the long hedge. “Cuddles—are you under there?” 

Evan squatted down to get a better view. The hedge stretched the entire 
length of the school building. Cuddles could hide under there forever. 

And if I don’t find him, Evan told himself bitterly, I’d better hide under 
there forever, too! 

To the right, Evan could hear voices from the playground. Happy, shouting 
voices. Carefree voices. 

Still squatting, he turned toward the happy voices—and saw a fat brown 
ball wobbling over the grass toward the playground. 

No. Not a ball. “Cuddles!” 

That fat hamster isn’t getting away this time! Evan decided, jumping up and 
starting to chase after the creature. I’ll catch him if I have to sit on him! 

A picture flashed into Evan’s mind of Cuddles, flat as a pancake after Evan 
had sat upon him. A little, round, furry hamster rug. 

Despite his panic, the thought of Cuddles as a rug brought a smile to Evan’s 
perspiring face. 

As he ran, he kept his eyes on Cuddles. The hamster was wobbling rapidly 
over the grass toward the playground. 

“Oh, no!” Evan cried out in horror as Cuddles darted in front of two girls 
speeding across the grass on bikes. 

Laughing together, they didn’t even see the hamster. 

Cuddles is about to be road kill! Evan thought, shrinking back. He shut his 
eyes and waited for the squish. 

But the bikes rolled smoothly on. And when they had passed, Evan spotted 
Cuddles continuing his journey to the playground unharmed. 

“Cuddles—come back here!” he shouted furiously. 



The hamster appeared to speed up. He tumbled onto the baseball diamond, 
all four paws scurrying over the dirt of the third-base line. 

Several kids stopped their game to stare. 

“Stop him! Grab the hamster!” Evan shouted desperately. 

But the kids only laughed. 

“Know how to catch him?” a joker named Robbie Greene called to Evan. 
“Make a sound like a sunflower seed!” 

“That’s an old joke!” a girl called to Robbie. 

“Thanks for your help!” Evan shouted sarcastically. He ran over the 
pitching mound and had crossed second base when he realized he had lost sight 
of Cuddles. 

He stopped and spun around, his heart thudding wildly in his chest. He 
searched the grass of the infield. “Where—where is he?” he stammered. “Do you 
see him?” 

But the kids had returned to their softball game. 

I can’t lose him now! Evan told himself, choked with panic. I can’t! 

Sweat poured down Evan’s forehead. He mopped it with one hand, 
brushing back his curly, red hair. His T-shirt clung wetly to his back. His mouth 
felt dry as cotton. 

Jogging into the outfield, he searched the grass. 

“Cuddles?” 

No sign of him. 

A round, brownish lump in the grass turned out to be someone’s baseball 
glove. 

“Cuddles?” 

A kickball game was underway on the opposite diamond. Kids were 
shouting and cheering. Evan saw Bree Douglas, a girl from his class, slide hard 
into second base just before the ball. 

“Has—has anyone seen Cuddles?” Evan gasped, trotting onto the diamond. 

Kids turned to gawk at him. 

“Out here?” Bree called, brushing off the knees of her jeans. “Evan, did you 
take the hamster out for a walk?” 

Everyone laughed. Scornful laughter. 

“He—he got away,” Evan replied, panting. 

“Is this what you’re looking for?” a familiar voice called. 

Evan turned to see Conan Barber, a pleased smile on his handsome face, his 



blue eyes gleaming. 

Gripping it by its furry back, Conan held the hamster up in one hand. 
Cuddles’ four legs scurried in midair. 

“You—you caught him!” Evan cried gratefully. He let out a long sigh of 
relief. “He jumped out the window.” 

Evan reached out both hands for the hamster, but Conan jerked Cuddles out 
of his reach. “Prove it’s yours,” Conan said, grinning. 

“Huh?” 

“Can you identify it?” Conan demanded, his eyes burning into Evan’s, 
challenging Evan. “Prove this hamster is yours.” 

Evan swallowed hard and glanced around. 

Kids from the kickball game were huddling near. They were all grinning, 
delighted with Conan’s mean joke. 

Evan sighed wearily and reached again for the hamster. 

But Conan was at least a foot taller than Evan. He lifted the hamster high 
above Evan’s head, out of Evan’s reach. 

“Prove it’s yours,” he repeated, flashing the others a grin. 

“Give me a break, Conan,” Evan pleaded. “I’ve been chasing this stupid 
hamster for hours. I just want to get him back in his cage before Mr. Murphy—” 

“Do you have a license for him?” Conan demanded, still holding the 
squirming hamster above Evan’s head. “Show me the license.” 

Evan jumped and stretched both hands up, trying to grab Cuddles away. 

But Conan was too fast for him. He dodged away. Evan grabbed air. 

Some kids laughed. 

“Give him the hamster, Conan,” Bree called. She hadn’t moved from 
second base. 

Conan’s cold blue eyes sparkled excitedly. “I’ll tell you how you can get the 
hamster back,” he told Evan. 

“Huh?” Evan glared at him. He was getting really tired of Conan’s game. 

“Here’s how to get old Cuddles back,” Conan continued, holding the 
hamster tightly against his chest in one hand and petting its back with the other. 
“Sing a song for it.” 

“Hey—no way!” Evan snapped. “Give it to me, Conan!” 

Evan could feel his face growing even hotter. His knees started to tremble. 
He hoped no one could see it. 

“Sing ‘Row, Row, Row Your Boat’, and I’ll give you Cuddles. Promise,” 



Conan said, smirking. 

Some kids laughed. They moved closer, eager to see what Evan would do. 

Evan shook his head. “No way.” 

“Come on,” Conan urged softly, stroking the hamster’s brown fur. “'Row, 
Row, Row Your Boat.’ Just a few choruses. You know how it goes, don’t you?” 

More cruel laughter from the others. 

Conan’s grin grew wider. “Come on, Evan. You like to sing, don’t you?” 

“No, I hate singing,” Evan muttered, his eyes on Cuddles. 

“Hey, don’t be modest,” Conan insisted. “I’ll bet you’re a great singer. Are 
you a soprano or an alto?” 

Loud laughter. 

Evan’s hands tightened into hard fists at his sides. He wanted to punch 
Conan, and punch him and punch him. He wanted to wipe the grin off Conan’s 
handsome face with his fists. 

But he remembered what it had felt like to punch Conan. It had felt like 
hitting the side of a truck. 

He took a deep breath. “If I sing the stupid song, will you really give me 
back the hamster?” 

Conan didn’t reply. 

Evan suddenly realized that Conan wasn’t looking at him anymore. No one 
was. They had all raised their eyes over Evan’s shoulder. 

Confused, Evan spun around—to face Mr. Murphy. 

“What is going on here?” the teacher demanded, his tiny black eyes moving 
from Evan to Conan, then back to Evan. 

Before Evan could reply, Conan held up the hamster. “Here’s Cuddles, Mr. 
Murphy,” Conan said. “Evan let him get away. But I rescued Cuddles just as he 
was going to get run over.” 

Mr. Murphy let out a horrified gasp. “Run over?” he cried. “Cuddles? Run 
over?” 

The teacher reached out his chubby pink hands and took the hamster from 
Conan. He held the hamster against his bulging shirt and petted it, making 
soothing sounds to it. 

“Thank you, Conan,” Mr. Murphy said after calming Cuddles. He glared at 
Evan. “I’m very disappointed in you, Evan.” 

Evan started to defend himself. But Mr. Murphy raised a hand to silence 
him. “We’ll talk about it tomorrow. Right now I must get poor Cuddles back into 



his cage.” 

Evan slumped to the ground. He watched Mr. Murphy carry the hamster 
back to the school building. Mr. Murphy waddles just like the hamster, Evan 
realized. 

Normally, that thought would have cheered him up. 

But Evan was far too unhappy to be cheered up by anything. 

Conan had embarrassed him in front of all the others. And the big, grinning 
hulk had managed to get Evan in trouble with Mr. Murphy twice in one 
afternoon! 

The kickball game had started up again. Evan climbed slowly to his feet 
and began trudging to the school building to get his backpack. 

He couldn’t decide who he hated more—Cuddles or Conan. 

He had a sudden picture of Cuddles stuffed inside a muffin tin, being baked 
in an oven. 

Even that lovely thought didn’t cheer Evan up. 

He pulled his backpack out of the locker and slung it over his shoulder. 
Then he slammed the locker shut, the sound clanging down the empty hallway. 

He pushed open the front door and headed for home, walking slowly, lost in 
his unhappy thoughts. 

What a horrible day, he told himself. At least nothing worse could happen 
to me today. 

He had just crossed the street and was making his way on the sidewalk in 
front of a tall hedge—when someone leaped out at him, grabbed his shoulders 
hard from behind, and pulled him roughly to the ground. 

Evan let out a frightened cry and gazed into his attacker’s face. “You!” he 
cried. 



7 


“Here’s a little advice, Evan,” Andy said, grinning down at him. “Don’t go out 
for the wrestling team.” 

“Andy!” Evan cried, staring up at her in surprise. “What are you doing 
here?” 

She reached out both hands and helped tug him to his feet. Then she tossed 
back her short, brown hair with a flick of her head. Her brown eyes flashed 
excitedly. 

“Didn’t you read any of my letters?” she demanded. 

Evan had met Andy the past summer, when he’d stayed with his great-aunt 
for a few weeks. He and Andy had become good friends. 

She was with him when he bought the container of Monster Blood. She 
shared the whole frightening Monster Blood adventure with him. 

Evan liked Andy because she was funny, and fearless, and kind of crazy. He 
never could predict what she would do next! 

She didn’t even dress like other girls Evan knew. Andy loved bright colors. 
Right now she was wearing a sleeveless magenta T-shirt over bright yellow 
shorts, which matched her yellow sneakers. 

“I told you in my last letter that my parents were sent overseas for a year,” 
Andy said, giving Evan a playful shove. “I told you they were sending me to 
Atlanta to live with my aunt and uncle. I told you I’d be living just three blocks 
away from you!” 

“I know. I know,” Evan replied, rolling his eyes. “I just didn’t expect to see 
you jump out of the hedge at me.” 

“Why not?” Andy demanded, her dark eyes exploring his. 

Evan didn’t know how to answer that question. 

“Glad to see me?” Andy asked. 

“No,” he joked. 

She pulled up a thick blade of grass and stuck it in the corner of her mouth. 
They began walking toward Evan’s house. 

“I’m starting at your school on Monday,” she told him, chewing on the 
blade of grass. 

“Thrills and chills,” he replied, snickering. 



She shoved him off the sidewalk. “I thought people were supposed to be 
polite in the South.” 

“I’m new here,” Evan replied. 

“How’s Trigger?” she asked, kicking a pebble across the sidewalk. 

“Good,” Evan told her. 

“Like to talk a lot?” she asked sarcastically. 

“I’m in a bad mood,” he confessed. “It hasn’t been the greatest day.” 

“It couldn’t be as bad as the day the Monster Blood went berserk!” Andy 
exclaimed. 

Evan groaned. “Don’t mention Monster Blood to me. Please!” 

She studied him. Her expression turned serious. “What’s wrong, Evan? You 
look really upset,” she said. “Don’t you like it here?” 

He shook his head. “Not much.” 

As they walked, he told her about all the trouble he was having in his new 
school. He told her about Mr. Murphy and Cuddles, and how the teacher was 
always on his case. 

And he told her about Conan the Barbarian, and how Conan was always 
picking on him, always getting him into trouble, always playing tricks on him 
and making him look bad. 

“And no one will believe me about the Monster Blood,” Evan added. 

They were standing at the bottom of his driveway. They glanced up at 
Evan’s new house, a two-story red brick house with a sloping red tile roof. The 
late afternoon sun dipped behind a large puff of cloud, and a broad shadow 
rolled across the lawn. 

Andy’s mouth dropped open. The blade of grass fell out. “You told kids 
about the Monster Blood?” she asked in surprise. 

Evan nodded. “Yeah, why not? It’s a cool story, isn’t it?” 

“And you expected kids to believe you?” Andy cried, slapping her 
forehead. “Didn’t they just think you were weird?” 

“Yeah,” Evan replied bitterly. “They all think I’m weird.” 

Andy laughed. “Well, you are weird!” 

“Thanks a bunch, Annnndrea!” Evan muttered. He knew she hated to be 
called by her real name. 

“Don’t call me Andrea,” she replied sharply. She raised a fist. “I’ll pound 
you.” 

“Annnnnndrea,” he repeated. He ducked away as she swung her fist. “You 



punch like a girl!” he exclaimed. 

“You’ll bleed like a boy!” she threatened, laughing. 

He stopped. He suddenly had an idea. “Hey—you can tell everyone I’m not 
weird!” 

“Huh? Why would I do that?” Andy demanded. 

“No. Really,” Evan said excitedly. “You can tell everyone at school that the 
Monster Blood was real. That you were there. That you saw it.” 

Andy’s expression suddenly changed. Her dark eyes lit up, and a sly grin 
crossed her face. “I can do better than that,” she said mysteriously. 

Evan grabbed her shoulder. “Huh? What do you mean? What do you mean 
you can do better?” 

“You’ll see,” she replied, teasing him. “I brought something with me.” 

“What? What is it? What do you mean?” Evan demanded. 

“Meet me tomorrow after school,” she told him. “At that little park over 
there.” 

She pointed to the next block. A narrow park, only a few blocks long, ran 
along the bank of a shallow creek. 

“But what is it?” Evan cried. 

She laughed. “I love torturing you!” she declared. “But it’s a little too easy.” 

Then she turned and headed down the street, running at full speed. 

“Andy—wait!” Evan called. “What have you got? What did you bring?” 

She didn’t even turn around. 



8 


Evan dreamed about Monster Blood that night. 

He dreamed about it nearly every night. 

Tonight he dreamed that his dad had eaten a glob of it. Now Mr. Ross 
wanted to go to his office, but he had grown too big to fit through the door. 

“You’re in trouble now, Evan!” Mr. Ross bellowed, making the whole 
house shake. “Big trouble!” 

Big trouble. 

The words stuck in Evan’s mind as he sat up in bed and tried to shake away 
the dream. 

The curtains flapped silently in front of his open bedroom window. Pale 
yellow stars dotted the charcoal sky. Staring hard, Evan could see the Big 
Dipper. Or was it the Little Dipper? He never could remember. 

Shutting his eyes and settling back on the pillow, Evan thought about Andy. 
He was glad she had come to stay in Atlanta for a while. She could be a real 
pain. But she was also a lot of fun. 

What did she want to show him in the park after school? 

Probably nothing, Evan guessed. It was probably just a dumb joke. Andy 
loved dumb jokes. 

How can I get her to tell the kids at school about Monster Blood? he 
wondered. How can I get Andy to tell everyone that I didn’t make it up, that it’s 
true? 

He was still thinking about this problem as he fell back into a restless sleep. 

The next day at school wasn’t much better than the last. 

Somehow during free reading period, Conan had crept under the table and 
tied Evan’s sneaker laces together. When Evan got up to go to the water 
fountain, he fell flat on his face. He scraped a knee, but no one cared. The kids 
laughed for hours. 

“Evan’s mommy tied his shoes funny this morning!” Conan told everyone. 
And they laughed even harder. 

In science class, Mr. Murphy called Evan over to the hamster cage. “Look 
at poor Cuddles,” the teacher said, shaking his round head solemnly. 



Evan peered down into the metal cage. Cuddles was curled up in a corner 
under a pile of shavings. The hamster was trembling and breathing in short 
gasps. 

“Poor Cuddles has been like that ever since yesterday,” Mr. Murphy told 
Evan with an accusing frown. “Cuddles is sick because of your carelessness.” 

“I—I’m sorry,” Evan stammered. He stared hard at the quivering hamster. 
You’re faking—aren’t you, Cuddles? Evan thought. You’re faking just to get me 
in trouble! 

The hamster twitched and stared up at him with mournful, black eyes. 

When Evan sat back down in his seat, he felt cold water seep through the 
back of his jeans. With a startled cry, he jumped right back up. Someone— 
probably Conan—had poured a cup of water on his chair. 

That had the class laughing for at least ten minutes. They stopped only 
when Mr. Murphy threatened to keep everyone after school. 

“Sit down, Evan,” the teacher ordered. 

“But, Mr. Murphy—” Evan started. 

“Sit down—now!” Mr. Murphy insisted. 

Evan dropped back down into the wet chair. What choice did he have? 

Andy was waiting for Evan by the trickling brown creek that rolled through the 
tiny park. The old sassafras trees bent and whispered in a hot breeze. A tall 
Georgia pine leaned over the water as if trying to reach across the creek. 

Andy was wearing a bright blue T-shirt over lime-green short-shorts. She 
had been staring at her reflection in the muddy creek water. She spun around 
smiling as Evan called to her. 

“Hey, how’s it going?” he called. He stepped up beside her and dropped his 
backpack to the ground. 

“How was school?” Andy asked. 

“Same as always,” Evan replied, sighing. Then his expression brightened. 
“What did you bring?” he asked eagerly. 

“You’ll see.” She clasped a hand over his eyes. “Shut your eyes, Evan. And 
don’t open them until I say.” 

He obediently shut his eyes. But when she pulled her hand away, he opened 
them a tiny crack, just enough to see. He watched her go behind the pine tree and 
pick up a small brown paper bag. 

She carried the bag over to him. “You’re peeking—aren’t you?” she 



accused him. 

“Maybe,” he confessed, grinning. 

She punched him playfully in the stomach. He cried out and his eyes shot 
open. “What’s in the bag?” 

Grinning, Andy handed the bag to him. 

He pulled it open, peered inside—and his mouth dropped open in shock. 

The familiar blue can, about the size of a can of soup. 

“Andy—you—you—” Evan stammered, still staring wide-eyed into the 

bag. 

He reached in and pulled out the plastic can. 

He read the faded label: MONSTER BLOOD. 

Then he read the words in tiny type below it: SURPRISING MIRACLE 
SUBSTANCE. 

“I saved it,” Andy said, beaming proudly. 

Evan couldn’t get over his shock. “You brought Monster Blood! I don’t 
believe it! You brought Monster Blood!” 

“No.” She shook her head. “It’s empty, Evan. The can is empty.” 

His face fell. He sighed in total disappointment. 

“But you can show the can to everyone,” Andy insisted. “That will prove 
you didn’t make it up. It will prove that Monster Blood really exists.” 

Evan sighed again. “What good is an empty can?” he groaned. 

He pulled off the top, peered inside—and screamed. 



9 


With a trembling hand, Evan tilted the can so that Andy could see inside. 

“Oh, no!” she shrieked, pulling her hands to her cheeks. 

The can was half full. 

Inside, a green glob of gooey Monster Blood shimmered in the sunlight like 
lime jell-o. 

“But it was empty!” Andy protested, staring into the can. “I know it was!” 

Evan shook the can. The green glob inside quivered. 

“There must have been a tiny speck in there,” Evan guessed. “Down at the 
bottom of the can. And now it’s growing and growing again.” 

“Great!” Andy declared. She slapped him on the back so hard, he nearly 
dropped the blue can. 

“Great? What’s so great?” he demanded shakily. 

“Now you can show this to the kids at your school,” she replied. “Now 
they’ll have to believe you.” 

“I guess,” Evan replied in a low voice. 

“Oh! I have a better idea!” she exclaimed, her dark eyes lighting up 
mischievously. 

“Uh-oh,” Evan moaned. 

“Slip a little glob of it in that guy Conan’s lunch tomorrow. When he starts 
to grow as big as a hippo, everyone will see that the Monster Blood is real.” 

“No way!” Evan cried. He cupped the blue can in both hands, as if 
protecting it from Andy. “Conan is already big enough!” he told her, taking a 
step back. “I don’t want him to grow another inch. Do you know what he could 
do to me if he became a giant?” 

Andy laughed and shrugged. “It was just an idea.” 

“A bad idea,” Evan said sharply. “A really bad idea.” 

“You’re no fun,” she teased. She leaped forward and tried to wrestle the can 
from his hands. 

He spun around, turning his back to her, and hunched over, protecting the 

can. 

“Give it to me!” she cried, laughing. She started tickling his sides. “Give it! 
Give it!” 



“No!” he protested, breaking free. He ran to the safety of a tall evergreen 
shrub. 

“It’s mine!” Andy declared, coming after him, hands at her waist. “If you’re 
not going to use it, hand it back.” 

Evan stood his ground. His expression turned serious. “Andy, don’t you 
remember?” he demanded shrilly. “Don’t you remember how scary this stuff 
was? Don’t you remember how dangerous it was? All the trouble it caused?” 

“So?” she replied, her eyes on the blue can. 

“We have to get rid of it,” Evan told her firmly. “We can’t let it out of the 
can. It will grow and grow and never stop.” 

“But I thought you wanted to show it to the kids to prove that it’s real.” 

“No,” Evan interrupted. “I changed my mind. This stuff is too dangerous. 
We have to get rid of it.” He locked his eyes on hers, his features tight with fear. 
“Andy, I’ve had nightmares every night because of this stuff. I don’t want any 
new nightmares.” 

“Okay, okay,” she muttered. She kicked at an upraised tree root. Then she 
handed him the brown paper bag. 

Evan clicked the top back on the can of Monster Blood. Then he shoved the 
can into the bag. “Now how do we get rid of it?” he wondered out loud. 

“I know. Dump it in the creek,” Andy suggested. 

Evan shook his head. “No good. What if it gets out and pollutes the creek?” 

“This creek is already polluted!” Andy exclaimed. “It’s just a big mud 
puddle!” 

“It isn’t deep enough,” Evan insisted. “Someone will find the can and pull it 
out. We can’t take a chance.” 

“Then how do we get rid of it?” Andy asked, twisting her face in 
concentration. “Hmmmm. We could eat it ourselves. That would get rid of it!” 

“Very funny,” Evan muttered, rolling his eyes. 

“Just trying to be helpful,” Andy said. 

“You’re about as helpful as a toothache!” Evan shot back. 

“Ha-ha. Remind me to laugh at that sometime,” she replied, sticking her 
tongue out at him. 

“How can we get rid of it?” Evan repeated, gripping the bag in both hands. 
“How?” 

“I know!” a boy’s voice called, startling them both. 

Conan Barber stepped out from behind a tall shrub. 



“You can give it to me!” he declared. He reached out a big, powerful- 
looking hand to grab the bag. 



10 


Evan swung the paper bag behind his back. 

Conan lumbered toward them over the tall grass. His eyes were narrowed 
menacingly at Evan. 

How long has he been hiding there? Evan wondered. Did he hear us talk 
about the Monster Blood? Is that why he wants the bag? 

“Hi, I’m Andy,” Andy chirped brightly. She stepped in between the two 
boys and flashed Conan a smile. 

“Andy is a boy’s name,” Conan said, making a disgusted face. He turned 
his hard stare on her, challenging her. 

“And what kind of a name is Conan?” Andy shot back, returning his stare. 

“You know me?” Conan asked, sounding surprised. 

“You’re famous,” Andy replied dryly. 

Conan suddenly remembered Evan. He stuck out his big paw. “I’ll take the 
bag now.” 

“Why should I give it to you?” Evan demanded, trying to keep his voice 
calm and steady. 

“Because it’s mine,” Conan lied. “I dropped it here.” 

“You dropped an empty bag here?” Evan asked. 

Conan swatted a fly from his blond hair. “It isn’t empty. I saw you put 
something in it. Hand it over. Now.” 

“Well... okay.” Evan handed him the paper bag. Conan eagerly reached 
inside. 

His hand came out empty. 

He peered inside the bag. Empty. 

He stared hard at Andy, then at Evan. 

“I told you it was empty,” Evan said. 

“Guess I made a mistake,” Conan muttered. “Hey, no hard feelings. Shake.” 
Conan reached out his big right hand to Evan. 

Evan reluctantly stuck out his hand. 

Conan slid his hand over Evan’s and began to tighten his grip. Harder. 
Harder. 



Evan’s fingers cracked so loudly, they sounded like a tree falling! 

Conan squeezed Evan’s hand harder and harder until Evan screamed in 
pain. When Conan finally let go, the hand looked like a slab of raw hamburger. 

“Nice handshake you got there!” Conan exclaimed, grinning. 

He snapped his finger against Andy’s nose, then headed off quickly toward 
the street, taking long strides, laughing to himself. 

“Great guy,” Andy muttered, rubbing her nose. 

Evan blew on his hand, as if trying to put out a fire. “Maybe I can learn to 
be left-handed,” he murmured. 

“Hey—where’s the Monster Blood?” Andy demanded. 

“I—I dropped it,” Evan replied, still examining his hand. 

“Huh?” She kicked away a clump of weeds and stepped over to him. 

“I thought I could shove the can into my back jeans pocket while Conan 
was talking to you,” Evan explained. “But it slipped out of my hand. I dropped 
it.” 

He turned, bent over, and picked it up from the tall grass. “Good thing it 
didn’t roll or anything. Conan would have seen it.” 

“He wouldn’t know what to do with it if he had it,” Andy said. 

“What are we going to do with it?” Evan demanded. “It’s already caused us 
trouble. We’ve got to hide it, or throw it away, or—or—” 

He pulled open the lid. “Oh, wow! Look!” He held the can up to Andy’s 
face. The green goo had grown nearly to the top of the can. “It’s starting to grow 
a lot faster. I guess because we exposed it to the air.” 

Evan slammed the lid on tight. 

“Let’s bury it,” Andy suggested. “Here. Right under this tree. We’ll dig a 
deep hole and bury it.” 

Evan liked the idea. It was simple and quick. 

They squatted down and began digging with their hands. The dirt beneath 
the tree was soft. The hole grew deep before they had worked up a sweat. 

Evan dropped the blue can of Monster Blood into the hole. Then they 
quickly covered it with dirt, smoothing it out until it was impossible to tell a hole 
had been dug. 

“This was a good plan,” Andy said, climbing to her feet, playfully wiping 
the dirt off her hands on the back of Evan’s T-shirt. “If we need it, we’ll know 
where it is.” 

Evan’s red hair was matted to his forehead with sweat. He had a wide smear 



of dirt across his freckled forehead. “Huh? Why would we need it?” he 
demanded. 

Andy shrugged. “You never know.” 

“We won’t need it,” Evan told her firmly. “We won’t.” 

He was very, very wrong. 



11 


“Hey, Dad, what’s up?” Evan stepped into the garage. 

Mr. Ross stopped hammering and turned around. He smiled at Evan. “Want 
to see my newest work?” 

“Yeah. Sure,” Evan replied. Every weekend, his father spent hour after hour 
in his garage workshop, banging away on large sheets of metal, making what he 
called his “works”. 

He chiseled and hammered and sawed, and put a lot of effort into his 
sculptures. But to Evan, they all looked like banged-up sheets of metal when 
they were finished. 

Mr. Ross took a few steps back to admire his current project. He lowered 
his heavy mallet in one hand and pointed with the chisel he held in his other 
hand. “I used brass for this one,” he told Evan. “I call it ‘Autumn Leaf’.” 

Evan studied it thoughtfully. “It looks like a leaf,” he lied. It looks like Dad 
mined a perfectly good piece of brass, he thought, trying to keep a straight face. 

“It’s not supposed to look like a leaf,” Mr. Ross corrected Evan. “It’s 
supposed to look like my impression of a leaf.” 

“Oh.” Evan scratched his curly, red hair as he studied it some more. “Neat, 
Dad,” he said. “I see what you mean.” 

Then something else caught his eye. “Hey—what’s this?” 

Evan carefully stepped over several jagged, bent shards of metal. He made 
his way to another metal sculpture and ran his hand over the smooth, shiny 
surface. It was an enormous aluminum cylinder that rested above a flat wooden 
base. 

“Go ahead. Spin it,” Mr. Ross instructed, smiling proudly. 

Evan pushed the cylinder with both hands. It spun slowly over the wooden 

base. 

“I call it ‘The Wheel’,” his father told him. 

Evan laughed. “That’s cool, Dad. You invented the wheel!” 

“Don’t laugh!” Mr. Ross replied, grinning. “That sculpture was accepted at 
the annual arts competition at your school. I have to take it to the auditorium 
later this week.” 

Evan gave “The Wheel” another spin. “I’ll bet no one else made a wheel 



that really spins,” he told his father. “You can’t lose with this, Dad,” he teased. 

“Sarcasm is the lowest form of humor,” Mr. Ross muttered with a frown. 

Evan said good-bye and made his way out of the garage, stepping carefully 
over the jagged pieces of brass and tin. As he headed to the house, he could hear 
the clang clang clang as his dad hammered away on his impression of a leaf. 

In the halls after school on Monday, Evan hurried around a corner and bumped 
right into Andy. “I can’t talk now,” he told her breathlessly. “I’m late for 
basketball tryouts.” 

He glanced down the long hall. It was nearly empty. The gym door opened, 
and he could hear the thump of basketballs against the floor. 

“How come you’re late?” Andy demanded, blocking his path. 

“Murphy kept me after class,” Evan told her with a groan. “He put me on 
permanent hamster duty. I have to take care of Cuddles every afternoon for the 
rest of my life.” 

“Bad news,” Andy murmured. 

“No. That’s the good news,” Evan replied bitterly. 

“What’s the bad news?” 

“The bad news is that Mr. Murphy is also the basketball coach!” 

“Well, good luck,” she said. “Hope you make the team.” 

Evan ran past her, his heart pounding. 

Mr. Murphy is such a rat, he thought unhappily. He’ll probably keep me off 
the team because I’m late to practice—even though it’s his fault I’m late! 

Evan took a deep breath. No. Stop thinking like that, he scolded himself. 

Think positive. I’ve got to think positive. 

Sure, I’m not as tall as the other guys. Maybe I’m not as big or as strong. 
But I’m a good basketball player. And I can make this team. 

I can make this team. I know I can! 

Having finished his pep talk to himself, Evan pulled open the double gym 
doors and stepped into the huge, brightly lit gym. 

“Think fast!” a voice called. 

Evan felt his face explode with pain. 

Then everything went black. 



12 


When Evan opened his eyes, he found himself staring up at about twenty guys 
and Mr. Murphy. 

He was stretched out fiat on his back on the gym floor. His face still hurt. A 
lot. 

He reached a hand up and touched his nose. To his dismay, it felt like a 
wilted leaf of lettuce. 

“You okay, Evan?” Mr. Murphy asked quietly. As the teacher leaned over 
Evan, the whistle that was on a string around his neck bumped against Evan’s 
chest. 

“Did my face explode?” Evan asked weakly. 

Some of the guys snickered. Mr. Murphy glowered at them angrily. Then he 
turned back to Evan. “Conan hit you in the face with the basketball,” he 
reported. 

“He’s got bad reflexes, Coach,” Evan heard Conan say from somewhere 
above him. “He should’ve caught the ball. I really thought he’d catch it. But he’s 
got bad reflexes.” 

“I saw the whole thing,” Conan’s friend, a huge hulk of a kid named Biggie 
Malick, chimed in. “It wasn’t Conan’s fault. Evan should’ve caught the ball. It 
was a perfect pass.” 

Perfect, Evan thought with a sigh. He touched his nose again. This time, it 
felt like a lump of mashed potatoes. At least it isn’t broken, he thought glumly. 

Evan’s basketball tryout went downhill from there. 

Mr. Murphy helped him to his feet. “You sure you want to try out?” he 
asked. 

Thanks for the support, Evan thought bitterly. 

“I think I can make the team,” he said. 

But Conan, Biggie, and the other guys had other ideas. 

During the ball-handling tryout, Evan confidently began dribbling across 
the floor. Halfway to the basket, Biggie bumped him hard—and Conan stole the 
ball away. 

They blocked Evan’s shots. They stole his passes. 

They bumped him every time he moved, sending him sprawling to the 



hardwood floor again and again. 

A fast pass from Conan caught Evan in the mouth. 

“Oops! Sorry!” Conan yelled. 

Biggie laughed like a hyena. 

“Defense! I want to see defense!” Mr. Murphy shouted from the sidelines. 

Evan lowered himself into a defensive stance. As Conan dribbled the ball 
toward him, Evan prepared to defend the basket. 

Conan drove closer. Closer. 

Evan raised both hands to block Conan’s shot. 

But to Evan’s surprise, Conan let the ball bounce away. In one swift motion, 
he grabbed Evan by the waist, leaped high in the air, and stuffed Evan into the 
basket. 

“Three points!” Conan shouted in triumph. 

Biggie and the other guys rushed to congratulate Conan, laughing and 
cheering. 

Mr. Murphy had to get a stepladder to help Evan down. 

His hand on Evan’s shoulder, the teacher led him to the side. “You’re just 
not tall enough, Evan,” he said, rubbing his pink chins. “Don’t take it personally. 
Maybe you’ll grow. But for now, you’re just not tall enough.” 

Evan didn’t say a word. He lowered his head and sadly slumped out of the 

gym. 

Conan came running up to him at the door. “Hey, Evan, no hard feelings,” 
he said. He stuck out his big, sweaty hand. “Shake.” 

Evan held up his hand to show Andy. “It looks like a wilted petunia,” she said. “I 
can’t believe I fell for Conan’s stupid handshake trick twice!” Evan wailed. It 
was the next afternoon. Evan and Andy had walked from school to the small 
park near their houses. Evan had complained about Mr. Murphy and Conan and 
the other basketball players the whole way. 

The late afternoon sun beamed down on them as they walked. Andy 
stopped to watch two monarch butterflies, their black-and-gold wings fluttering 
majestically as they hovered over a patch of blue and yellow wildflowers along 
the creekbed. 

Even the trickling brown creek looked pretty on this bright day. Tiny white 
gnats sparkled like diamonds in the sunlight over the shimmering water. 

Evan kicked at a fallen tree branch. Everything looked dark to him today. 



Dark and ugly. 

“It just wasn’t fair,” he grumbled, kicking the branch again. “It wasn’t a fair 
tryout. Mr. Murphy should have given me a better chance.” 

Andy tsk-tsked, her eyes on the sparkling creek. 

“Someone should teach Mr. Murphy a lesson,” Evan said. “I wish I could 
think of some way of paying him back. I really do.” 

Andy turned to him. A devilish grin crossed her face. “I have a plan,” she 
said softly. “A really neat plan.” 

“What is it?” Evan demanded. 



13 


“What’s your idea?” Evan demanded again. 

Andy grinned at him. She was wearing a long, lime-green T-shirt over a 
Day-Glo orange T-shirt, pulled down over baggy blue shorts. The sunlight made 
all the colors so bright, Evan felt like shielding his eyes. 

“You might not like it,” Andy said coyly. 

“Try me,” Evan replied. “Come on. Don’t keep me in suspense.” 

“Well...” Her eyes wandered over to the tree where they had buried the 
Monster Blood. “It has to do with the Monster Blood,” she said reluctantly. 

He swallowed hard. “That’s okay. Go on.” 

“Well, it’s a pretty simple plan. First, we dig up the Monster Blood,” Andy 
said, watching his reaction. 

“Yeah?” 

“Then we take some to school,” she continued. 

“Yeah?” 

“Then we feed it to Cuddles.” 

Evan’s mouth dropped open. 

“Just a little bit!” Andy quickly explained. “We feed Cuddles a tiny glob of 
it. Just enough to make him the size of a dog.” 

Evan laughed. It was a terrible idea, a truly evil idea—but he loved it! 

He slapped Andy on the back. “You’re bad, Andy!” he cried. “You’re really 
bad!” 

Andy grinned proudly. “I know.” 

Evan laughed again. “Can you see the look on Murphy’s face when he 
comes in and sees his precious little hamster has grown as big as a cocker 
spaniel? What a riot!” 

“So you’ll do it?” Andy asked. 

Evan’s smile faded. “I guess,” he replied thoughtfully. “If you promise 
we’ll only use a tiny bit. And we’ll bury the rest right away.” 

“Promise,” Andy said. “Just enough to play our little joke on Mr. Murphy. 
Then we’ll never use the stuff again.” 

“Okay,” Evan agreed. 



They shook hands solemnly. 

Then they hurried to the tree. Evan searched the entire park, squinting 
against the bright sunlight. He wanted to make sure no one was spying on them 
this time. 

When he was sure the park was empty, he and Andy dropped to their knees 
under the tree and began scooping the dirt off the hole with their hands. 

They had dug nearly two feet down when they realized the hole was empty. 

“The Monster Blood!” Evan cried. “It—it’s gone!” 



14 


“We must be digging under the wrong tree,” Evan said, sweat pouring down his 
freckled forehead. 

Andy pushed a wet strand of brown hair off her face with a dirt-covered 
finger. “No way.” She shook her head. “This is the right tree. And the right 
hole.” 

“Then where is the Monster Blood?” Evan demanded shrilly. 

They both came up with the answer to his question at the same time: 
“Conan!” 

“He must have watched us bury it,” Evan said, his eyes darting around the 
park as if he expected to see Conan jump out from behind a bush. “I thought he 
hurried away awfully fast that afternoon. He knew the paper bag wasn’t empty.” 

Andy agreed. “He hid and watched us bury it. Then he waited till we were 
gone, and dug it up.” 

They both stared into the empty hole in horrified silence. 

Andy broke the silence. “What is Conan going to do with it?” she asked, 
her voice just above a whisper. 

“Probably eat it so he can grow bigger and pound me harder,” Evan replied 
bitterly. 

“But he doesn’t know what Monster Blood does,” Andy said. “He doesn’t 
know how dangerous it is.” 

“Of course he does. I told him all about it,” Evan replied. He slammed his 
hand against the tree trunk. “We have to get it back!” 

Before science class the next afternoon, Evan found Conan in the hall. He and 
Biggie were standing next to Evan’s locker. They were laughing loudly about 
something, slapping each other high-fives. 

Conan wore a tight blue muscle shirt and baggy faded denim jeans with 
enormous holes at the knees. Biggie had wavy brown hair down to his shoulders. 
He wore a sleeveless white T-shirt and tight-fitting black denims. 

They look like a couple of tag-team wrestlers! Evan thought as he stepped 
between them. 

“Hey, look—it’s Air Evan!” Conan joked. “King of the slam dunk!” 



He and Biggie guffawed loudly. Conan gave Evan a slap on the back that 
sent him sprawling into Biggie. 

“Uh... Conan? Did you find something in the park?” Evan asked, 
struggling to regain his balance. 

Conan narrowed his eyes at Evan and didn’t reply. 

“Did you find something that belongs to Andy and me?” Evan repeated. 

“You mean like your brains ?” Conan exclaimed. He and his tag-team 
partner roared with laughter over that gem. 

“Why don’t we dribble him to class?” Biggie asked Conan. “Coach Murphy 
would like to see us get in some extra practice.” 

Conan laughed gleefully at that idea. 

“Ha-ha. Very funny,” Evan said sarcastically. “Look, Conan—that stuff you 
took. It’s really dangerous. You have to give it back.” 

Conan opened his eyes in wide-eyed innocence. “I really don’t know what 
you’re talking about, Evan. Did you lose something?” 

“You know I lost something,” Evan replied sharply. “And I want it back.” 

Conan flashed a sly grin at Biggie. Then he turned back to Evan, his 
expression hardening. “I don’t know what you mean, Evan,” he said. “Really. I 
don’t know what you and that girl lost. But tell you what. I’m a nice guy. I’ll 
help you look for it.” 

He grabbed Evan around the waist with both hands. Biggie pulled Evan’s 
locker door open. 

“I’ll help you look for it in your locker,” Conan said. 

He shoved Evan inside the locker and slammed the door shut. 

Evan started pounding on the metal door, shouting for help. 

But the bell had rung. Evan knew the hall was empty. There was no one to 
hear his cries. 

He decided to try fiddling with the latch. But it was too dark to see 
anything. And he was so jammed in, he couldn’t raise his arms. 

Finally, two girls happened to walk by, and they pulled open the locker 

door. 

Evan came bursting out, red-faced, gasping for air. 

The girls’ laughter followed him all the way to Mr. Murphy’s class. “You’re 
late,” the teacher said sternly, glancing up at the wall clock as Evan staggered in. 

Evan tried to explain why. But all that escaped his lips was a whistling 
wheeze. 



“I’m really tired of you disrupting my class, Evan,” Mr. Murphy said, 
rubbing his nearly bald head. “I’m afraid I’ll be seeing you after school again. 
You can give Cuddles’ cage a double cleaning. And while you’re at it, you can 
scrub the chalkboards and clean out all the test tubes, too.” 


* * * 


“It’s so dark,” Evan whispered. 

“It usually gets dark at night,” Andy replied, rolling her eyes. 

“The streetlight is out,” Evan said, pointing. “And there’s no moon tonight. 
That’s why it’s so dark.” 

“Hide! ” Andy whispered. 

They ducked behind the hedge as a car rolled slowly past. Evan shut his 
eyes as the white headlights moved over him. When the car turned the corner, 
they climbed to their feet. 

It was a little after eight o’clock. They were standing in the street in front of 
Conan’s house. Leaning against the low hedge, they stared across the sloping 
front lawn into the large picture window in the front of the house. 

The lamp in the living room was lit, casting a dim rectangle of orange light 
that spilled onto the front yard. The old trees at the sides of the small brick house 
whispered in a hot breeze. 

“Are we really doing this?” Evan asked, huddling close to Andy. “Are we 
really going to break into Conan’s house?” 

“We’re not going to break in,” Andy whispered. “We’re going to sneak in.” 

“But what if the Monster Blood isn’t there?” Evan asked, hoping she 
couldn’t see his knees trembling. 

“We have to look, don’t we?” Andy shot back. 

She turned to study his face. He saw that she was frightened, too. “The 
Monster Blood will be there,” she told him. “It’s got to be.” 

Bending low, she started to creep across the dark yard to the house. 

Evan hung back. “You checked it out?” he called to her. “Everyone is really 
gone?” 

“His parents left right after dinner,” Andy told him. “Then I saw Conan go 
out about ten minutes ago,” 

“Where?” Evan demanded. 

“How should I know?” she asked sharply, putting her hands on her waist. 



“He left. The house is empty.” She came back and tugged Evan’s arm. “Come 
on. Let’s sneak into Conan’s room, get the Monster Blood, and get out of here!” 

“I can’t believe we’re doing this,” Evan said, sighing. “We—we could be 
arrested!” 

“It was your idea!” Andy reminded him. 

“Oh. Yeah. Right.” He took a deep breath and held it, hoping it would help 
calm him down. “If we don’t find it right away, we get out of there—right?” 

“Right,” Andy agreed. “Now come on.” She gave him a little shove toward 
the house. 

They took a few steps over the dew-wet grass. 

They both stopped when they heard the low barking. 

Andy grabbed Evan’s arm. 

The barking grew louder. They could hear the dog’s heavy paws pounding 
the ground, approaching fast. 

Two angry eyes. A loud warning bark. Another. 

The dog attacked at full speed. 

“Run!” Evan cried. “Conan has a guard dog!” 

“Too late to run!” Andy shrieked. 



15 


The dog barked again. 

Evan cried out and threw up his hands as the dog leaped for his throat. 

The dog wasn’t as big as Evan had thought—but it was strong. 

It licked his face, pressing its wet snout into his cheek. 

It licked his chin. And then his lips. 

“Yuck!” Evan cried, laughing. “Trigger—how did you get here?” 

Evan pulled the cocker spaniel off him and lowered it to the ground. Its 
stubby tail wagging furiously, Trigger started jumping on Andy. 

“Your dumb dog scared me to death,” she moaned. 

“Me, too,” Evan admitted. “I didn’t hear him following us, did you?” 

Andy squatted down and gave Trigger a few quick pats. Then she glanced 
down the street. 

“Let’s get inside,” she said. “Conan or his parents could be back any 
minute.” 

Trigger pranced along as they made their way over the grass to the front 
door. The house loomed much bigger and darker as they crept onto the stoop. 

“Down, Trigger. Stay down,” Evan whispered. “You can’t come in with us.” 

Andy tried the front door. “Locked.” 

Evan groaned. “Now what?” 

“We try the back door, of course,” Andy replied. She had already jumped 
down off the stoop and was heading around the side of the house. 

“You’ve done this before—haven’t you?” Evan demanded, following her. 

“Maybe,” she replied, grinning at him in the dark. 

A loud howl somewhere nearby made them both stop. 

“What was that?” Evan cried. 

“A werewolf,” Andy told him calmly. “Or maybe a cat.” 

They both laughed. Nervous laughter. 

The back door was locked, too. But the kitchen window was open a crack. 
Evan pushed it open wider, and they crept into the dark kitchen. 

Holding his breath, Evan could hear every sound. Their sneakers scraped 
noisily against the linoleum. The refrigerator hummed. Water swirled in the 



dishwasher. 

I can even hear the pounding of my heart, Evan thought. What am I doing? 
Have I really broken into Conan’s house? 

“This way,” Andy whispered. “His room is probably upstairs.” 

Evan kept against the wall as he followed Andy to the front stairs. They 
passed the small living room, bathed in orange light. The floorboards creaked 
under their shoes. Evan stumbled over a pile of old newspapers stacked in the 
narrow hallway. 

Up the wooden stairs. The banister squeaked under Evan’s hand. A 
Venetian blind rattled against an open window, startling him. 

“Sure is dark,” Andy muttered as they reached the top of the stairs. 

Evan tried to reply, but his breath caught in his throat. 

Holding onto the wall, he followed Andy to the first bedroom. She fumbled 
until she found a light switch, then clicked it on. The ceiling light revealed that 
they had found Conan’s room. 

They both stood in the doorway, waiting for their eyes to adjust to the light. 
Then they quickly glanced around. 

The walls of the small, square room were filled with posters of sports stars. 
The biggest poster, above Conan’s bed, showed Michael Jordan jumping about 
ten feet in the air as he slam-dunked a basketball. A bookshelf against one wall 
held very few books—but was loaded with sports trophies that Conan had won 
on various teams. 

Suddenly, Andy started to laugh. 

Evan turned to her, startled. “What’s so funny?” 

She pointed to Conan’s bed. “Look—he still has a teddy bear!” 

Evan turned his eyes to the bed, where a forlorn-looking, nearly flat, one- 
eyed teddy bear rested on the pillow. “Conan the Barbarian?” he cried, laughing. 
“He sleeps with a teddy bear?” 

A loud creak made them cut their laughter short. 

They listened hard, their eyes wide with fear. “Just the house,” Evan 
whispered. 

Andy shivered. “Enough fooling around. Let’s find the Monster Blood and 
get out of here.” 

They moved into the center of the room. “Where do you think he hid it?” 
Evan asked, pulling open the closet door. 

“He didn’t,” Andy replied. 



“Huh?” Evan spun around. 

Andy had the blue can of Monster Blood in her hand. Grinning, she held it 
up to show Evan. 

Evan let out a surprised cry. “You found it? Where?” 

“Right on this shelf,” she replied, pointing. “He put it next to his tennis 
trophies.” 

Evan hurried over to her and took the blue can from her hand. As he held it 
up to examine it, the lid popped off. 

The green Monster Blood began bubbling over the top of the can. 

“It’s growing fast!” Evan declared. 

Andy stooped down and picked up the lid. She handed it to Evan. “Put it 
back on. Hurry.” 

Evan tried pushing the lid back on. It kept slipping off. 

“Hurry up,” Andy urged. “We’ve got to go.” 

“The Monster Blood—it’s up over the top,” Evan cried. 

“Shove it down,” Andy instructed. 

Evan tried pushing the green gunk down into the can, pressing against it 
with the palm of his hand. Then he tried pushing it with three fingers. 

He gasped as he felt the green goo tighten around his fingers and start to 
pull them down. 

“It—it’s got me!” Evan stammered. 

Andy’s mouth dropped open. “Huh?” 

“It’s got my fingers!” Evan cried shrilly. “It won’t let go!” 

As Andy hurried to help him, they both heard the front door slam. 

“Someone’s home!” Evan whispered, tugging to pull his fingers free. 
“We’re caught!” 



16 


Andy froze in the center of the room, her eyes wide with horror. 

Evan nearly dropped the can of Monster Blood. The sticky green substance 
tightened its grip on his fingers, making loud sucking sounds. 

But Evan only cared about the sounds coming from downstairs. 

“I’m home!” he heard Conan shout. 

“We’re home, too!” It was a woman’s voice, probably Conan’s mother. 

“They’re all home,” Evan whispered. 

“We’re dead meat!” Andy murmured. 

“I’m going upstairs,” Conan called to his parents. 

Evan let out a terrified cry as he heard Conan’s heavy footsteps on the 
stairs. “Andy—wh-what do we do?” he stammered. 

“The window!” she replied. 

They both lunged toward the open window and peered out. A narrow 
concrete ledge stretched just beneath the window. 

Without hesitating, Andy raised a leg over the windowsill and climbed out 
onto the ledge. “Evan—hurry!” she whispered, gesturing frantically. 

Evan was still desperately trying to pull his fingers from the bubbling green 
goo. Andy reached in through the window and grabbed him by the shoulder. 
“Evan—!” 

He heard Conan’s footsteps in the upstairs hall just outside the bedroom. 

Using his free hand for support, Evan scrambled out the window and joined 
Andy on the narrow ledge. 

“D-don’t look down,” Andy instructed in a trembling whisper. 

Evan didn’t obey. He glanced down. The ground seemed very far below. 

They each stood on a side of the window—Andy to the left, Evan the right. 
They pressed their bodies against the brick wall—and listened. 

They heard Conan step into the room. 

Did he notice that the light had been turned on? 

No way to tell. 

Loud rap music suddenly jarred the silence. Conan had turned on his boom 
box. He started chanting off-key along with the music. 



Evan pressed as tightly against the side of the house as he could. 

Go back downstairs, Conan, he pleaded silently. Please—go back 
downstairs! 

How will Andy and I ever get away from here? he wondered, feeling all of 
his muscles tighten in panic. 

Despite the hot night air, a cold chill ran down Evan’s back. He shuddered 
so hard, he nearly toppled off the ledge. 

The blue can stuck to his hand. The Monster Blood sucked at his fingers. 
But he couldn’t worry about that now. 

He could hear Conan moving around inside the room. Was he dancing to 
the loud music? 

Evan glanced across the window at Andy. Her eyes were shut. Her face was 
clenched in a tight frown. 

“Andy—!” Evan whispered. He knew that Conan couldn’t hear a whisper 
over the booming music. “Andy—it’ll be okay. As soon as he leaves, we’ll jump 
inside and sneak down the stairs.” 

Andy nodded without opening her eyes. “Did I ever tell you I’m afraid of 
heights?” she whispered. 

“No,” Evan replied. 

“Well, remind me to tell you!” 

“We’ll be okay,” he murmured. 

Clinging to the side of the house, Evan kept repeating those words to 
himself. “We’ll be okay. We’ll be okay. We’ll be okay.” 

Then Trigger started to bark. 

A low bark of surprise at first. And then a louder series of barks, insistent 
barks, excited barks. 

Evan swallowed hard. He glanced down to the ground. 

Trigger was peering up at him, jumping against the side of the house, as if 
trying to reach the ledge. The dog barked louder with each jump. 

“Trigger—no!” Evan called down in a frantic whisper. 

That only made the dog bark more furiously. 

Did Conan hear it? Could he hear Trigger’s ferocious barks over the music? 

“Trigger—stop! Go home! Go home!” 

Suddenly the music stopped. 

Trigger’s excited barks rose up even louder against the new silence. 

Conan must hear them now, Evan realized. 



The cocker spaniel threw himself wildly against the side of the house, 
trying to get up to Evan and Andy. Despite Evan’s frantic signals to be quiet, the 
dumb dog barked his head off. 

Evan’s breath caught in his throat as he heard Conan making his way to the 
window. 

A second later, Conan stuck his head out. “What’s going on?” he shouted. 

Evan’s knees buckled. He started to fall. 



17 


Evan clung to the brick wall and stopped his fall. 

He stared at Conan’s blond hair poking out the window. Evan was close 
enough to reach out and touch it. 

“Shut up down there!” Conan shouted. 

That made Trigger bark even louder. 

He’s going to see us, Evan thought, trembling all over. 

There’s no way Conan won’t see us. 

“Conan—come downstairs!” Mrs. Barber’s voice floated up from 
downstairs. “Conan—come down and have your cake and ice cream. You said 
you were dying for dessert!” she called. 

Conan’s head disappeared back into the bedroom. “There’s some stupid dog 
barking down there,” he called to his mother. 

Clinging to the side of the house, struggling to keep his quivering knees 
from buckling again, Evan shut his eyes and listened. 

He heard Conan’s footsteps cross the room. The bedroom light went out. 

Silence. 

“He—left,” Evan choked out. 

Andy let out a long breath. “I can’t believe he didn’t see us out here.” 

Evan glanced down to the ground. Trigger had finally stopped barking. But 
he continued to stand and stare up at them, his front paws against the side of the 
house, his stubby tail spinning like a propeller. 

“Dumb dog,” Evan muttered. 

“Let’s go,” Andy urged. She didn’t wait for Evan. She practically did a 
swan dive into the house. 

It took Evan a few moments to get his legs to work. Then he ducked his 
head and climbed through the window after Andy. 

Holding his breath, he led the way on tiptoe to the bedroom door. He 
stopped and listened. 

Silence. No one in the dark hallway. 

He could hear the Barbers’ voices downstairs in the kitchen. 

He and Andy made their way to the top of the stairs. Then, holding tightly 



to the banister, they crept halfway down. 

Evan stopped to listen again. Andy bumped right into him, nearly sending 
him sailing down the stairs. “Shhh!” she cried. 

They could hear Conan talking to his parents in the kitchen. He was 
complaining about the other guys on the basketball team. “They’re all wimps,” 
Evan heard Conan say. 

“Well, that’ll make you look even better,” Mr. Barber replied. 

Evan took another deep breath and held it. Then he made his way down to 
the bottom of the stairs. 

Almost out, he thought, his entire body shaking. Almost out of here. 

He reached for the front doorknob. 

“Conan, go upstairs and get your math book,” he heard Mr. Barber say. “I 
want to see the homework you had trouble with.” 

“Okay,” Conan replied. His chair scraped against the floor. 

Andy grabbed Evan’s shoulder. 

They stared in frozen horror at each other—one foot away from escape— 
and waited to be caught. 



18 


“Conan—don’t go now. Get the book later,” Mrs. Barber chimed in. Then they 
heard her scold Conan’s father: “Let the boy have his cake and ice cream.” 

“Fine, fine,” Mr. Barber replied. “He can show me the book later.” 

Conan’s chair scraped back into place under the table. 

Evan didn’t wait another second. 

He jerked open the front door, pushed open the screen door, and burst out of 
the house like a rocket. 

He could hear Andy gasping as she ran behind him. And then he could hear 
Trigger’s shrill yips as the dog followed, too. 

Down the Barbers’ front lawn, into the street. Their sneakers slapped the 
pavement as they ran full speed through the darkness. 

They didn’t stop until they reached Evan’s driveway. 

Evan leaned against his family’s mailbox and struggled to catch his breath. 
He raised his hand to wipe the sweat off his forehead—and saw the blue can still 
stuck there. 

“Help me,” he pleaded. He reached out his hand to Andy. 

She was breathing hard, too. Her eyes kept darting back down the street, as 
if she expected Conan to be chasing after them. 

“Close one,” she murmured. She turned to Evan. Her eyes glowed excitedly 
in the light from the streetlamp. “That was fun!” 

Evan didn’t agree. In his opinion, it was far too scary to be fun. And here he 
was, still stuck to the can of Monster Blood. 

He pushed his hand toward Andy. “Pull it off,” he told her. “I think you 
need both hands. I can’t do it.” 

She grabbed the can in both hands. The green gunk bubbled over the sides, 
making loud sucking sounds. 

Andy tugged. Then tugged harder. Then she took a deep breath, leaned 
back, and tugged with all her might. 

The Monster Blood finally let go of its grip on Evan’s fingers. The can slid 
off with a loud pop. Andy went tumbling back onto the pavement. 

“Ow!” Evan held up his three fingers and tried to examine them under the 
streetlight. They were all wrinkled and pruney, the way they looked when he had 



been swimming for an hour or two. 

“Yuck! That stuff is so gross!” he cried. 

Andy climbed slowly to her feet. She still cradled the Monster Blood can in 
both hands. “At least we got it back,” she murmured. 

“Yeah. Now we can bury it again,” Evan said, still examining his fingers. 
“Huh? Bury it?” Andy pulled the can away, as if protecting it from Evan. 
“You heard me,” Evan said firmly. “It’s just too dangerous to mess with, 
Andy. Take it home and bury it in your back yard, okay?” 

Andy stared down at the can. She didn’t reply. 

“Bury it,” Evan repeated. “Take it home and bury it. Promise?” 

“Well...” Andy hesitated. Then she said, “Okay. Promise.” 

Evan woke up with a bad sore throat the next morning. 

His mother worried that he might be coming down with the flu. So she kept 
him home from school. Evan spent the day reading comic books and watching 
MTV. His sore throat disappeared by midafternoon. 

He returned to school the next day, feeling refreshed and ready to see 
everyone. 

The good feeling lasted until he stepped into Mr. Murphy’s science class 
near the end of the day. Evan had to walk past the hamster cage to get to his seat. 
As he neared the cage, he peered in. 

That’s weird, he thought. Where’s Cuddles? 

When did Mr. Murphy get a rabbit? 

A rabbit?! 

He stopped and leaned closer to the cage. 

Familiar black eyes stared up at him. A familiar pink nose twitched at him. 

It was Cuddles, Evan realized. 

Cuddles had grown as big as a rabbit! 



19 


Evan leaned over the hamster cage, staring at the giant-sized Cuddles, as the bell 
rang. He turned to see that the other kids had all taken their seats. 

“Evan, I see you’re examining your victim,” Mr. Murphy said from the 
front of the room. 

“I—uh—” Evan couldn’t think of a reply. “Victim?” 

Mr. Murphy angrily narrowed his beady black eyes at Evan. “You’ve been 
overfeeding Cuddles, Evan. Look how fat he has become.” 

Almost as fat as you! Evan wanted to say. 

Evan knew that Cuddles’ weight problem wasn’t his fault. 

And it had nothing to do with overeating. 

Cuddles had grown to triple-hamster size because of Monster Blood. 

“When I find Andy, I’ll strangle her!” Evan muttered. 

“What did you say, Evan?” Mr. Murphy demanded. 

Evan could feel his face turning bright red. He hadn’t meant to talk out 

loud. 

“Uh... nothing,” he replied, totally embarrassed. He slunk to his seat. 

Andy has gone too far this time, he thought bitterly. She promised she’d 
bury the Monster Blood. She promised! 

And now she’s turned Cuddles into a fat freak! And Murphy thinks it’s all 
my fault! 

“Please stay after school,” Mr. Murphy told Evan, “so we can discuss 
Cuddles’ diet.” 

Evan heard some kids snickering. He knew they were laughing at him. 

He saw Conan and Biggie at their seats in the back. Conan was twitching 
his nose, puffing out his cheeks, pretending to be a fat hamster. Biggie was 
laughing his head off. 

Evan stared at the hamster all through class. Cuddles appeared to grow right 
before Evan’s eyes. With each breath, the hamster seemed to puff up wider and 
taller. 

Its black eyes were as big as marbles now. They stared back at Evan, as if 
accusing him. 

When the hamster moved to its water tube, the entire cage rattled and 



shook. 

Please don’t grow anymore! Evan pleaded silently, staring at the shaking 
cage. Please stop right now, Cuddles. Okay? 

The hamster breathed noisily. Wheezing gasps. Evan could hear Cuddles 
panting all the way across the room. 

The cage shook again as Cuddles turned around. Evan watched in horror as 
the cage nearly toppled off its table. 

I’ll kill Andy! Evan thought bitterly. How could she do this to me? 

When the bell rang, the other kids all gathered up their books and headed 
out the door. Evan stood up and walked over to Cuddles’ cage. 

Panting loudly, Cuddles stared up at him. He’s too big to fit on his wheel, 
Evan realized. If he grows any more, he’ll burst out of the cage! 

How much Monster Blood did Andy feed him? Evan wondered. He had to 
find out. 

He turned to Mr. Murphy, who was reading over some papers at his desk. 
“I’ve got to find someone,” Evan called up to him. “I’ll be right back.” 

“Don’t take too long,” the teacher replied without looking up. 

Evan hurried from the room—and ran into Conan. “Hey, I was looking for 
you,” Conan said, sidestepping to the right, then the left, and stretching out both 
arms to keep Evan from getting away. 

“No time now,” Evan said sharply. But Conan wouldn’t let him pass. “I’m 
kind of in a hurry,” Evan told him. “I don’t have time to be stuffed into my 
locker right now.” 

A big grin crossed Conan’s handsome face. “Hey, I’m sorry about that,” he 
said, his blue eyes twinkling. 

“Huh? You’re sorry?” Evan’s mouth dropped open in shock. 

“Yeah. No hard feelings,” Conan said, lowering his eyes. “Shake.” 

Evan stuck out his hand. Then remembered Conan’s crushing handshake. 
He tried to pull back his hand. 

Too late. 

Conan gripped it tightly and began to squeeze. As he squeezed Evan’s hand, 
his grin grew wider and wider. 

Down the hall, Evan saw Andy heading out the door. He tried to call to her. 
But all that came out of his mouth was a squeak of pain. 

Andy disappeared out the front door of the school. 

The bones in Evan’s hand cracked and crunched. 



When Conan finally let go, the hand looked like a sad lump of soft red clay. 

“Wow! That’s some handshake you’ve got!” Conan cried, laughing. He 
pretended his hand hurt. He shook it hard and blew on it. “You killed me that 
time! You been working out or something?” 

Conan headed off to basketball practice, laughing and shaking his hand. 

He really cracks himself up, Evan thought. An angry cry burst from his 
throat. He slammed his good hand into a locker. He was so furious, he thought 
he could feel steam pouring out his ears. 

“Evan—you’re keeping me waiting!” Mr. Murphy called in a singsong 
from the classroom doorway. 

“Coming,” Evan muttered miserably, and slunk back into the room. 

He tried calling Andy for hours that night. But there was no one home. 

In his sleep, he dreamed that Trigger ate a big glob of Monster Blood and 
grew to giant size. Evan tried to stop him. But the enormous dog took off after 
the mailman. 

It wasn’t much of a chase. Trigger caught the mailman easily. The mailman 
was the size of a hamster. 

Evan woke up drenched with sweat. He glanced at his bedtable clock. Only 
six in the morning. He normally didn’t get up until seven. 

He climbed out of bed, anyway, feeling shaky and scared. 

He decided he had to get to school before everyone else. He had to see if 
Cuddles had grown any bigger. 

“Evan—where are you going?” his mother called sleepily as Evan headed 
out the front door. 

“Uh—school,” Evan replied. He had hoped to sneak out before she woke 
up. 

“So early?” She padded into the room, struggling with the belt to her blue 
cotton robe. 

“Well... I have a science project I need to work on,” Evan told her. It was 
almost the truth. 

“A science project?” She eyed him suspiciously. 

“Yeah. It’s... big!” Evan replied, thinking quickly. “It’s really big! So I 
couldn’t bring it home.” 

“You’re going without any breakfast?” Mrs. Ross demanded, yawning. 

“I’ll grab something at school,” he said. “Later, Mom.” He disappeared out 



the door before she could ask any more questions. 

A red sun was just climbing over the trees in a gray sky. The air still carried 
the chill of the night. The lawns Evan passed shimmered wetly with morning 
dew. 

He jogged the whole way, his backpack flopping heavily on his shoulder. 
There were no other kids on the playground or on the walk heading into the 
building. 

He crept into the school and made his way down the silent, empty hall. His 
sneakers echoed loudly as he trotted toward the science classroom. 

Maybe Cuddles didn’t grow overnight, Evan told himself. 

Maybe he didn’t grow at all. Maybe he shrank. Maybe he shrank back to his 
old size. 

It was possible. 

It was possible that Andy had fed the hamster only a teeny tiny speck of 
Monster Blood. Just enough for Cuddles to swell up to the size of a fat rabbit— 
then shrink right back down to cute, cuddly hamster size. 

It was possible—wasn’t it? 

Yes! Yes! Evan crossed his fingers on both hands. He wished he could cross 
his toes. 

By the time he reached the classroom, he was breathless. His heart thudded 
loudly in his chest. 

He hesitated at the door. 

Please, Cuddles—be small. Be small! 

Then Evan took a deep breath, held it—and stepped inside. 



20 


Evan stepped into the room, staring at the cage against the far wall. At first, he 
didn’t see Cuddles. 

Had Cuddles shrunk? Had he? 

Sometimes prayers are answered, Evan told himself. Sometimes good 
things happen. 

Evan took a few hesitant steps closer. Then a few more steps. 

Every muscle in his body had tensed. He was so frightened, it was actually 
hard to walk. 

He could feel the blood throbbing at his temples. He mopped the cold beads 
of sweat off his forehead. 

He still couldn’t see Cuddles. Where was he? 

Where? 

Gray morning light filtered in through the windows. The floor creaked 
under Evan’s sneakers. 

Evan took another hesitant step toward the cage. 

Another step. 

Then he cried out in horror. 

Evan hadn’t seen Cuddles at first—because Cuddles was too big! 

Cuddles filled the entire cage. 

Evan held back, gaping in disbelief. 

The hamster groaned noisily with every loud breath. It let out several 
disgusting grunts as its body pressed against the wire cage. 

Its big, furry head pushed up against the top of the cage. Evan could see one 
enormous black eye, the size of a jar lid, staring out at him. 

“No!” Evan cried out loud, feeling his knees begin to tremble. “This is 
impossible!” 

The hamster uttered a few more low grunts. 

The cage shook on its table. 

The big black eye glared out at Evan. 

And then as Evan stared in horrified disbelief, the hamster reached up its 
two pink paws. The toes slipped around the wires of the cage. 



Cuddles let out an ugly groan. 

Evan saw its spongy pink nose twitch. He saw a flash of big white teeth. 
Another groan. 

The two front paws pushed against the cage wires. 

The wires bent away. 

Cuddles grunted again, wheezing loudly, excitedly. 

He pushed the cage wires aside. Then he started to squeeze his big, fur- 
covered body through the opening. What do I do? Evan frantically asked 
himself. What do I do now? Cuddles is escaping! 



21 


“So what did you do?” Andy asked. 

They were sitting together in the tall grass of the tiny park, watching the 
brown creek trickle past. The late afternoon sun felt warm on their backs. 
Crickets chirped in the trees behind them. 

Three boys rolled past on bikes on the other side of the creek, heading 
home from school. One of them waved to Evan. He didn’t wave back. 

Andy wore a bright red sleeveless T-shirt over white denim jeans. She had 
slipped off her yellow sneakers and was digging her bare feet into the soft 
ground. 

“So what did you do?” she repeated. 

Evan picked up a hard clump of dirt and tossed it into the creek. Then he 
leaned back, his hands planted firmly behind him on the ground. 

“I got a dog leash,” he told Andy. “In the supply closet.” 

Andy’s eyes widened in surprise. “Murphy keeps a dog leash? What for?” 

Evan shrugged. “He has all kinds of junk back there.” 

“So you put the leash on Cuddles?” 

“Yeah,” Evan told her. “He was just the right size. As big as a dog. Maybe a 
little bigger.” 

“As big as Trigger?” Andy demanded. 

Evan nodded. “Then I tied the other end to the leg of Murphy’s desk—and I 
ran out of there as fast as I could.” 

Andy laughed. But she cut it short when she caught Evan’s angry glare. 
“What happened when you went to science class?” she asked, turning back to the 
creek. 

“I didn’t,” Evan muttered. 

“Huh?” 

“I didn’t go,” Evan said softly. “I was afraid to go. I didn’t want Murphy to 
start blaming me in front of everyone.” 

“So you cut class?” Andy asked, startled. 

Evan nodded. 

“So what did you do?” Andy asked. She pulled up a handful of the tall grass 
and let it sift through her fingers. 



“I sneaked out and came here,” Evan replied, frowning. 

“Everyone was talking about Cuddles all day,” Andy reported. Her dark 
eyes flashed. She couldn’t keep an amused grin off her face. “Everyone had to 
go in and see him. The stupid hamster practically caused a riot!” 

“It isn’t funny,” Evan murmured. 

“It’s kind of funny!” Andy insisted. “Mr. Murphy was bragging that 
Cuddles could beat up any other hamster in the country. He said he was going to 
try to get Cuddles on TV!” 

“Huh?” Evan jumped to his feet. “You mean Mr. Murphy wasn’t upset?” 

“I heard that he was at first,” Andy replied thoughtfully. “But then I guess 
he got used to Cuddles being so big. And he was acting kind of proud. You 
know. Like he had the biggest pumpkin at the fair or something. A blue-ribbon 
winner!” Andy snickered. 

Evan kicked at the grass. “I know he’s going to blame me. I know it!” 

“Everyone was feeding Cuddles carrots all day,” Andy said, not seeming to 
hear Evan’s unhappy wails. “The hamster ate the carrots whole. One big chomp. 
Then it made this really gross swallowing sound. It was a riot.” 

“I can’t believe this!” Evan groaned. He lowered his eyes angrily to Andy. 
“Why did you do it? Why?” 

Andy gazed up at him innocently. “I wanted to give you a laugh,” she 
replied. 

“Huh? A laugh?” he shrieked. 

“You were looking pretty down. I thought it might cheer you up.” 

Evan let out an angry cry. 

“I guess it didn’t cheer you up,” Andy muttered. 

She pulled up another handful of grass and let the blades fall over the legs 
of her white jeans. 

Evan stomped over to the edge of the creek. He kicked a rock into the 
water. 

“Come on, Evan,” Andy called. “You have to admit it’s a little funny.” 

He spun around to face her. “It’s not,” he insisted. “Not funny at all. What if 
Cuddles just keeps growing and growing? Then what?” 

“We could put a saddle on his back and give everyone hamster rides!” She 
giggled. 

Evan scowled and kicked another rock into the creek. “You know how 
dangerous that Monster Blood is,” he scolded. “What are we going to do? How 



are we going to get Cuddles back to hamster size?” 

Andy shrugged. She pulled up another handful of grass. 

The sun sank lower behind the trees. A shadow rolled over them. Two little 
kids chased a white-and-red soccer ball on the other side of the creek. Their 
mother shouted to them not to get wet. 

“Where’s the Monster Blood can?” Evan demanded, standing over Andy. 
“Maybe it tells the antidote on the can. Maybe it tells how to reverse the whole 
thing.” 

Andy shook her head. “Evan, you know it doesn’t say anything on the can. 
No instructions. No ingredients. Nothing.” She climbed to her feet and brushed 
off the legs of her jeans. “I’ve got to get home. My aunt doesn’t know where I 
am. She’s probably having a cow.” 

Evan followed her toward the street, shaking his head. “How big?” he 
muttered. 

She glanced back at him. “What did you say?” 

“How big will Cuddles be tomorrow?” Evan asked in a trembling voice. 
“How big?” 



22 


“Andy—will you hurry up?” 

Evan had agreed to meet Andy at her aunt’s house the next morning so they 
could go to school early. But Andy had found a spot on her jeans and had gone 
back up to her room to change. 

And now they were no longer early. 

“Sorry,” she said, hurtling down the stairs two steps at a time. She had 
changed her entire outfit. Now she had on a red-and-black-striped vest over a 
yellow T-shirt, pulled down over pale blue shorts. 

“Didn’t you leave out a color?” Evan demanded sarcastically, grabbing 
Andy’s backpack for her and hurrying to the front door. 

She made a face at him. “I like bright colors. It suits my personality.” 

“Your personality is late!” he declared. 

She followed him out the door and down the front lawn to the sidewalk. “At 
least I have a personality!” she cried. “What’s your hurry, anyway?” 

Evan didn’t answer. He adjusted his backpack on his shoulder, then began 
running toward school. 

“Hey—wait up!” Andy called, running after him. 

“How much Monster Blood did you give Cuddles, anyway?” Evan 
demanded without slowing his pace. “The whole can?” 

“No way!” Andy called breathlessly. “Just a spoonful. He seemed to like 
it.” 

“I guess he liked being as big as a dog, too,” Evan said, turning the corner. 
The tall, redbrick school building came into view. 

“Maybe he’s back to normal today,” Andy said. 

But as they came near the building, it was easy to tell that things were not 
normal. 

Evan heard a loud crash from the side of the building. It sounded like glass 
shattering. 

Then he heard excited shouts. Loud kids’ voices filled with alarm. 

“What’s going on?” Andy cried. 

They dove up the stairs and burst into the building. Running full speed, they 
turned the corner and made their way to the science classroom. 



Evan reached it a few steps ahead of Andy. Hearing excited shouts and 
cries, he lurched into the room—and then stopped with a startled cry. 

“No! Oh, please—no!” 

“Stand back! Everyone stand back!” a red-faced Mr. Murphy was 
screaming. 

Cuddles uttered a loud grunt and flailed his giant legs wildly in the air. 

“He—he’s ten feet tall!” Evan heard Andy scream at his side. 

“Al-almost!” Evan stammered. 

The grunting, groaning hamster towered over Mr. Murphy. Its pink paws 
batted the air. Its monstrous mouth opened wide, revealing two enormous, sharp 
white teeth. 

“Back! Everyone back!” Mr. Murphy shrieked. 

The terrified kids in the classroom pressed back against the walls. 

Mr. Murphy picked up a wooden chair in one hand, the torn dog leash in the 
other. Holding the chair by the back, he came at the grunting monster like a lion 
tamer. 

“Down, Cuddles! Get down! Sit! Sit!” 

He poked the wooden chair up at the giant hamster and snapped the dog 
leash like a whip. 

Cuddles’ watery black eyes, as big as soccer balls, glared down at the red¬ 
faced teacher. The hamster didn’t seem terribly impressed with Mr. Murphy’s 
lion-tamer act. 

“Down, Cuddles! Get down!” The teacher’s chins quivered, and his big 
belly bounced up and down beneath his tight gray knit polo shirt. 

Cuddles pulled back his huge lips and bared his white teeth. He let out a 
growl that made the light fixtures shake. 

Terrified cries rang out through the room. Evan glanced back to see a 
horrified crowd of teachers and students jammed in the doorway. 

“Down, Cuddles!” 

Mr. Murphy shoved the wooden chair up at the raging hamster. He cracked 
the dog-leash whip near the hamster’s throbbing, fur-covered belly. 

The huge black eyes stared down angrily at Mr. Murphy. The pink hamster 
paws clawed in the air. 

Andy grabbed Evan’s shoulder and held on tight. “This is terrible!” she 
cried. “Terrible!” 

Evan started to reply—but frightened shrieks drowned out his words. 



Cuddles grabbed the chair with both paws. 

“Drop! Drop!” Mr. Murphy screamed. He struggled to hold on to the chair. 

Cuddles pulled the chair. Mr. Murphy desperately held tight. He let the 
leash fall so he could hold on to the chair with both hands. 

The teacher and Cuddles had a short tug-of-war. 

Cuddles won easily. The hamster pulled the chair up, nearly jerking Mr. 
Murphy’s arms out of their sockets. 

With a loud groan, the teacher toppled heavily to the floor. 

Kids screamed. 

Two teachers rushed forward to help the gasping Mr. Murphy to his feet. 

Evan stared up as the hamster raised the wooden chair to its mouth. The 
enormous white teeth opened quickly. The pink nose twitched. The watery black 
eyes blinked. 

Then Cuddles chewed the wooden chair to pieces. 

Splinters rained down on the floor. 

The chomping teeth sounded like a lumberjack’s ax biting into a tree. 

Evan froze in horror along with everyone else in the room. 

Andy was squeezing his shoulder so hard, it hurt. “This is our fault,” she 
murmured. 

“Our fault?” Evan cried. “Our fault?” 

She ignored his sarcasm. He saw the fear in her eyes as she stared up at the 
hamster. Cuddles had turned the chair into toothpicks! 

“We’ve got to do something, Evan,” she whispered, huddled close to him. 

“But what?” Evan replied in a trembling voice. “What can we do?” 

Then, suddenly, he had an idea. 



23 


“Come with me!” Evan cried, tugging Andy’s arm. 

She hesitated, staring up at the giant hamster. “Where?” 

“I have an idea,” Evan told her. “But we have to hurry!” 

Cuddles lumbered over to Mr. Murphy’s desk. The hamster’s heavy 
footsteps made the floor sag. 

“Here, fella! Here!” Mr. Murphy was tossing handfuls of sunflower seeds 
up to Cuddles. Cuddles glared down at him. The seeds were too small to bother 
with. 

“Hurry!” Evan pleaded. He pulled Andy through the frightened crowd of 
kids and teachers at the door. Then he began running full speed toward the 
auditorium. 

“We can’t just run away! We have to do something!” Andy cried. 

“We’re not running away,” Evan called back to her, turning a corner. “My 
father’s sculpture—it’s in the auditorium.” 

“Huh?” Andy’s eyes narrowed in confusion. “Evan—have you totally lost 
it? Why do you want to look at your father’s sculpture now?” 

He burst through the auditorium doors and ran past the dark rows of seats 
toward the stage. Several pieces of sculpture had been set up there. 

“Evan—I don’t get it!” Andy cried, right behind him. 

“Look,” Evan said breathlessly. He pointed to his father’s work near the 
back of the stage. “My dad’s sculpture. It’s just like a hamster wheel—see?” 

Her mouth dropped open as she stared at it. 

“It’s a big metal wheel and it spins,” Evan explained as they pulled 
themselves up onto the stage. “Come on. Help me drag it back to Murphy’s 
room. It’s big enough for Cuddles.” 

“Whoa!” Andy cried. “You want to bring Cuddles a wheel? What for?” 

“To distract him,” Evan replied, grabbing one side of the big sculpture. “If 
we can get Cuddles running on this wheel, it will give us time to figure out 
where to keep him. And it will stop him from chewing the whole school to 
pieces.” 

Andy grabbed hold of the other side, one hand on the wheel, one hand on 
the platform. “Maybe Cuddles will mn so hard, he’ll lose weight. Maybe he’ll 



shrink back to his normal size,” she said. 

Luckily, the platform was on wheels. They rolled the sculpture toward the 
stage door at the side. “I just want to distract him,” Evan said, tugging hard. “I 
just want to give us time to think, to make a plan.” 

“Wow! This is heavy!” Andy cried. They rolled it into the hall. “Heavy 
enough for Cuddles, I guess.” 

“I hope,” Evan replied solemnly. 

By the time they rolled the sculpture to the classroom, the crowd of 
frightened kids and teachers had grown even bigger. “Make way! Make way!” 
they both shouted, pushing their way through the crowd. 

They set the wheel down in the center of the floor and gazed over at 
Cuddles. The hamster had two teachers cornered, their backs pressed against the 
chalkboard. It was gnashing its huge teeth at them, slapping its pink paws 
together as if eager to fight them. 

Evan gasped when he saw Mr. Murphy’s desk, crushed flat on the floor. 

“I—I called the police! ” Mr. Murphy cried, his face beaded with large drops 
of sweat. “I begged them to come. But when I said it was a giant hamster, they 
didn’t believe me! They thought it was a practical joke!” 

“Stand back, everyone!” Evan cried shrilly. “Stand back—please! Let 
Cuddles see the wheel!” 

The giant hamster turned suddenly. The two teachers scrambled away from 
the wall. Kids and teachers screamed and hurried toward the door. 

“Maybe he’ll run on the wheel for a while,” Andy explained to Mr. Murphy. 
“Then we can figure out what to do with him!” 

“He—he sees it!” Mr. Murphy cried breathlessly, all of his chins quivering 
at once. 

Cuddles stared down at the wheel. His stub of a tail thudded loudly against 
the chalkboard. He dropped heavily to all fours and took a lumbering step 
toward the wheel. 

“He sees it. He’s going to it,” Evan murmured softly. 

A hush fell over the room as everyone stared at the hamster. 

Will Cuddles climb inside? Evan wondered, holding his breath. 

Will he run on the wheel? 

Will my plan work? 



24 


The hamster sniffed the wheel. Its pink nose twitched. It uttered a low grunt. 

Then it raised itself back onto its hind legs. The hamster’s massive shadow 
fell over the room. 

With another disgusting grunt, it picked the sculpture up in its front paws 
and raised it to its face. 

“No!” Evan cried. “Cuddles—no!” 

The metal clanged as Cuddles bit into the wheel. Evan saw deep tooth 
marks in the aluminum. Cuddles bit down again. Then, seeing that he couldn’t 
chew the wheel up, he pulled it apart, holding the sculpture in his paws and 
twisting it furiously with his teeth. 

Then he tossed the mangled wheel away. It slammed into a window, 
shattering it into a thousand pieces. 

“Back to the drawing board,” Andy muttered to Evan. 

Evan shook his head glumly. That plan was a bust, he told himself. Now 
what? 

He didn’t have time to think about it. 

He heard shrill cries and shrieks of terror. 

“Put him down! Cuddles—put him down!” Mr. Murphy was screaming. 

Evan turned and saw that the giant hamster had picked up a kid. 

Conan! 

Cuddles held Conan in both paws and was raising him toward his gaping 
mouth. 

“Drop! Drop!” Mr. Murphy was shouting. 

Conan thrashed his arms and legs. “Help me! Ohhh, hellllp me!” he 
shrieked. He started to cry. Gasping sobs. Tears rolled down his red cheeks. 

“Helllllp! Mommmmmy! Mommmmmy! Hellllp me!” 

Normally Evan would have enjoyed watching Conan cry like a baby. But 
this was too serious. Cuddles could chew Conan in half! Evan realized. 

He grabbed Andy. “Where’s the Monster Blood?” 

“Huh? In my locker. I hid it under a bunch of stuff in my locker. Why?” 

“I need it,” Evan said. “Come on. I have another idea.” 



“I hope it’s better than the last one,” Andy muttered. 

They hurried to the door, then glanced back. 

Cuddles was playing with Conan, tossing him from paw to paw, licking him 
with his huge, pink tongue. Conan was wailing his head off. 

Evan led the way to Andy’s locker. “I’m going to eat some Monster Blood,” 
he told her, thinking out loud. “I’ll eat a lot. I’ll grow bigger than Cuddles.” 

“I get it,” Andy said, running beside him. “You’ll turn yourself into a giant. 
You’ll make yourself as big as Cuddles.” 

“No,” Evan replied. “Bigger. Much bigger. I’ll make myself so big that 
Cuddles will look hamster size. Then I’ll stuff him in the supply closet and lock 
the door.” 

“It’s a stupid plan,” Andy said. 

“I know,” Evan agreed. 

“But it’s worth a try,” Andy added. 

Evan swallowed hard and didn’t reply. He was staring across the hall at 
Andy’s locker. 

“Oh, no!” Andy cried out when she saw what Evan was gaping at. 

The locker door bulged as if about to burst open. And green goo poured out 
from the sides and the bottom. 

“The Monster Blood—it outgrew my locker!” Andy cried. 

Evan ran up to it and grabbed the door handle. He started to tug. “Is it 
locked?” 

“No,” Andy replied, hanging back. 

Evan tugged. He tugged harder. With a loud groan, he tugged with both 
hands. “It won’t open!” he cried. 

“Let me try it,” Andy said. 

But before she could step forward, the locker door burst open with a loud 
whoooosh. 

Sticky, green gunk splashed over Evan. 

He didn’t have a chance to cry out. 

It poured over him like a tall, cresting ocean wave. 

An ocean wave of Monster Blood. 

It’s burying me! Evan realized. 

The huge, sticky glob splashed out of the locker, plopped over him, 
smothering him, choking him. 

It’s sucking me in! I can’t move! 



I can’t move! 



25 


Evan shut his eyes as the heavy, green gunk rolled over his head. He shot his 
arms out, trying to push it away. 

As it swept over him, he fell to his knees. Kicking and thrashing, it forced 
him down to the floor. 

I’m stuck inside, he thought. Stuck inside... 

He felt hands grab his ankles. 

The hands tugged hard. 

He began to slide. Over the floor. Over the thick layer of Monster Blood. 

“I’ve got you!” he heard Andy cry. “I’ve got you out!” 

He opened his eyes. He saw her pulling him, tugging him out of the thick 
green gunk by the ankles. 

It clung to his clothes and his skin. But he was out. 

“Thanks,” he murmured weakly. He climbed shakily to his feet. 

He could hear Conan screaming and crying back in the classroom. There 
was still time to save him, Evan realized. 

He pulled a hunk of Monster Blood off the quivering green mound—and 
jammed it into his mouth. 

“I’m going to be sick,” Andy groaned, holding her stomach. 

Evan swallowed and reached for another mouthful. “It doesn’t taste bad,” 
he told her. “A little lemony.” 

“Don’t eat too much!” she cried, half-covering her eyes as she watched him 
swallow another mouthful. 

“I have to grow big enough so that Cuddles is hamster size compared to 
me,” Evan said. He grabbed another hunk. 

He could already feel himself start to grow. His head was already over the 
tops of the lockers. 

Back in the classroom, Conan let out another terrified wail. 

“Let’s go!” Evan boomed. His voice thundered deeply in his new, larger 
body. He could feel himself growing taller. Taller. 

He had to lower his head to get through the classroom door. 

Kids and teachers moved out of his way, crying out their surprise and 



alarm. 

He crossed the room, passed Mr. Murphy, and stepped up to the giant 
hamster. “I’m as big as Cuddles!” Evan called down to Andy. 

He reached out and lifted Conan from Cuddles’ paws. Cuddles reached out 
to take Conan back. But Evan lowered him gently to the floor. 

“Hellllp me! Helllp me! ” Conan ran bawling from the room. 

Evan turned to face the hamster. They stared at each other eye to eye. 

Cuddles’ huge pink nose twitched. He sniffed Evan, inhaling so hard that 
Evan was nearly sucked forward. 

Evan took a step back. 

Keep growing! he urged himself. I’ve got to keep growing! 

Cuddles eyed him warily, still sniffing. His watery black eyes stared hard as 
if trying to figure out if Evan was friend or foe. 

“Don’t you remember me, Cuddles?” Evan said softly. “Remember, I’m the 
one who fed you after school every day?” 

Keep growing! he silently urged himself. 

Why aren’t I growing any taller? 

Down below, he could see Andy, Mr. Murphy, and the others huddled 
against the far wall, staring up at the two giants in hushed terror. 

Keep growing! Keep growing! 

There was no way he could pick Cuddles up now, Evan realized. They were 
exactly the same height. And Cuddles outweighed him by at least a ton! 

Keep growing! 

“What’s wrong, Andy?” Evan called down to her in a trembling voice. “I 
ate tons of the stuff. Why did I stop growing?” 

“I don’t know!” she called up to him. Her voice sounded as tiny as a 
mouse’s squeak. 

He saw that she had the blue can in her hand. She was turning it over, 
reading the label. “I don’t know, Evan!” she shouted. “I don’t know why you’re 
not growing!” 

Then, as Evan turned back to face Cuddles, the hamster reached out and 
grabbed his waist with both front paws. 

“Ow!” Evan cried as the hamster tried to lift him off the floor. 

Gazing up, he saw the gaping hamster mouth open, the sharp white teeth 
emerge. 

Evan squirmed desperately, pulling himself loose. Then he wrapped both 



arms around the hamster’s middle. 

They started to wrestle. Evan fought hard, but the hamster overpowered 
him. Cuddles rolled Evan onto his back on the floor. 

Evan spun quickly away, climbed to his feet, and pulled the hamster down. 

The two giants wrestled over the floor, surrounded by the shrill screams of 
teachers and kids. 

Grow bigger! Grow bigger — now! Evan pleaded. 

But it was too late, he saw. 

The hamster lowered its hot, furry body over him. Evan could feel the 
creature’s booming heartbeat as it pressed him to the floor. 

Then its teeth rose up over Evan’s head. 

The hamster’s mouth opened wide. 

The teeth swung down. 

A wave of hot, sour hamster breath blew down over Evan. 

He shut his eyes. 

“Sorry,” he murmured to Andy. 

He held his breath and waited for the teeth to clamp down. 



26 


Evan heard a pop, like the sound of a cork flying off a bottle. 

Still sprawled on his back on the floor, Evan opened his eyes. 

“Huh?” Cuddles had disappeared. Vanished. 

Evan stared up at the startled faces of kids and teachers against the wall. 
“Wh-where’s Cuddles?” he stammered. 

Andy stood frozen like a statue, her mouth open. 

Evan slowly realized that she was nearly as big as he was. In fact, everyone 
was about his size. 

He pulled himself up to a sitting position. “Hey—I’m back to my normal 
size! ” he cried. He shook his head hard as if trying to shake away his close call 
with the giant hamster. 

“There’s Cuddles!” Andy cried, pointing. 

Evan turned to see Cuddles huddled against the wall. “He’s a little hamster 
again!” Evan exclaimed happily. He took three quick steps, bent down, and 
grabbed Cuddles between his hands. “Gotcha!” 

Holding the hamster in front of him, he turned back to Andy and the others. 
“What happened? Why did we shrink back?” 

Andy was studying the blue Monster Blood can. Suddenly she tossed back 
her dark hair, her brown eyes lit up, and she started to laugh. “It’s the expiration 
date!” she cried happily. “The expiration date on the can—it’s today! The 
Monster Blood stops working today! The magic has worn out!” 

Evan let out a whoop of joy. 

Mr. Murphy, a wide grin on his round face, hurried over and put his arm 
around Evan’s shoulders. “Fine job, Evan! Fine job!” he exclaimed. “You saved 
the school. I’m proud of you!” 

“Thanks, Mr. Murphy,” Evan replied awkwardly. 

“You’ll never make a basketball player now that you’re short again,” Mr. 
Murphy said, smiling. “But that was quite a good match with Cuddles. Have you 
ever thought of trying out for the wrestling team?” 

Andy came to Evan’s house for dinner that night. He greeted her at the door, 
eager to tell her how all the kids had apologized for not believing him about the 



Monster Blood. 

But before he could say anything, she held up a large brown envelope and 
grinned at him. 

“What’s that?” he asked, following her into the living room. 

“It’s a present my parents sent me from Europe,” she replied, her grin 
growing wider. “You won’t believe what it is.” 

She started to pull open the envelope. But the front doorbell rang. 

Evan hurried to see who it was. 

“Mr. Murphy!” he cried in surprise. 

“Hi, Evan,” the teacher said, his round body nearly filling the entire front 
stoop. “Hope I’m not interrupting your dinner.” 

“No,” Evan replied. “Want to come in?” 

“No thanks,” Mr. Murphy replied. His expression turned solemn. “I came 
by because I thought you should have some sort of reward, Evan. You were a 
real hero at school today.” 

“Aw, not really,” Evan said awkwardly. He could feel his face growing hot 
and knew he was blushing. 

What kind of reward? Evan wondered, staring back at the teacher. A cash 
reward? 

Mr. Murphy raised the hamster cage into Evan’s view. “I’ve decided to 
reward you with Cuddles,” the teacher said. “I know how fond of him you are.” 

“No, please!” Evan started to plead. 

“It’s a small token,” Mr. Murphy said. “To show how grateful I am. How 
grateful we all are.” 

“Please—no—!” 

But before Evan realized it, the hamster cage was in his hand, and Mr. 
Murphy was waddling back down the driveway to his car. 

“He gave you Cuddles?” Andy asked as Evan returned to the living room 
carrying the cage. He set it down on the coffee table. 

“It’s my reward,” Evan told her, rolling his eyes. “Do you believe it?” 

“Well, you won’t believe this!” Andy declared. “Look what my parents 
found in Europe!” 

She reached into the envelope and pulled out a blue plastic can. “It’s 
Monster Blood!” 

“Oh, no!” Evan wailed. 

“They wrote that they remembered how much fun I had with the old can,” 



Andy said, holding up the blue container. “So when they saw this can in a toy 
store in Germany, they decided to send me a new one.” 

Evan’s eyes went wide with fear. “You—you’re not going to open it?” he 
demanded warily. 

“Already did,” Andy replied. “Just to take a look. But I’m not going to use 
it. Really. I promise.” 

Evan started to say something—but he was interrupted by his mother’s call 
from the kitchen. “Dinnertime, you two! Wash your hands and come to the 
table!” 

Andy set the can of Monster Blood down on the desk in the corner. They 
obediently hurried to wash their hands. 

They had a lively dinner. There was lots to talk about. They laughed and 
joked about all that had happened at school. It was easy to laugh about it now 
that it was all over. 

After dinner, Evan and Andy returned to the living room. 

Andy was the first to see that the door to the hamster cage was wide open. 
The cage was empty. 

Evan was the one who spotted Cuddles on the desk. 

“Cuddles—what are you eating?” he cried. “What are you eating?” 




DEEP TROUBLE 
Goosebumps -19 
R.L. Stine 


1 


There I was, two hundred feet under the sea. 

I was on the hunt of my life. The hunt for the Great White Stingray. 

That’s what they called him at Coast Guard Headquarters. But, me, I called 
him Joe. 

The giant stingray had already stung ten swimmers. People were afraid to 
step into the water. Panic spread all up and down the coast. 

That’s why they sent for me. 

William Deep, Jr., of Baltimore, Maryland. 

Yes, William Deep, Jr., world-famous twelve-year-old undersea explorer. 
Solver of scary ocean problems. 

I captured the Great White Shark that terrorized Myrtle Beach. I proved he 
wasn’t so great! 

I fought the giant octopus that ate the entire California Championship 
Surfing Team. 

I unplugged the electric eel that sent shock waves all over Miami. 

But now I faced the fight of my life. Joe, the Great White Stingray. 

Somewhere down deep under the sea, he lurked. 

I had everything I needed: scuba suit, flippers, mask, oxygen tank, and 
poison-dart gun. 

Wait—did something move? Just behind that giant clam? 

I raised my dart gun and waited for an attack. 

Then, suddenly, my mask clouded. I couldn’t breathe. 

I strained for breath. No air came. 

My oxygen tank! Someone must have tampered with it! 

There was no time to lose. Two hundred feet down—and no air! I had to 
surface—fast! 

I kicked my legs, desperately trying to pull myself to the surface. 

Holding my breath. My lungs about to burst. I was losing strength, getting 
dizzy. 

Would I make it? Or would I die right here, deep under the ocean, Joe the 
Stingray’s dinner? 



Panic swept over me like an ocean tide. I searched through the fogged mask 
for my diving partner. Where was she when I needed her? 

Finally, I spotted her swimming up at the surface, near the boat. 

Help me! Save me! No air! I tried to tell her, waving my arms like a 
maniac. 

Finally she noticed me. She swam toward me and dragged my dazed and 
limp body to the surface. 

I ripped off my mask and sucked in mouthfuls of air. 

“What’s your problem, Aqua Man?” she cried. “Did a jellyfish sting you?” 

My diving partner is very brave. She laughs in the face of danger. 

I struggled to catch my breath. “No air. Someone—cut off—tank—” 

Then everything went black. 



2 


My diving partner shoved my head back under the water. I opened my eyes and 
came up sputtering. 

“Get real, Billy,” she said. “Can’t you snorkel without acting like a total 
jerk?” 

I sighed. She was no fun. 

My “diving partner” was really just my bratty sister, Sheena. I was only 
pretending to be William Deep, Jr., undersea explorer. 

But would it kill Sheena to go along with it just once? 

My name actually is William Deep, Jr., but everybody calls me Billy. I’m 
twelve—I think I mentioned that already. 

Sheena is ten. She looks like me. We both have straight black hair, but mine 
is short and hers goes down to her shoulders. We’re both skinny, with knobby 
knees and elbows, and long, narrow feet. We both have dark blue eyes and thick, 
dark eyebrows. 

Other than that, we’re not alike at all. 

Sheena has no imagination. She was never afraid of monsters in her closet 
when she was little. She didn’t believe in Santa Claus or the tooth fairy, either. 
She loves to say, “There’s no such thing.” 

I dove underwater and pinched Sheena’s leg. Attack of the Giant Lobster 
Man! 

“Stop it!” she screamed. She kicked me in the shoulder. I came up for air. 

“Hey, you two,” my uncle said. “Be careful down there.” 

My uncle stood on the deck of his sea lab boat, the Cassandra. He peered 
down at Sheena and me snorkeling nearby. 

My uncle’s name is George Deep, but everybody calls him Dr. D. Even my 
dad, who is his brother, calls him Dr. D. Maybe that’s because he looks just the 
way a scientist should. 

Dr. D. is short, thin, wears glasses and a very serious, thoughtful 
expression. He has curly brown hair and a bald spot at the back of his head. 
Anyone who saw him would say, “I bet you’re a scientist.” 

Sheena and I were visiting Dr. D. on the Cassandra. Every year our parents 
let us spend our summer vacation with Dr. D. It sure beats hanging out at home. 



This summer, we were anchored just off a tiny island called Ilandra, in the 
Caribbean Sea. 

Dr. D. is a marine biologist. He specializes in tropical marine life. He 
studies the habits of tropical fish and looks for new kinds of ocean plants and 
fish that haven’t been discovered yet. 

The Cassandra is a big and sturdy boat. It is about fifty feet long. Dr. D. 
uses most of the space for labs and research rooms. Up on deck is a cockpit, 
where he steers the boat. He keeps a dinghy tied to the starboard, or right side of 
the deck, and a huge glass tank on the port, or left side. 

Sometimes Dr. D. catches very big fish and keeps them temporarily in the 
glass tank—usually just long enough to tag the fish for research, or care for them 
if they are sick or injured. 

The rest of the deck is open space, good for playing catch or sunbathing. 

Dr. D.’s research takes him all over the world. He isn’t married and doesn’t 
have any kids. He says he’s too busy staring at fish. 

But he likes kids. That’s why he invites me and Sheena to visit him every 
summer. 

“Stick close together, kids,” Dr. D. said. “And don’t swim off too far. 
Especially you, Billy.” 

He narrowed his eyes at me. That’s his “I mean it” look. He never narrows 
his eyes at Sheena. 

“There’ve been reports of some shark sightings in the area,” he said. 

“Sharks! Wow!” I cried. 

Dr. D. frowned at me. “Billy,” he said. “This is serious. Don’t leave the 
boat. And don’t go near the reef.” 

I knew he was going to say that. 

Clamshell Reef is a long, red coral reef just a few hundred yards away from 
where we were anchored. I’d been dying to explore it ever since we got there. 

“Don’t worry about me, Dr. D.,” I called up to him. “I won’t get into 
trouble.” 

Sheena muttered under her breath, “Yeah, right.” 

I reached out to give her another lobster pinch, but she dove under water. 

“Good,” said Dr. D. “Now don’t forget—if you see a shark fin, try not to 
splash around a lot. Movement will attract it. Just slowly, steadily return to the 
boat.” 

“We won’t forget,” said Sheena, who had come up behind me, splashing 



like crazy. 

I couldn’t help feeling just a little bit excited. I’d always wanted to see a 
real, live shark. 

I’d seen sharks at the aquarium, of course. But they were trapped in a glass 
tank, where they just swam around restlessly, perfectly harmless. 

Not very exciting. 

I wanted to spot a shark’s fin on the horizon, floating over the water, closer, 
closer, heading right for us.... 

In other words, I wanted adventure. 

The Cassandra was anchored out in the ocean, a few hundred yards away 
from Clamshell Reef. The reef surrounded the island. Between the reef and the 
island stretched a beautiful lagoon. 

Nothing was going to stop me from exploring that lagoon—no matter what 
Dr. D. said. 

“Come on, Billy,” Sheena called, adjusting her mask. “Let’s check out that 
school of fish.” 

She pointed to a patch of tiny ripples in the water near the bow of the boat. 
She slid the mouthpiece into her mouth and lowered her head into the water. I 
followed her to the ripples. 

Soon Sheena and I were surrounded by hundreds of tiny, neon-blue fish. 

Underwater, I always felt as if I were in a faraway world. Breathing through 
the snorkel, I could live down here with the fish and the dolphins, I thought. 
After a while, maybe I would grow flippers and a fin. 

The tiny blue fish began to swim away, and I swam with them. They were 
so great-looking! I didn’t want them to leave me behind. 

Suddenly, the fish all darted from view. I tried to follow, but they were too 

fast. 

They had vanished! 

Had something scared them away? 

I glanced around. Clumps of seaweed floated near the surface. Then I saw a 
flash of red. 

I floated closer, peering through the mask. A few yards ahead of me I saw 
bumpy red formations. Red coral. 

Oh, no, I thought. Clamshell Reef. Dr. D. told me not to swim this far. 

I began to turn around. I knew I should swim back to the boat. 

But I was tempted to stay and explore a little. After all, I was already there. 



The reef looked like a red sand castle, filled with underwater caves and 
tunnels. Small fish darted in and out of them. The fish were bright yellow and 
blue. 

Maybe I could swim over and explore one of those tunnels, I thought. How 
dangerous could it be? 

Suddenly, I felt something brush against my leg. It tickled and sent a tingle 
up my leg. 

A fish? 

I glanced around, but I didn’t see anything. 

Then I felt it again. 

A tingling against my leg. 

And then it clutched me. 

Again I turned to see what it was. Again I saw nothing. 

My heart began to race. I knew it was probably nothing dangerous. But I 
wished I could see it. 

I turned and started back for the boat, kicking hard. 

But something grabbed my right leg—and held on! 

I froze in fear. Then I frantically kicked my leg as hard as I could. 

Let go! Let go of me! 

I couldn’t see it—and I couldn’t pull free! 

The water churned and tossed as I kicked with all my strength. 

Overcome with terror, I lifted my head out of the water and choked out a 
weak cry: “Help!” 

But it was no use. 

Whatever it was, it kept pulling me down. Down. 

Down to the bottom of the sea. 



3 


“Help!” I cried out again. “Sheena! Dr. D.!” 

I was dragged below the surface again. I felt the slimy tentacle tighten 
around my ankle. 

As I sank underwater, I turned—and saw it. 

It loomed huge and dark. 

A sea monster! 

Through the churning waters, it glared at me with one giant brown eye. The 
terrifying creature floated underwater like an enormous, dark green balloon. Its 
mouth opened in a silent cry, revealing two rows of jagged, sharp teeth. 

An enormous octopus! But it had at least twelve tentacles! 

Twelve long, slimy tentacles. One was wrapped around my ankle. Another 
one slid toward me. 

NO! 

My arms thrashed the water. 

I gulped in mouthfuls of air. 

I struggled to the surface—but the huge creature dragged me down again. 

I couldn’t believe it. As I sank, scenes from my life actually flashed before 
my eyes. 

I saw my parents, waving to me as I boarded the yellow school bus for my 
first day of school. 

Mom and Dad! I’ll never see them again! 

What a way to go, I thought. Killed by a sea monster! 

No one will believe it. 

Everything started to turn red. I felt dizzy, weak. 

But something was pulling me, pulling me up. 

Up to the surface. Away from the tentacled monster. 

I opened my eyes, choking and sputtering. 

I stared up at Dr. D! 

“Billy! Are you all right?” Dr. D. studied me with concern. 

I coughed and nodded. I kicked my right leg. The slimy tentacle was gone. 

The dark creature had vanished. 



“I heard you screaming and saw you thrashing about,” said Dr. D. “I swam 
over from the boat as fast as I could. What happened?” 

Dr. D. had a yellow life jacket over his shoulders. He slipped a rubber 
lifesaver ring over my head. I floated easily now, the life ring under my arms. 

I had lost my flippers in the struggle. My mask and snorkel dangled around 
my neck. 

Sheena swam over and floated beside me, treading water. 

“It grabbed my leg!” I cried breathlessly. “It tried to pull me under!” 

“What grabbed your leg, Billy?” asked Dr. D. “I don’t see anything around 
here—” 

“It was a sea monster,” I told him. “A huge one! I felt its slimy tentacle 
grabbing my leg.... Ouch!” 

Something pinched my toe. 

“It’s back!” I shrieked in horror. 

Sheena popped out of the water and shook her wet hair, laughing. 

“That was me, you dork!” she cried. 

“Billy, Billy,” Dr. D. murmured. “You and your wild imagination.” He 
shook his head. “You nearly scared me to death. Please—don’t ever do that 
again. Your leg probably got tangled in a piece of seaweed, that’s all.” 

“But—but—!” I sputtered. 

He dipped his hand in the water and pulled up a handful of slimy green 
strings. “There’s seaweed everywhere.” 

“But I saw it!” I shouted. “I saw its tentacles, its big, pointy teeth!” 

“There’s no such thing as sea monsters,” said Sheena. Miss Know-It-All. 

“Let’s discuss it on the boat,” my uncle said, dropping the clump of 
seaweed back in the water. 

“Come on. Swim back with me. And stay away from the reef. Swim around 
it.” 

He turned around and started swimming toward the Cassandra. I saw that 
the sea monster had pulled me into the lagoon. The reef lay between us and the 
boat. But there was a break in the reef we could swim through. 

I followed them, thinking angry thoughts. 

Why didn’t they believe me? 

I had seen the creature grab my leg. It wasn’t a stupid clump of seaweed. It 
wasn’t my imagination. 

I was determined to prove them wrong. I’d find that creature and show it to 



them myself—someday. But not today. 

Now I was ready to get back to the safety of the boat. 

I swam up to Sheena and called, “Race you to the boat.” 

“Last one there is a chocolate-covered jellyfish!” she cried. 

Sheena can’t refuse a race. She started speeding toward the boat, but I 
caught her by the arm. 

“Wait,” I said. “No fair. You’re wearing flippers. Take them off.” 

“Too bad!” she cried, and pulled away. “See you at the boat!” I watched her 
splash away, building a good lead. 

She’s not going to win, I decided. 

I stared at the reef up ahead. 

It would be faster just to swim over the reef. A shortcut. 

I turned and started to swim straight toward the red coral. 

“Billy! Get back here!” Dr. D. shouted. 

I pretended I didn’t hear him. 

The reef loomed ahead. I was almost there. 

I saw Sheena splashing ahead of me. I kicked extra-hard. I knew she’d 
never have the guts to swim over the reef. She’d swim around the end of it. I 
would cut through and beat her. 

But my arms suddenly began to ache. I wasn’t used to swimming so far. 

Maybe I can stop at the reef and rest my arms for a second, I thought. 

I reached the reef. I turned around. Sheena was swimming to the left, 
around the reef. I figured I had a few seconds to rest. 

I stepped onto the red coral reef— 

—and screamed in horror! 



4 


My foot burned as if it were on fire. The throbbing pain shot up my leg. 

I screamed and dove into the water. 

When I surfaced, I heard Sheena yelling, “Dr. D.! Come quick!” 

My foot burned, even in the cold ocean water. 

Dr. D. came up beside me. “Billy, what’s the problem now?” he demanded. 
“I saw him do something really stupid,” Sheena said, smirking. 

If my foot hadn’t been burning up, I definitely would have punched out her 
lights. 

“My foot!” I moaned. “I stepped on the reef—and—and—” 

Dr. D. held on to the lifesaver ring around my waist. “Ow. That’s painful,” 
he said, reaching up to pat my shoulder. “But you’ll be all right. The burning will 
stop in a little while.” 

He pointed to the reef. “All that bright red coral is fire coral.” 

“Huh? Fire coral?” I stared back at it. 

“Even I knew that!” Sheena said. 

“It’s covered with a mild poison,” my uncle continued. “When it touches 
your skin, it burns like fire.” 

Now he tells me, I thought. 

“Don’t you know anything ?” Sheena asked sarcastically. 

She was asking for it. She really was. 

“You’re lucky you only burned your foot,” Dr. D. said. “Coral can be very 
sharp. You could have cut your foot and gotten poison into your bloodstream. 
Then you’d really be in trouble.” 

“Wow! What kind of trouble?” Sheena asked. She seemed awfully eager to 
hear about all the terrible things that could have happened to me. 

Dr. D.’s expression turned serious. “The poison could paralyze you,” he 

said. 

“Oh great,” I said. 

“So keep away from the red coral from now on,” Dr. D. warned. “And stay 
away from the lagoon, too.” 

“But that’s where the sea monster lives!” I protested. “We have to go back 



there. I have to show it to you!” 

Sheena bobbed in the blue-green water. “No such thing, no such thing,” she 
chanted. Her favorite phrase. “No such thing—right, Dr. D.?” 

“Well, you never know,” Dr. D. replied thoughtfully. “We don’t know all of 
the creatures that live in the oceans, Sheena. It’s better to say that scientists have 
never seen one.” 

“So there, She-Ra,” I said. 

Sheena spit a stream of water at me. She hates it when I call her She-Ra. 
“Listen, kids—I’m serious about staying away from this area,” said Dr. D. 
“There may not be a sea monster in that lagoon, but there could be sharks, 
poisonous fish, electric eels. Any number of dangerous creatures. Don’t swim 
over there.” 

He paused and frowned at me, as if to make sure I’d been paying attention. 
“How’s your foot feeling, Billy?” he asked. 

“It’s a little better now,” I told him. 

“Good. Enough adventure for one morning. Let’s get back to the boat. It’s 
almost lunchtime.” 

We all started swimming back to the Cassandra. 

As I kicked, I felt something tickle my leg again. 

Seaweed? 

No. 

It brushed against my thigh like— fingers. 

“Cut it out, Sheena,” I shouted angrily. I spun around to splash water in her 

face. 

But she wasn’t there. She wasn’t anywhere near me. 

She was up ahead, swimming beside Dr. D. 

Sheena couldn’t possibly have tickled me. 

But something definitely did. 

I stared down at the water, suddenly gripped with terror. 

What was down there? 

Why was it teasing me like that? 

Was it preparing to grab me again and pull me down forever? 



5 


Alexander DuBrow, Dr. D.’s assistant, helped us aboard the boat. 

“Hey, I heard shouting,” Alexander said. “Is everything okay?” 

“Everything is fine, Alexander,” said Dr. D. “Billy stepped on some fire 
coral, but he’s all right.” 

As I climbed up the ladder, Alexander grabbed my hands and pulled me 
aboard. 

“Wow, Billy,” he said. “Fire coral. I accidentally bumped into the fire coral 
my first day here. I saw stars. I really did, man. You sure you’re okay?” 

I nodded and showed him my foot. “It feels better now. But that wasn’t the 
worst thing that happened. I was almost eaten by a sea monster!” 

“No such thing, no such thing,” Sheena chanted. 

“I really saw it,” I insisted. “They don’t believe me. But it was there. In the 
lagoon. It was big and green and—” 

Alexander smiled. “If you say so, Billy,” he said. He winked at Sheena. 

I wanted to punch out his lights, too. 

Big deal science student. What did he know? 

Alexander was in his early twenties. But, unlike Dr. D., he didn’t look like a 
scientist. 

He looked more like a football player. He was very tall, about six feet four 
inches, and muscular. He had thick, wavy blond hair and blue eyes that crinkled 
in the corners. He had broad shoulders, and big, powerful-looking hands. He 
spent a lot of time in the sun and had a smooth, dark tan. 

“I hope you’re all hungry,” Alexander said. “I made chicken salad 
sandwiches for lunch.” 

“Oh. Great,” Sheena said, rolling her eyes. 

Alexander did most of the cooking. He thought he was good at it. But he 
wasn’t. 

I went below deck to my cabin to change out of my wet bathing suit. My 
cabin was really just a tiny sleeping cubby with a cupboard for my things. 
Sheena had one just like it. Dr. D. and Alexander had bigger cabins that they 
could actually walk around in. 

We ate in the galley, which was what Dr. D. called the boat’s kitchen. It had 



a built-in table and built-in seats, and a small area for cooking. 

When I entered the galley, Sheena was already sitting at the table. There 
was a big sandwich on a plate in front of her, and one waiting for me. 

Neither of us was too eager to try Alexander’s chicken salad. The night 
before, we had had Brussels sprouts casserole. For breakfast this morning, he 
served us whole wheat pancakes that sank to the bottom of my stomach like the 
Titanic going down! 

“You first,” I whispered to my sister. 

“Uh-uh,” Sheena said, shaking her head. “You try it. You’re older.” 

My stomach growled. I sighed. There was nothing to do but taste it. 

I sank my teeth into the sandwich and started chewing. 

Not bad, I thought at first. A little chicken, a little mayonnaise. It actually 
tasted like a regular chicken salad sandwich. 

Then, suddenly, my tongue started to burn. My whole mouth was on fire! 

I let out a cry and grabbed for the glass of iced tea in front of me. I downed 
the entire glass. 

“Fire coral!” I screamed. “You put fire coral in the chicken salad!” 

Alexander laughed. “Just a little chili pepper. For taste. You like it?” 

“I think I’d rather have cereal for lunch,” Sheena said, setting down her 
sandwich. “If you don’t mind.” 

“You can’t have cereal for every meal,” Alexander replied, frowning. “No 
wonder you’re so skinny, Sheena. You never eat anything but cereal. Where’s 
your spirit of adventure?” 

“I think I’ll have cereal, too,” I said sheepishly. “Just for a change of pace.” 

Dr. D. came into the galley. “What’s for lunch?” he asked. 

“Chicken salad sandwiches,” said Alexander. “I made them spicy.” 

“Very spicy,” I warned him. 

Dr. D. glanced at me and raised an eyebrow. “Oh, really?” he said. “You 
know, I’m not very hungry. I think I’ll just have cereal for lunch.” 

“Maybe Billy and I could make dinner tonight,” Sheena offered. She poured 
cereal into a bowl and added milk. “It’s not fair for Alexander to cook all the 
time.” 

“That’s a nice idea, Sheena,” said Dr. D. “What do you two know how to 
make?” 

“I know how to make brownies from a mix,” I offered. 

“And I know how to make fudge,” said Sheena. 



“Hmm,” said Dr. D. “Maybe I’ll cook tonight. How does grilled fish 
sound?” 

“Great!” I said. 

After lunch, Dr. D. went into his office to go over some notes. Alexander led 
Sheena and me into the main lab to show us around. 

The work lab was really cool. It had three big glass tanks along the wall 
filled with weird, amazing fish. 

The smallest tank held two bright yellow sea horses and an underwater 
trumpet. The underwater trumpet was a long, red-and-white fish shaped like a 
tube. There were also a lot of guppies swimming around in this tank. 

Another tank held some flame angelfish, which were orange-red like fire, 
and a harlequin tusk-fish, with orange-and-aqua tiger stripes for camouflage. 

The biggest tank held a long, black-and-yellow snakelike thing with a 
mouth full of teeth. 

“Ugh!” Sheena made a disgusted face as she stared at the long fish. “That 
one is really gross!” 

“That’s a black ribbon eel,” said Alexander. “He bites, but he’s not deadly. 
We call him Biff.” 

I snarled through the glass at Biff, but he ignored me. 

I wondered what it would be like to come face to face with Biff in the 
ocean. His teeth looked nasty, but he wasn’t nearly as big as the sea monster. I 
figured William Deep, Jr., world-famous undersea explorer, could handle it. 

I turned away from the fish tanks and stood by the control panel, staring at 
all the knobs and dials. 

“What does this do?” I asked. I pushed a button. A loud horn blared. We all 
jumped, startled. 

“It honks the horn,” Alexander said, laughing. 

“Dr. D. told Billy not to touch things without asking first,” said Sheena. 
“He’s told him a million times. He never listens.” 

“Shut up, She-Ra!” I said sharply. 

“You shut up.” 

“Hey—no problem,” said Alexander, raising both hands, motioning for us 
to chill out. “No harm done.” 

I turned back to the panel. Most of the dials were lit up, with little red 
indicators moving across their faces. I noticed one dial that was dark, its red 



indicator still. 

“What’s this for?” I asked, pointing to the dark dial. “It looks like you 
forgot to turn it on.” 

“Oh, that controls the Nansen bottle,” Alexander said. “It’s broken.” 

“What’s a Nansen bottle?” asked Sheena. 

“It collects samples of seawater from way down deep,” said Alexander. 

“Why don’t you fix it?” I asked. 

“We can’t afford to,” said Alexander. 

“Why not?” asked Sheena. “Doesn’t the university give you money?” 

We both knew that Dr. D.’s research was paid for by a university in Ohio. 

“They gave us money for our research,” Alexander explained. “But it’s 
almost gone. We’re waiting to see if they’ll give us more. In the meantime, we 
don’t have the money to fix things.” 

“What if the Cassandra breaks down or something?” I asked. 

“Then I guess we’ll have to put her in dry dock for a while,” said 
Alexander. “Or else find a new way to get more money.” 

“Wow,” said Sheena. “That would mean no more summer visits.” 

I hated to think of the Cassandra just sitting on a dock. Even worse was the 
thought of Dr. D. being stuck on land with no fish to study. 

Our uncle was miserable whenever he had to go ashore. He didn’t feel 
comfortable unless he was on a boat. I know, because one Christmas he came to 
our house to visit. 

Usually Dr. D. is fun to be with. But that Christmas visit was a nightmare. 

Dr. D. spent the whole time pacing through the house. He barked orders at 
us like a sea captain. 

“Billy, sit up straight!” he yelled at me. “Sheena, swab the decks!” 

He just wasn’t himself. 

Finally, on Christmas Eve, my dad couldn’t take it anymore. He told Dr. D. 
to shape up or ship out. 

Dr. D. ended up spending a good part of Christmas Day in the bathtub 
playing with my old toy boats. As long as he stayed in the water, he was back to 
normal. 

I never wanted to see Dr. D. stranded on land again. 

“Don’t worry, kids,” Alexander said. “Dr. D. has always found a way to get 
by.” 


I hoped Alexander was right. 



I studied another strange dial, marked Sonar Probes. 

“Hey, Alexander,” I said. “Will you show me how the sonar probes work?” 

“Sure,” said Alexander. “Just let me finish a few chores.” 

He walked over to the first fish tank. He scooped out a few guppies with a 
small net. 

“Who wants to feed Biff today?” 

“Not me,” said Sheena. “Yuck!” 

“No way!” I said as I stepped to a porthole and peered out. 

I thought I heard a motor outside. So far we had seen very few other boats. 
Not many people passed by Ilandra. 

A white boat chugged up to the side of the Cassandra. It was smaller but 
newer than our boat. A logo on the side said Marina Zoo. 

A man and a woman stood on the deck of the zoo boat. They were both 
neatly dressed in khaki pants and button-down shirts. The man had a short, neat 
haircut, and the woman’s brown hair was pulled back in a ponytail. She carried a 
black briefcase. 

The man waved to someone on the deck of the Cassandra. I figured he had 
to be waving at Dr. D. 

Now Sheena and Alexander stood beside me at the porthole, watching. 

“Who’s that?” Sheena asked. 

Alexander cleared his throat. “I’d better go see what this is about,” he said. 

He handed Sheena the net with the guppies in it. “Here,” he said. “Feed 
Biff. I’ll be back later.” 

He left the lab in a hurry. 

Sheena looked at the squirming guppies in the net and made a face. 

“I’m not going to stay here and watch Biff eat these poor guppies.” She 
stuck the net in my hand and ran out of the cabin. 

I didn’t want to watch Biff eat the poor fish, either. But I didn’t know what 
else to do with them. 

I quickly dumped the guppies into Biff’s tank. The eel’s head shot forward. 
His teeth clamped down on a fish. The guppy disappeared. Biff grabbed for 
another one. 

He was a fast eater. 

I dropped the net on a table and walked out of the lab. 

I made my way down the narrow passageway, planning to go up on deck 
for some air. 



I wondered if Dr. D. would let me do some more snorkeling this afternoon. 

If he said yes, maybe I would swim toward the lagoon, see if I could find 
any sign of the sea monster. 

Was I scared? 

Yes. 

But I was also determined to prove to my sister and uncle that I wasn’t 
crazy. That I wasn’t making it up. 

I was passing Dr. D.’s office when I heard voices. I figured Dr. D. and 
Alexander must be in there with the two people from the zoo. 

I paused for just a second. I didn’t mean to eavesdrop, I swear. But the man 
from the zoo had a loud voice, and I couldn’t help but hear him. 

And what he said was the most amazing thing I had ever heard in my 
whole, entire life. 

“I don’t care how you do it, Dr. Deep,” the man bellowed. “But I want you 
to find that mermaid!” 



6 


A mermaid! 

Was he serious? 

I couldn’t believe it. Did he really want my uncle to find a real, live 
mermaid? 

I knew Sheena would start chanting, “No such thing, no such thing.” But 
here was a grown man, a man who worked for a zoo, talking about a mermaid. It 
had to be real! 

My heart started to pound with excitement. I might be one of the first 
people on Earth ever to see a mermaid! I thought. 

And then I had an even better thought: What if I was the one to find her? 

I’d be famous! I’d be on TV and everything! 

William Deep, Jr., the famous sea explorer! 

Well, after I heard that, I couldn’t just walk away. I had to hear more. 

Holding my breath, I pressed my ear to the door and listened. 

“Mr. Showalter, Ms. Wickman, please understand,” I heard Dr. D. saying. 
“I’m a scientist, not a circus trainer. My work is serious. I can’t waste my time 
looking for fairy tale creatures.” 

“We’re quite serious, Dr. Deep,” said Ms. Wickman. “There is a mermaid in 
these waters. And if anyone can find her, you can.” 

I heard Alexander ask, “What makes you think there’s really a mermaid out 
there?” 

“A fisherman from a nearby island spotted her,” replied the man from the 
zoo. “He said he got pretty close to her—and he’s sure she’s real. He saw her 
near the reef —this reef, just off Ilandra.” 

The reef! Maybe she lives in the lagoon! 

I leaned closer to the door. I didn’t want to miss a word of this. 

“Some of these fishermen are very superstitious, Mr. Showalter,” my uncle 
scoffed. “For years there have been stories... but no real reason to believe them.” 

“We didn’t believe the man ourselves,” said the woman. “Not at first. But 
we asked some other fishermen in the area, and they claim to have seen the 
mermaid, too. And I think they’re telling the truth. Their descriptions of her 
match, down to the smallest detail.” 



I could hear my uncle’s desk chair creak. I imagined him leaning forward as 
he asked, “And, how, exactly, did they describe her?” 

“They said she looked like a young girl,” Mr. Showalter told him. “Except 
for the”—he cleared his throat—“the fish tail. She’s small, delicate, with long, 
blond hair.” 

“They described her tail as shiny and bright green,” said the woman. “I 
know it sounds incredible, Dr. Deep. But when we spoke to the fishermen, we 
were convinced that they really saw a mermaid!” 

There was a pause. 

Was I missing something? I pressed my ear to the door. I heard my uncle 
ask, “And, why, exactly, do you want to capture this mermaid?” 

“Obviously, a real, live mermaid would be a spectacular attraction at a zoo 
like ours,” said the woman. “People from all over the world would flock to see 
her. The Marina Zoo would make millions of dollars.” 

“We are prepared to pay you very well for your trouble, Dr. Deep,” said Mr. 
Showalter. “I understand you are running out of money. What if the university 
refuses to give you more? It would be terrible if you had to stop your important 
work just because of that.” 

“The Marina Zoo can promise you one million dollars,” said the woman. “If 
you find the mermaid. I’m sure your lab could run for a long time on that much 
money.” 

A million dollars! I thought. How could Dr. D. turn down that kind of 
money? 

My heart pounded with excitement. I pushed against the door, straining to 

hear. 


What would my uncle’s answer be? 



7 


Leaning hard against the door, I heard Dr. D. let out a long, low whistle. “That’s 
quite a lot of money, Ms. Wickman,” I heard him say. 

There was a long pause. Then he continued. “But even if mermaids existed, 
I wouldn’t feel right about capturing one for a zoo to put on display.” 

“I promise you we would take excellent care of her,” replied Mr. Showalter. 
“Our dolphins and whales are very well cared for. The mermaid, of course, 
would get extra-special treatment.” 

“And, remember, Dr. Deep,” said Ms. Wickman. “If you don’t find her, 
someone else will. And there’s no guarantee that they will treat the mermaid as 
well as we will.” 

“I suppose you’re right,” I heard my uncle reply. “It would certainly be a 
big boost to my research if I found her.” 

“Then you’ll do it?” asked Mr. Showalter eagerly. 

Say yes, Dr. D.! I thought. Say yes! 

I pressed my whole body against the door. “Yes,” my uncle answered. “If 
there really is a mermaid, I’ll find her.” 

Excellent! I thought. 

“Very good,” said Ms. Wickman. 

“Excellent decision,” Mr. Showalter added enthusiastically. “I knew we had 
come to the right man for the job.” 

“We’ll be back in a couple of days to see how the search is going. I hope 
you’ll have some good news by then,” Ms. Wickman said. 

“That’s not much time,” I heard Alexander remark. 

“We know,” Ms. Wickman replied. “But, obviously, the sooner you find 
her, the better.” 

“And, please,” Mr. Showalter said, “please keep this a secret. No one must 
know about the mermaid. I’m sure you can imagine what would happen if—” 

CRASSSSSSSH! 

I lost my balance. I fell against the door. 

To my shock, it swung open—and I tumbled into the room. 



8 


I landed in a heap in the center of the cabin floor. 

Dr. D., Mr. Showalter, Ms. Wickman, and Alexander all gaped at me with 
their mouths open. I guess they hadn’t expected me to drop in. 

“Uh... hi, everyone,” I murmured. I felt my face burning, and knew that I 
was blushing. “Nice day for a mermaid hunt.” 

Mr. Showalter jumped to his feet angrily. He glared at my uncle. “This was 
supposed to be a secret!” 

Alexander strode across the room and helped me to my feet. “Don’t worry 
about Billy,” he said. He put a protective arm around me. “You can trust him.” 

“I’m very embarrassed,” Dr. D. told his visitors. “This is my nephew, Billy 
Deep. He and his sister are visiting me for a few weeks.” 

“Can they keep our secret?” asked Ms. Wickman. 

Dr. D. turned his gaze on Alexander. Alexander nodded. 

“Yes, I’m sure they can,” said Dr. D. “Billy won’t say anything to anyone. 
Right, Billy?” 

He narrowed his eyes at me. I really do hate it when he does that. But this 
time I couldn’t blame him. 

I shook my head. “No. I won’t tell anyone. I swear.” 

“Just to be on the safe side, Billy,” said Dr. D., “don’t mention the mermaid 
to Sheena. She’s too young to have to keep a big secret like this.” 

“I promise,” I replied solemnly. I raised my right hand as if swearing an 
oath. “I won’t breathe a word to Sheena.” 

This was so cool! 

I knew the biggest secret in the world—and Sheena wouldn’t have a clue! 

The man and woman from the zoo exchanged glances. I could see they 
were still worried. 

Alexander said, “You really can trust Billy. He’s very serious for someone 
his age.” 

You bet I’m serious, I thought. 

I’m William Deep, Jr., world-famous mermaid catcher. 

Mr. Showalter and Ms. Wickman seemed to relax a little. 



“Good,” said Ms. Wickman. She shook hands with Dr. D., Alexander, and 
me. 

Mr. Showalter gathered up some papers and put them into the briefcase. 
“We’ll see you in a few days, then,” said Ms. Wickman. “Good luck.” 

I won’t need luck, I thought, watching them roar away on their boat a few 
minutes later. 

I won’t need luck because I have skill. And daring. 

My head spun with all kinds of exciting thoughts. 

Would I let Sheena be on TV with me after I single-handedly captured the 
mermaid? 

Probably not. 

That night I sneaked off the boat and slipped into the dark water. I swam 
noiselessly toward the lagoon. 

I glanced back at the Cassandra. It floated quietly. All the portholes were 

dark. 

Good, I thought. No one is awake to notice that I’m gone. No one knows 
I’m out here. No one knows I’m swimming in the sea at night, all alone. 

Swimming steadily, easily, under the silvery moonlight, I made my way 
around the reef and into the dark lagoon. 

I slowed my stroke just past the reef. 

My eyes darted eagerly around the lagoon. The waves lapped gently under 
me. The water sparkled as if a million tiny diamonds floated on the surface. 
Where was the mermaid? 

I knew she was there. I knew I would find her here. 

From deep below me, I heard a low rumble. 

I listened hard. The sound, faint at first, grew louder. 

The waves tossed as the sound became a steady roar. 

It rumbled like an earthquake. An earthquake on the ocean floor. 

The waves tumbled and tossed. I struggled to stay on top of them. 

What was happening? 

Suddenly, from the middle of the lagoon, a huge wave swelled. It rose 
higher, like a gigantic geyser. 

Higher. Over my head. As tall as a building! 

A tidal wave? 

No. 



The wave broke. 

The dark creature pushed up underneath it. 

Water slid off its grotesque body. Its single eye stared out darkly at me. Its 
tentacles writhed and stretched. 

I screamed. 

The monster blinked its muddy brown eye at me. 

I tried to turn and swim away. 

But it was too fast. 

The tentacles whipped out—and grabbed me, tightening, tightening around 
my waist. 

Then a slimy, cold tentacle wrapped around my neck and started to squeeze. 



9 


“I—I can’t breathe!” I managed to choke out. 

I tugged at the tentacle twining around my throat. 

“Help me—somebody!” 

I opened my eyes—and stared up at the ceiling. 

I was lying in bed. 

In my cabin. 

The sheet was wrapped tightly around me. 

I took a deep breath and waited for my heart to stop thudding. A dream. 

Only a dream. 

I rubbed my eyes, lifted myself, and peered out the porthole. The sun was 
just rising over the horizon. The sky was morning red. The water a hazy purple. 

Squinting past the reef, I saw the lagoon. Perfectly still. Not a sea monster 
in sight. 

I wiped the sweat from my forehead with my pajama sleeve. 

No need to be afraid, I told myself. It was just a dream. A bad dream. 

I shook my head, trying to forget about the sea monster. 

I couldn’t let it scare me. I couldn’t let it stop me from finding that 
mermaid. 

Was anyone up? Had I yelled out loud in my sleep? 

I listened carefully. I could hear only the creaking of the boat, the splash of 
waves against its side. 

The pink morning sunlight cheered me. The dark water looked inviting. 

I slipped into my bathing suit and crept out of my cabin as quietly as I 
could. I didn’t want anyone to hear me. 

In the galley I saw a half-empty pot of coffee sitting on the warmer. That 
meant Dr. D. was already up. 

I tiptoed down the passageway and listened. I could hear him puttering 
around in the main lab. 

I grabbed my snorkel, flippers, and mask and went up on deck. Nobody up 
there. 

The coast was clear. 



Silently, I climbed down the ladder, slipped into the water, and snorkeled 
toward the lagoon. 

I know it was crazy to sneak away like that. But you can’t imagine how 
excited I was. Even in my wildest daydreams as William Deep, Jr., undersea 
explorer, I never thought I would see a real, live mermaid! 

As I snorkeled toward the lagoon, I tried to imagine what she would look 

like. 

Mr. Showalter had said she looked like a young girl with long, blond hair 
and a green fish tail. 

Weird, I thought. 

Half-human, half-fish. 

I tried to imagine my own legs replaced by a fish tail. 

I’d be the greatest swimmer on Earth if I had a fish tail, I thought. I could 
win the Olympics without even practicing. 

I wonder if she’s pretty? I thought. And I wonder if she can talk! I hope she 
can. She can tell me all kinds of secrets of the oceans. 

I wonder how she breathes underwater? 

I wonder if she thinks like a human or like a fish? 

So many questions. 

This is going to be the greatest adventure of my life, I thought. After I’m 
famous, I’ll write a book about my undersea adventures. I’ll call it Courage of 
the Deep, by William Deep, Jr. Maybe someone will even turn it into a movie. 

I raised my head and saw that I was nearing the reef. I concentrated on 
keeping away from it. I didn’t want to touch that fire coral again. 

I couldn’t wait to explore the lagoon. I was so excited, I forgot all about the 
terrifying dream I had had the night before. 

I kicked my legs carefully, watching out for red coral. 

I was nearly past the reef when I felt something brush my leg. 

“Oh!” I cried out and swallowed a mouthful of salty water. 

Sputtering and choking, I felt something wrap around my ankle. 

As it grabbed at me, it scratched my ankle. 

This time I knew for sure it wasn’t seaweed. 

Seaweed doesn’t have claws! 



10 


Ignoring the panic that nearly froze me, I kicked and thrashed with all my 
strength. 

“Stop it! Stop kicking me!” a voice screamed. 

The mermaid? 

“Hey—!” I cried out angrily as Sheena’s head appeared beside me. 

She pulled up her snorkeling mask. “I didn’t scratch you that hard!” she 
snapped. “You don’t have to go crazy!” 

“What are you doing here?” I cried. 

“What are you doing here?” she demanded nastily. “You know Dr. D. told 
us not to swim here.” 

“Then you shouldn’t be here —should you?” I shouted. 

“I knew you were up to something, so I followed you,” Sheena replied, 
adjusting her mask. 

“I’m not up to anything,” I lied. “I’m just snorkeling.” 

“Sure, Billy. You’re just snorkeling at six-thirty in the morning exactly 
where you’re not supposed to —and where you burned your foot on that fire 
coral yesterday. You’re either up to something, or you’re totally crazy!” She 
squinted at me, waiting for a response. 

What a choice! I was either up to something, or crazy. Which should I 
admit to? 

If I admitted I was up to something, I’d have to tell her about the mermaid 
—and I couldn’t do that. 

“Okay,” I said with a casual shrug. “I guess I’m crazy.” 

“Well, big news,” she muttered sarcastically. “Come on back to the boat, 
Billy,” said Sheena. “Dr. D. will be looking for us.” 

“You go back. I’ll be there in a little while.” 

“Billy,” said Sheena. “Dr. D. is going to be very mad. He’s probably ready 
to hop in the dinghy and search for us right now.” 

I was about to give up and go with her. Then, out of the corner of my eye, I 
saw a big splash on the other side of the reef. 

The mermaid! I thought. That’s got to be her! If I don’t go look for her now, 
I might miss her! 



I turned away from Sheena and started swimming very fast, straight for the 

reef. 

I could hear Sheena screaming, “Billy! Come back! Billy!” 

I thought I heard an extra note of panic in her voice, but I ignored it. Just 
Sheena trying to scare me again, I thought. 

“Billy!” she screamed again. “Billy!” I kept on swimming. No way I was 
going to stop now. But as it turned out, I should have listened to her. 



11 


Swimming fast, I raised my head, searching for a good place to swim safely over 
the fire coral. 

I saw another splash. Across the lagoon. Near the shore. 

That’s got to be the mermaid! I thought excitedly. 

I stared hard, trying to catch a glimpse of her. 

I thought I saw some kind of fin. 

I made my way past the reef into the deep, still waters of the lagoon. I 
strained to see the mermaid, but my mask had fogged. 

Rats! I thought. What a time for my mask to start leaking! 

I came up for air and pulled off the mask. I hoped I wouldn’t lose sight of 
the mermaid because of this. 

I wiped the water from my eyes and, leaving the mask wrapped around my 
wrist, stared toward the lagoon. 

That’s when I saw it. A few hundred yards away. 

Not the green fish tail of a mermaid. 

The fin I saw was a gray-white triangle sticking straight up in the water. 

The fin of a hammerhead shark. 

As I stared in horror, the fin turned in the water, and then ripped toward me, 
moving steady and straight as a torpedo. 



12 


Where was Sheena? 

Was she still behind me? 

I glanced back. I could see her in the distance, splashing back to the boat. 

I was forced to forget about Sheena as the gray fin swiftly moved closer. 

I thrashed my arms in the water, trying to swim away. 

When the shark swam right past me, I stopped thrashing. 

Would it go away? Would it leave me alone? 

My heart in my throat, I started swimming in the other direction, toward the 
reef. Away from the shark. 

I kept my eyes on that fin. 

It began to turn. The shark’s fin streamed toward me in a wide arc. 

“Ohhh.” I let out a terrified groan as I realized it was circling me. 

Now I didn’t know which way to go. The shark swam between me and the 
boat. If I could turn around and climb on to the reef, maybe I would be safe. 

The huge fin slid closer. 

I plunged toward the reef. I knew I had to keep distance between me and 
the shark. 

Suddenly, the fin shot up in front of me—between me and the reef. 

The shark kept circling, closing in, swimming faster and faster, making the 
circle smaller as he swam. 

I was trapped. But I couldn’t stay still. I couldn’t just float there, waiting for 
the shark to eat me. 

I had to fight. I kicked my legs in a panic as I swam toward the reef. 

I was nearer to the reef now. But the shark’s circles grew smaller, smaller. 

I breathed in quick, shallow gasps. I couldn’t think clearly. I was too 
terrified. The same two words echoed in my brain: The shark. The shark. 

Over and over again. The shark. The shark. 

The shark swam around me in a tight circle. His tail swished, sending up 
waves of water over me. 

The shark. The shark. 

I stared at the monster in wide-eyed horror. He swam so close, I could see 



him clearly. He was big—at least ten feet long. His head was wide and hideous, 
long like the head of a hammer, with an eye on each end. 

I heard my voice quivering, “No... no...” 

Something cold brushed my leg. 

The shark. The shark. 

My stomach lurched. I threw my head back and let out a howl of sheer 
terror. 

“Aaaaaiiii!” 

Pain jolted down my spine. 

The shark had bumped me with its snout. My body rose out of the water, 
then hit the surface with a smack. 

I froze. 

The shark was hungry. 

It wanted to fight. 

It circled me again, then zoomed straight for me. 

Its jaws opened. I saw rows and rows of sharp teeth. 

I screamed out a hoarse, “NO!” I thrashed, panicked. I kicked with all my 
strength. 

The razor teeth brushed by, just missing my leg. 

The reef. I had to get to the reef. It was my only chance. 

I dove for the coral. The shark plunged toward me. I dodged it once more. 

I grabbed the red coral. Pain shot through my hand. The fire coral. 

I didn’t care. 

The top of the reef sat just above the surface of the water. I tried to pull 
myself up. My whole body stung. 

I had almost made it. Soon I’d be safe. 

With a mighty kick, I hoisted myself onto the reef—and was yanked back 
into the water. 

My stomach slammed against the side of the reef. I felt a sharp stab of pain 
in my leg. 

I tried to pull my leg away. I couldn’t. 

It was caught in the jaws of the shark. 

My mind screamed with terror. 

The shark. The shark. 

It’s got me! 



13 


My entire body burned with pain. I slipped heavily into the water. 

The shark knew he had me. I had no strength left to fight. 

Then something splashed nearby. 

The shark released my leg and jerked toward the splash. 

I had no time to catch my breath. The shark circled back. It charged at me. 

The gaping jaws moved in for the kill. 

I shut my eyes and let out a shrill scream of terror. 

A second passed. Then another. 

Nothing happened. 

I heard a loud thump. 

I opened my eyes. 

Something had come between me and the shark, a few feet in front of me. 

I stared. The water churned white. A long, shiny green fish tail rose out of 
the water and splashed back down. 

Another fish was fighting the shark! 

The shark rolled over, then attacked. The green fish tail smacked the shark 
hard. The shark went under. 

I couldn’t see what was happening. The water rocked higher, tossing up 
frothy, white waves. 

All around me the water bubbled and churned, white with foam. Over the 
crash of the water, I heard shrill animal squeals. 

Sharks don’t squeal, do they? I thought. What is making that sound? 

The shark surfaced, its toothy jaws gaping. It snapped them at something, 
once, twice. Snapping at air. 

The long, green fish tail rose out of the water and smacked the shark hard. 
A direct hit on its broad hammerhead. 

The shark shut its jaws and sank below the surface. 

Then I heard a loud bump! The water stopped churning. 

A second later, the huge gray fin surfaced a few yards away, speeding off in 
the other direction. 

The shark was swimming away! 



I stared at the green fish tail as it arced over the dark, swelling water. 

As the waters calmed, I heard a low, musical sound. It was beautiful and 
slightly sad. Whistling and humming at the same time. 

It sounded something like a whale. But this creature was much smaller than 
a whale. 

The green tail swung around. Then the creature lifted its head. 

A head with long, blond hair. 

The mermaid! 



14 


Bobbing in the water, I forgot my burning pain as I gaped at her. 

To my amazement, the mermaid looked just as the zoo people had said she 
would. 

Her head and shoulders were smaller than mine, but her flashing green tail 
stretched out, long and powerful. Her wide, sea-green eyes sparkled. Her skin 
gave off a pale pink glow. 

I stared at her, unable to speak. 

She’s real! I thought. And she’s so beautiful! 

At last I found my voice. “You—you saved me,” I stammered. “You saved 
my life. Thank you!” 

She shyly lowered her eyes and cooed at me through shell-pink lips. What 
was she trying to say? 

“What can I do in return?” I asked her. “I’ll do anything I can.” 

She smiled, and uttered that haunting low hum. 

She was trying to talk to me. I wished I could understand her. 

She reached for my hand and examined it, frowning over the red burns from 
the fire coral. Her hand felt cool. She passed it over the palm of my hand, and 
the pain from the burns began to fade away. 

“Wow!” I exclaimed. I must have sounded pretty stupid, but I didn’t know 
what else to say. Her touch was like magic. When she held my hand, I could 
float without treading water. Just as she did. 

Was this another dream? 

I closed my eyes and opened them again. 

I was still floating in the sea, staring at a blond-haired mermaid. 

No. Not a dream. 

She smiled again and shook her head, making those low singing sounds. 

I could hardly believe that only a few minutes before I’d been frantically 
fighting off a hungry shark. 

I raised my head and searched the waters. The shark had vanished. The 
water had calmed, shimmering like gold now under the morning sunlight. And 
there I was, floating in the sea off a deserted island with a real mermaid. 

Sheena will never believe this, I thought. Not in a million years. 



Suddenly, the mermaid flipped her tail and disappeared under the water. 

Startled, I searched around for her. She had left without a trace—not a 
ripple, not a bubble. 

Where did she go? I wondered. Is she gone, just like that? Will I never see 
her again? 

I rubbed my eyes and looked for her again. No sign of her. A few fish 
darted past me. 

She had disappeared so instantly, I began to think I had dreamed her up 
after all. 

Just then, I felt a tiny pinch on my foot. 

“Ouch!” I yelled, quickly pulling away. I began to panic. The shark was 
back! 

Then, behind me, I heard a small splash and a whistlelike giggle. I turned 
around. 

The mermaid smiled mischievously at me. She snapped her fingers in a 
pinching motion. 

“It was you!” I cried, laughing with relief. “You’re worse than my little 
sister!” 

She whistled again and slapped her tail against the surface of the water. 

Suddenly, a dark shadow fell across her face. I raised my eyes to see what it 

was. 

Too late. 

A heavy net dropped over us. Startled, I thrashed my arms and legs. But 
that only tangled them more in the rope. 

The net tightened over both of us. We were thrown together. 

We struggled helplessly as the net jerked us up. 

The mermaid’s eyes widened and she squealed in terror. 

“EEEEEE!” she cried. 

We were being pulled up out of the water. 

“EEEEEEE!” The mermaid’s frightened wail rose like a siren, drowning 
out my feeble cries for help. 



15 


“Billy—I don’t believe it!” 

I gazed up through the holes in the net and recognized Dr. D. and Sheena. 
They struggled to pull us aboard the dinghy. 

Sheena stared down at me and the mermaid in amazement. Dr. D.’s eyes 
were wide, and his mouth hung open. 

“You’ve found her, Billy!” he said. “You’ve actually found the mermaid!” 

“Just get me out of this net!” I cried. Somehow, I didn’t feel so great about 
capturing the mermaid anymore. 

“The zoo people were right,” Dr. D. muttered to himself. “It’s unbelievable. 
It’s astounding. It’s historic....” 

We landed in a heap on the floor of the dinghy. The mermaid squirmed 
beside me in the net, making sharp, angry clicking noises. 

Dr. D. watched her closely. He touched her tail. 

The mermaid flapped it hard against the bottom of the boat. 

“Is there any way this could be a hoax?” he wondered aloud. 

“Billy—is this one of your dumb tricks?” Sheena demanded suspiciously. 

“It’s not a trick,” I said. “Now will you get me out of this net? The ropes are 
digging into my skin.” 

They ignored me. 

Sheena gently reached one finger through the net and touched the scales on 
the mermaid’s tail. “I can’t believe it,” she murmured. “She’s really real!” 

“Of course she’s real!” I cried. “We’re both real, and we’re both very 
uncomfortable!” 

“Well, it’s hard to believe anything you say,” Sheena snapped. “After all, 
you’ve been talking about sea monsters ever since we got here.” 

“I did see a sea monster!” I cried. 

“Quiet, kids,” said Dr. D. “Let’s get our discovery back to the sea lab.” 

He started the dinghy’s motor and we roared back to the big boat. 

Alexander stood on deck, waiting for us. “It’s really true!” he cried 
excitedly. “It’s really a mermaid!” 

Sheena tied the dinghy to the side of the Cassandra while Dr. D. and 



Alexander hoisted me and the mermaid aboard. 

Dr. D. opened the net and helped me out. The mermaid flopped her tail and 
got herself even more tangled in the net. 

Alexander shook my hand. “I’m proud of you, Billy. How did you do it? 
This is amazing.” He gave me a vigorous pat on the back. “Do you realize this is 
the greatest ocean find of the century? Maybe of all time?” 

“Thanks,” I said. “But I didn’t do anything. I didn’t find her —she found 

me. ” 

The mermaid flopped violently on deck. Her squeals became higher- 
pitched, more frantic. 

Alexander’s face fell. “We’ve got to do something for her,” he said 
urgently. 

“Dr. D., you’ve got to let her go,” I said. “She needs to be in the water.” 

“I’ll fill the big tank with seawater, Dr. D.,” said Alexander. He hurried off 
to fill the tank. 

“We can’t let her go just yet, Billy,” said Dr. D. “Not without examining her 
first.” His eyes were shining with excitement. But he saw how upset I was. “We 
won’t hurt her, Billy. She’ll be all right.” 

His eyes dropped to my leg, and he frowned. He kneeled down to look at it. 

“You’re bleeding, Billy,” he said. “Are you okay?” 

“I’m fine,” I said. “But the mermaid isn’t.” 

He ignored me. 

“How did this happen?” asked Dr. D. 

“A shark grabbed my leg,” I told him. “Just as he was about to clamp down, 
the mermaid came. She saved my life. You should have seen her fighting that 
shark.” 

Dr. D. turned to the mermaid as if seeing her for the first time. 

“Wow,” said Sheena. “She fought off a shark? All by herself?” 

The mermaid’s long green tail pounded angrily on the deck of the boat. 

“EEEEE! EEEEEE!” she cried shrilly. She almost sounded as if she were 
screaming. 

“Forget about my leg,” I shouted. “You’ve got to let the mermaid go!” 

Dr. D. stood up, shaking his head. “Billy, I’m a scientist. This mermaid is 
an extremely important discovery. If I let her go, I’d be letting down the entire 
scientific community. I’d be letting down the entire world!” 

“You just want the million dollars,” I muttered. 



I knew it was cruel, but I couldn’t stop myself. I hated seeing the mermaid 
so unhappy. 

Dr. D. looked hurt. 

“That’s not fair, Billy,” he said. “I think you know me better than that.” 

I avoided his gaze. Lowering my head, I pretended to examine the cut on 
my leg. It wasn’t very deep. Alexander had given me some gauze. I pressed it 
against the cut. 

“I only want the money to continue my research,” Dr. D. went on. “I would 
never use this mermaid to get rich.” 

That was true. I knew Dr. D. didn’t care about the money for himself. All he 
wanted was to keep on studying fish. 

“Just think about it, Billy. You’ve found a mermaid! A creature we all 
thought didn’t exist! We can’t just let her go. We’ve got to find out a little bit 
about her,” he said excitedly. 

I said nothing. 

“We won’t hurt her, Billy. I promise.” 

Alexander returned. “The tank is ready, Dr. D.” 

“Thanks.” Dr. D. followed him to the other side of the boat. 

I glanced at Sheena to see whose side she was on. Did she want to keep the 
mermaid? Or let her go? 

But Sheena just stood there, watching. Her face was tense. I could tell she 
wasn’t sure which of us was right. 

But when I looked at the mermaid, I knew I was right. 

She had finally stopped squirming and flipping her tail. Now she lay still on 
the deck, the net draped over her. She was breathing hard and staring out at the 
ocean with watery, sad eyes. 

I wished I’d never tried to find her in the first place. Now all I wanted was 
to find some way to help her get back to her home. 

Dr. D. and Alexander came back. They lifted the mermaid inside the net. 
Alexander lifted her tail, and Dr. D. held her head. 

“Don’t squirm, little mermaid,” Dr. D. said in a soothing voice. “Keep 
still.” 

The mermaid seemed to understand. She didn’t flop around. But her eyes 
rolled wildly, and she uttered low moans. 

Dr. D. and Alexander carried her to the giant glass tank. It stood on the deck 
now, full of fresh seawater. They gently dropped her into the tank, pulling the net 



away as she slid into the water. Then they put a screen top over the tank and 
clamped it shut. 

The mermaid churned the water with her tail. Then, gradually, her tail 
stopped moving. She grew still. 

Her body slumped lifelessly to the bottom of the tank. 

She didn’t move or breathe. 

“Noooo!” An angry cry escaped my lips. “She’s dead! She’s dead! We 
killed her!” 



16 


Sheena had moved to the other side of the tank. “Billy, look—!” she called to 
me. 

I hurried around to her. 

“The mermaid isn’t dead,” Sheena reported, pointing. “Look. She—she’s 
crying or something.” 

My sister was right. The mermaid had slumped to the bottom of the tank 
and had buried her face in her hands. “Now what do we do?” I asked. 

No one answered. 

“We have to find a method of feeding her,” my uncle said, rubbing his chin, 
his eyes on the tank. 

“Do you think she eats like a person or a fish?” I asked. 

“If only she could tell us,” said Alexander. “She can’t talk, can she, Billy?” 

“I don’t think so,” I said. “She just makes sounds. Whistles and clicks and 
hums.” 

“I’ll go down to the lab and get some equipment ready,” said Alexander. 
“Maybe we can find out something about her with the sonar monitor.” 

“Good idea,” said Dr. D. thoughtfully. 

Alexander hurried below. 

“I think I’d better go to Santa Anita for some supplies,” said Dr. D. Santa 
Anita was the nearest inhabited island. “I’ll buy lots of different kinds of foods. 
We can try them out on her until we find something she likes. Would you two 
like anything while I’m there?” 

“How about some peanut butter?” Sheena asked quickly. “There’s no way 
Alexander can ruin a peanut butter sandwich!” 

Dr. D. nodded as he climbed into the dinghy. “Peanut butter it is. Anything 
else? Billy?” 

I shook my head. 

“All right,” Dr. D. said. “I’ll be back in a few hours.” 

He started the motor, and the dinghy sped off toward Santa Anita. 

“It’s so hot,” Sheena complained. “I’m going down to my cabin for a 
while.” 

“Okay,” I said, my eyes on the mermaid. 



It was hot up on deck. There was no breeze, and the white-hot noon sun 
beat down on my face. 

But I couldn’t go below deck. I couldn’t leave the mermaid. 

She floated behind the glass, her long tail drooping. When she saw me, she 
pressed her hands and face to the glass and cooed sadly. 

I waved to her through the glass. 

She cooed and hummed in her low voice, trying to communicate with me. I 
listened, trying to understand. 

“Are you hungry?” I asked her. 

She stared at me blankly. 

“Are you hungry?” I repeated, rubbing my stomach. “Go like this”—I 
nodded my head up and down—“for yes. Do this for no.” I shook my head back 
and forth. 

I stopped and waited to see what she’d do. 

She nodded her head yes. 

“Yes?” I said. “You are hungry?” 

She shook her head no. 

“No? You’re not hungry?” 

She nodded her head yes. Then she shook her head no again. 

She’s just copying me, I thought. She doesn’t really understand. 

I took a step back and studied her in the tank. 

She’s young, I thought. She’s a lot like me. That means she must be hungry. 
And she probably likes to eat what I like. Right? 

Maybe. It was worth a try. 

I hurried down to the galley. I pulled open a cupboard and took out a 
package of chocolate chip cookies. 

Okay, so it’s not exactly seafood, I thought. But who wouldn’t like 
chocolate chip cookies? 

I grabbed a few cookies and stuffed the package back in the cupboard. 
Alexander came through on his way up to the deck. He was carrying some 
equipment in his arms. 

“Getting a snack?” he asked me. 

“For the mermaid,” I told him. “Do you think she’ll like them?” 

He shrugged his broad shoulders and said, “Who knows?” 

He followed me out on deck, carrying the equipment. 

“What’s all that stuff?” I asked him. 



“I thought we could run a few tests on the mermaid, to see what we can find 
out about her,” said Alexander. “But go ahead and feed her first.” 

“Okay,” I said. “Here goes.” 

I held a cookie up to the glass. The mermaid stared at it. I could see that she 
didn’t know what it was. 

“Mmmmm,” I said, patting my stomach. “Yummy.” 

The mermaid patted her tummy, imitating me. She stared out at me blankly 
with those sea-green eyes. 

Alexander reached up and unlatched the screen top. I handed him the 
cookie, and he dropped it into the tank. 

The mermaid watched it falling toward her through the water. She made no 
attempt to grab it. 

By the time it reached her, it was soggy. It fell apart in the tank. 

“Yuck,” I said. “Even I wouldn’t eat it now.” 

The mermaid pushed the soggy cookie pieces away. 

“Maybe Dr. D. will have something she likes when he gets back,” said 
Alexander. 

“I hope so,” I said. 

Alexander began to set up his equipment. He put a thermometer inside the 
tank, and some long white plastic tubes. 

“Oh, man,” Alexander mumbled, shaking his head. “I forgot my notebook.” 

He hurried back down to the lab. 

I watched the mermaid float sadly in her tank, with all the tubes coming out 
of it. She reminded me of the fish down in the lab. 

No, I thought. She’s not a fish. She shouldn’t be treated this way. 

I remembered how she had fought the shark. 

She could have been killed, I thought. Easily. But she fought the shark, 
anyway, just to help me. 

The mermaid cooed. Then I saw her wipe away the tears that had begun to 
mn down her face. 

She’s crying again, I thought, feeling guilty and miserable. She’s pleading 
with me. I put my face against the glass, as close to hers as I could get it. 

I’ve got to help her, I thought. 

I put a finger to my lips. “Ssshhh,” I whispered. “Stay quiet. I have to work 
quickly!” 

I knew I was about to do something that would make Dr. D. very angry. 



My uncle would probably never forgive me. 
But I didn’t care. 

I was going to do what I thought was right. 

I was going to set the mermaid free. 



17 


My hand trembled as I reached up to unlatch the screen at the top of the tank. 
The tank was taller than I was. I wasn’t quite sure how I’d get the mermaid out 
of there. But I had to find a way. 

As I struggled to pull the screen off, the mermaid began to squeal, “Eeee! 
EEEEEE!” 

“Sshh! Don’t make any noise!” I warned her. 

Then I felt a hand grab me by the arm. I gasped, startled. 

A deep voice asked, “What are you doing?” 

I turned around to see Alexander standing behind me. 

I stepped away from the tank, and he let go of my arm. 

“Billy, what were you doing?” he asked again. 

“I was going to let her go!” I cried. “Alexander, you can’t keep her in there! 
Look how unhappy she is!” 

We both stared at the mermaid, who had slumped to the bottom of the tank 
again. I think she knew that I had tried to help her—and that I had been stopped. 

I caught the sadness on Alexander’s face. I could tell he felt sorry for her. 
But he had a job to do. 

He turned to me and put an arm around my shoulders. “Billy, you’ve got to 
understand how important this mermaid is to your uncle,” he said. “He’s worked 
his whole life for a discovery like this. It would break his heart if you let her go.” 

He slowly led me away from the tank. I turned back to look at the mermaid 
again. 

“But what about her heart?” I asked. “I think it’s breaking her heart to be 
stuck in that fish tank.” 

Alexander sighed. “It’s not ideal, I know that. But it’s only temporary. Soon 
she’ll have plenty of room to swim and play in.” 

Sure, I thought bitterly. As an exhibit at the zoo, with millions of people 
gawking at her every day. 

Alexander removed his arm from my shoulders and rubbed his chin. 

“Your uncle is a very caring man, Billy,” he said. “He’ll do his best to make 
sure the mermaid has everything she needs. But it’s his duty to study her. The 
things he can learn from her could help people understand the oceans better— 



and take better care of them. That’s important, right?” 

“I guess so,” I said. 

I knew Alexander had a good point. I loved Dr. D., and I didn’t want to 
spoil his big discovery. 

But, still, the mermaid shouldn’t have to suffer for science, I thought. 

“Come on, Billy,” Alexander said, leading me below deck. “I promised you 
I’d show you how the sonar probes work, didn’t I? Let’s go down to the lab, and 
I’ll give you a demonstration.” 

As we started to climb below, I took one last glance back at the mermaid. 
She was still slumped forlornly at the bottom of the tank. Her head was lowered, 
her blond hair floating limply above it like seaweed. 

The sonar probes weren’t as interesting as I thought they’d be. All they did was 
beep whenever the Cassandra was in danger of running ashore. 

I guess Alexander could tell my mind was not on the sonar probes. “Want 
some lunch?” he asked me. 

Uh-oh. Lunch. I was hungry. But not for spicy chicken salad. 

I hesitated. “Well, I had a big breakfast....” 

“I’ll whip up something special,” Alexander offered. “We can have a picnic 
up on deck with the mermaid. Come on.” 

What could I do? I followed him to the kitchen. 

He opened the small refrigerator and pulled out a bowl. 

“This has been marinating all morning,” he said. 

I looked into the bowl. It was full of thin strips of something white and 
mbbery-looking. They floated in an oily, dark gray liquid. 

Whatever it was, I knew I couldn’t eat it. 

“It’s marinated squid,” said Alexander. “I added some squid ink for extra 
flavor. That’s what makes it gray.” 

“Yum,” I said, rolling my eyes. “I haven’t had squid ink in days!” 

“Don’t be so sarcastic. You might be surprised,” Alexander replied. He 
handed me the bowl. “Take this up on deck. I’ll bring some bread and iced tea.” 

I carried the bowl of squid up and set it down near the mermaid’s tank. 

“How are you doing, Mermaid?” I asked her. 

She flipped her tail a little. Then she opened and closed her mouth, as if she 
were chewing. 

“Hey,” I said. “You are hungry, aren’t you?” 



She kept making that chewing motion. I glanced down at the bowl of squid. 
Who knows? I thought. This might be just what she’d like. 

I stood on a rail and unlatched the top of the tank. Then I dropped in a piece 
of the rubbery squid. 

The mermaid leaped toward it and caught it in her mouth. 

She chewed, then smiled. 

She liked it! 

I gave her some more. She ate it. 

I rubbed my stomach. “Do you like it?” I asked her. I nodded yes. 

She smiled again. Then she nodded yes. 

She understood me! 

“What are you doing, Billy?” Alexander asked. He had come up on deck 
carrying two plates and a loaf of bread. 

“Alexander, look!” I cried. “We communicated!” 

I dropped another piece of squid into the tank. She ate it. Then she nodded 

yes. 

“That means she likes it!” I said. 

“Wow,” murmured Alexander. He put down the plates and picked up his 
notebook. He scribbled some notes. 

“Isn’t that way cool?” I demanded. “I’m a scientist, too—aren’t I, 
Alexander?” 

He nodded, but kept writing. 

“I mean, I’m the first person on Earth to communicate with a mermaid— 
right?” I insisted. 

“If she stays with us long enough, you might be able to talk to her in sign 
language,” he said. “Just think of the things we could learn!” 

He spoke aloud as he wrote, “Likes to eat squid.” Then he put down his 
pencil and said, “Hey, wait! That’s our lunch!” 

Uh-oh, I thought. I hope his feelings aren’t hurt. 

He looked at me. He looked at the bowl. He looked at the mermaid. 

Then he started laughing. 

“At least somebody around here likes my cooking!” he exclaimed. 

About an hour later, Dr. D. returned with the groceries and supplies. Luckily he 
had bought plenty of seafood in Santa Anita. We fed some of it to the mermaid 
for supper. While she ate, Dr. D. checked the readings on the meters Alexander 



had set up in the tank. 

“Interesting,” Dr. D. commented. “She sends out sonar signals through the 
water. Just as whales do.” 

“What does that mean?” asked Sheena. 

“It means there are probably other mermaids like her,” said Dr. D. “She 
must be trying to contact them with underwater sounds.” 

Poor mermaid, I thought. She’s calling to her friends. She wants to be 
rescued. 

I went to my cabin after supper and stared out of the little porthole. 

An orange sun sank slowly into the purple horizon. A wide carpet of gold 
light shimmered in the rolling ocean waters. A cool breeze blew in through the 
porthole. 

I watched the sun drop into the ocean. The sky immediately darkened, as if 
someone had turned off a lamp. 

The mermaid is up there all alone, I thought. She must be so frightened. A 
prisoner. Trapped in a fish tank in the dark. 

The door to my cabin suddenly burst open. Sheena bounded in, panting, her 
eyes wide. 

“Sheena!” I scolded angrily. “How many times do I have to tell you to 
knock first?” 

She ignored me. “But, Billy!” she gasped. “She’s escaped! The mermaid 
escaped!” 



18 


I leaped off my bed, my heart pounding. 

“She’s not there!” Sheena cried. “She’s not in her tank!” 

I darted out of the cabin, up the hatch, and out on deck. 

Part of me hoped she really had escaped to freedom. But part of me wished 
she could stay forever—and make my uncle the most famous scientist in the 
world and me the most famous nephew of a scientist! 

Please let her be okay, I thought. 

Up on deck, my eyes adjusted to the evening darkness. Tiny lights glowed 
all around the edge of the boat. 

I squinted across the deck at the giant fish tank. 

I ran so fast, I nearly toppled overboard. Sheena was right behind me. 

“Hey—!” I cried out when I saw the mermaid floating listlessly in the 
water, her green tail shimmering faintly in the fading light. 

It took me a few seconds to realize that Sheena was laughing. “Gotcha!” 
she shouted gleefully. “Gotcha again, Billy!” 

I groaned long and loud. Another one of Sheena’s stupid tricks. 

“Good one, Sheena,” I said bitterly. “Very clever.” 

“You’re just mad because I fooled you again. You’re so easy to trick.” 

The mermaid raised her eyes to me, and a faint smile formed on her pale 
lips. “Looorrrooo, looorrrooo,” she cooed at me. 

“She really is pretty,” Sheena said. 

The mermaid is hoping I’ll let her go now, I thought. Maybe I should.... 

Sheena could help me, I decided. It would be easier with two of us. 

But would my sister cooperate? “Sheena—”1 began. 

I heard footsteps behind us. “Hey, kids.” It was Dr. D. “It’s almost 
bedtime,” he called. “Ready to go below?” 

“We never go to bed this early at home,” Sheena whined. 

“Maybe not. But I bet you don’t get up so early at home, either. Do you?” 

Sheena shook her head. We all stood at the tank and watched the mermaid 
in silence. She gave her tail a little flick and settled back down at the bottom of 
the tank. 



“Don’t worry about her,” Dr. D. said. “I’ll check on her during the night to 
make sure she’s all right.” 

The mermaid pressed her tiny hands against the glass wall of the tank. Her 
eyes pleaded with us, pleaded with us to set her free. 

“She’ll feel better once she gets to Marina Zoo,” Dr. D. said. “They’re 
building a special lagoon just for her, with a reef and everything. It’ll be exactly 
like the lagoon off Ilandra. She’ll be free to swim and play. She’ll feel at home.” 

I hope so, I thought. But I didn’t feel so sure. 

The Cassandra rocked gently on the waves that night, but I couldn’t fall asleep. 

I lay on my bunk, staring at the ceiling. A pale beam of moonlight fell 
through the porthole and across my face. I couldn’t stop thinking about the 
mermaid. 

I tried to imagine what it would feel like to be trapped in a glass tank for a 
whole day. It probably wouldn’t be that different from being trapped in this tiny 
cabin, I thought, glancing around. My cabin was about as big as a closet. 

It would be terrible, I thought, fiddling with the collar of my pajama top. I 
pushed open the porthole to let in more air. 

The fish tank might not even be the worst of it, I figured. I know Dr. D. 
cares about the mermaid. I know he’d never hurt her. 

But what will happen to her when the zoo people take her away? Who will 
look out for her? 

Sure, they’re building a fancy fake lagoon. But it won’t be the same as the 
real lagoon. And there will be people around, staring at her all the time. They’ll 
probably expect her to perform tricks or something; maybe jump through hoops 
like a trained seal. 

They’ll probably put her in TV commercials, too. And TV shows and 
movies. 

She’ll be a prisoner. A lonely prisoner for the rest of her life. 

This is all my fault. How could I let this happen? 

I have to do something, I decided. I can’t let them take her. 

Just then I thought I heard something—a low hum. I lay very still and 
listened. At first I thought it was the mermaid. But I quickly realized it was a 
motor. 

I heard it chugging softly, from a distance. But slowly the sound moved 
closer. 



A boat. 

I sat up and peered out of the porthole. A large boat pulled quietly up beside 
the Cassandra. 

Who was it? The zoo people? 

In the middle of the night? 

No. It wasn’t the same boat. This boat was much bigger. 

As I peered out the small porthole, I saw two dark figures quietly slip on 
board the Cassandra. Then two more. 

My heart began to race. Who are these people? I wondered. What are they 
doing? 

What should I do? 

Should I sneak up and spy on them? What if they see me? 

Then I heard more strange noises. 

A thud. A muffled cry of pain. 

It came from the deck. 

The deck. Where the mermaid was trapped helplessly in her tank. 

Oh, no! I thought, feeling a chill of panic. They’re hurting the mermaid! 



19 


I charged up to the deck. Sheena ran right behind me. 

Stumbling over a tow rope, I grabbed the rail to steady myself. Then I 
darted blindly to the fish tank. 

The mermaid huddled at the bottom of the tank, her arms wrapped 
protectively around herself. 

I saw four men standing tensely near the tank. All four were dressed in 
black. They had black masks pulled over their faces. 

One of the men held a small club in his hand. 

And a body lay sprawled on the deck, face down. 

Dr. D.! 

Sheena screamed and ran to our uncle. She knelt beside him. “They hit him 
on the head!” she cried. “They knocked him out!” 

I gasped. “Who are you?” I demanded. “What are you doing on our boat?” 

The four men ignored me. 

Two of them unfolded a heavy rope net and spread it over the fish tank. 
Then they let it fall into the tank, draping it over the mermaid. 

“Stop it!” I yelled. “What are you doing?” 

“Be quiet, kid,” the man with the club muttered. He raised the club 
menacingly. 

I watched helplessly as they tightened the net around the mermaid. 

They were kidnapping her! 

“Eeeee! EEEEEeeee!” she squealed in terror and started to thrash her arms, 
struggling to free herself from the heavy net. 

“Stop it! Leave her alone!” I cried. 

One of the men gave a low laugh. The other three still ignored me. 

Sheena was bent over Dr. D., frantically trying to wake him up. I ran to the 
hatch and shouted down into the cabin, “Alexander! Alexander! Help!” 

Alexander was big and strong—maybe strong enough to stop these men. 

I ran back to the tank. The mermaid was trapped in the net. All four men 
worked to lift her out of the tank. She squirmed and fought with all her strength. 

“EEEEEE!” she screamed. The high-pitched squeal hurt my ears. 



“Can’t you get her to shut up?” one of the men cried angrily. 

“Just load her on board,” the one with the club replied sharply. 

“Stop!” I yelled. “You can’t do that!” 

Then I totally lost it. 

Without thinking, I dove toward the four of them. I don’t know what I 
planned to do. I just knew I had to stop them. 

One of them pushed me away easily with one hand. “Stay away—or you’ll 
get hurt,” he muttered. 

“Let her go! Let the mermaid go!” I cried frantically. 

“Forget about the mermaid,” said the man. “You’ll never see her again.” 

I grabbed the rail. My heart was pounding in my chest. I gasped for breath. 

I couldn’t stand the mermaid’s terrified screams. 

I couldn’t let them take her—not without a fight. 

She had saved my life once. Now it was my turn to save hers. 

But what could I do? 

They had lifted the mermaid out of the tank. Three men held her in the net. 
She squirmed and thrashed like crazy, splashing water all over the deck. 

I’ll tackle them, I thought. I’ll knock them over. Then I’ll push the mermaid 
into the ocean and she can swim away to safety. 

Lowering my head like a football player, I took a deep breath and ran right 
at them. 



20 


“Billy—stop!” Sheena screamed. 

I crashed into one of the men holding the net, butting him hard in the 
stomach with my head. 

To my dismay, the man hardly moved. 

He grabbed me with his free hand, lifted me up off the deck, and heaved me 
into the fish tank. 

I splashed into the warm water and came up, choking and sputtering. 

Through the glass, I watched the men toss the mermaid aboard their boat. 
They were getting away! 

I tried to scramble out of the tank, but it was too tall. I kept slipping down 
the wet glass, unable to reach the top. 

I knew there was only one person who could stop the masked men now. 
Alexander. 

Where was he? Hadn’t he heard all the noise? 

“ALEXANDER!” I shouted as loud as I could. But my voice was muffled 
by the glass walls of the tank. 

Then, finally, he appeared on the deck. I saw his big blond head and 
muscular body moving toward me. At last! 

“Alexander!” I cried, scrambling to stay afloat in the tank. “Stop them!” 

I could hear the motor of the other boat begin to rumble. One by one, the 
masked men lowered themselves off our boat. 

Three of them had left the Cassandra. Only one remained on deck. 

Through the glass I watched Alexander run up to him and grab his shoulder. 

Yes! I thought. Get him, Alexander! Get him! 

I’d never seen Alexander hit anyone before. But I knew he could do it if he 
had to. 

But Alexander didn’t hit the masked man. Instead, he asked, “Is the 
mermaid safely on board?” 

The masked man nodded. 

“Good,” Alexander replied. “And have you got the money for me?” 

“Got it.” 



“All right,” Alexander murmured. “Let’s get out of here!” 



21 


I nearly choked on a mouthful of water. 

I just couldn’t believe that Alexander was working with the masked men. 
He had seemed like such a good guy. 

But I knew now that he had arranged the whole thing. He had to be the one 
who had told them the mermaid was on board our boat. 

“Alexander,” I cried, “how could you?” 

He stared at me through the glass. “Hey, Billy, it’s just business,” he said 
with a shrug. “The zoo was going to pay a million dollars for the mermaid. But 
my new bosses will pay twenty million!” A thin smile crossed his face. “You 
know arithmetic, Billy. Which would you choose?” 

“You rat!” I shouted. I wanted to punch him. I stmggled to get out of the 
tank. All I managed to do was splash a lot and get water up my nose. 

Alexander followed the masked man to his boat. I pounded helplessly on 
the glass tank. 

Then I saw Sheena stand up. Lowering my gaze to the deck, I saw that Dr. 
D. was moving. 

Alexander didn’t seem to notice. He stepped over Dr. D.’s body. He didn’t 
even care that Dr. D. could have been hurt badly. 

I watched my uncle reach up and grab Alexander by the ankle. 

“Whoa!” Alexander tripped and fell hard onto his elbows and his knees. 

Sheena screamed and backed up to the rail. 

Maybe there’s still hope, I thought, my heart beating faster. Maybe they 
won’t get away after all. 

Alexander sat up, dazed, rubbing one elbow. “Get them!” he shouted down 
to the masked men. 

Two of the men climbed back aboard the Cassandra and grabbed Dr. D. 
Sheena ran at them, flailing at them with her puny little fists. 

Of course that didn’t do any good. The third masked man grabbed her arms 
and pinned them behind her back. 

“Kick him, Sheena!” I yelled through the glass. 

She tried to kick the man who held her, but he just tightened his grip. She 
couldn’t move. 



“Let them go!” I screamed desperately. 

“What should we do with them?” asked one of the men. 

“Whatever you do, do it quickly,” said Alexander. “We’ve got to get out of 
here.” 

The man who held Sheena glanced in at me. I was frantically treading 
water, trying to stay above the surface. 

“They might call the island police or the Coast Guard,” he said, frowning. 
“We’d better kill them.” 

“Throw them all in the tank!” suggested one of his partners. 



22 


“Alexander!” Dr. D. shouted. “I know you’re not a cruel man. Don’t let them do 
this.” 

Alexander avoided my uncle’s hard stare. “Sorry, Dr. D.,” he muttered. “I 
can’t stop them. If I try to, they’ll kill me, too.” 

Without another word, he lowered himself onto the other boat. 

What a creep, I thought angrily. 

Two of the masked men lifted Dr. D. up high and dropped him into the tank. 
He landed beside me with a splash. 

“Are you okay?” I asked him. 

He rubbed the back of his head and nodded. 

Sheena was next. They tossed her in easily. She flew through the air, 
flailing her arms and legs. Then she plopped into the water. 

The men replaced the screen lid. They clamped it shut. 

I stared out at them, realizing in horror that we had no way to escape. 

The water in the tank was about six feet deep. We all kicked and paddled, 
trying to stay above the surface. There was barely enough room for the three of 
us. 

“All right,” said one of the men. “Let’s go.” 

“Wait!” Dr. D. shouted. “You can’t just leave us here!” 

The three men exchanged glances. “You’re right. We can’t,” said one. 

They stepped toward us. 

So they aren’t heartless monsters after all, I thought. They weren’t going to 
leave us. 

But what were they going to do? 

The first man signaled the other two. They raised their hands to one side of 
the tank. 

“One, two, three—” the first man called out. 

On three, they pushed the tank over the side of the deck. 

We were thrown together. Then our bodies slammed against the side of the 
tank as it dropped into the ocean. 

Ocean water seeped into the tank. 



“The tank—it’s sinking!” cried Dr. D. 

We watched the kidnappers’ boat as it roared away. Our tank rocked in its 
wake. Then it started to sink. 

“We’re going under!” Sheena screamed. “We’re going to drown!” 



23 


All three of us desperately pushed against the screen. I beat my fists against it. 
Dr. D. tried to get his shoulder against it. 

But the tank tilted in the water, and we were all tossed back. 

The screen was made of heavy steel mesh, and clamped onto the top of the 
tank. We couldn’t reach the clamps from inside, so we had to try to break 
through it. 

We pushed with all our strength. It wouldn’t budge. 

The tank slowly sank deeper below the surface of the dark, rolling water. 
The moon disappeared behind a blanket of clouds, leaving us in total darkness. 

We had only a minute or two before the tank dropped completely below the 
surface. 

Sheena started to cry. “I’m so afraid!” she shrieked. “I’m so afraid!” 

Dr. D. pounded his fists against the glass tank wall, trying to break through. 

I ran my hands all along the top of the tank, looking for a weak spot in the 
screen. 

Then I hit something. 

A tiny latch. 

“Look!” I cried, pointing to the latch. 

I fumbled with it, trying to open it. “It’s stuck!” 

“Let me try.” Dr. D. tore at the latch with his fingers. “It’s jammed shut,” he 

said. 

Sheena took a red barrette from her hair. “Maybe we can loosen it with 
this,” she said. 

Dr. D. took the barrette and scraped hard around the latch. 

“It’s working!” he said. 

Maybe there’s hope, I thought. Maybe we’ll get out of here! 

Dr. D. stopped scraping and tugged at the latch. 

It moved! 

It opened! 

“We’re free!” cried Sheena. 

We all pushed at the screen. We pushed again. 



“Come on, kids, push harder,” urged Dr. D. 

We pushed again. The screen didn’t move. The latch hadn’t opened it after 
all. Two other latches held the screen in place. 

Two latches we couldn’t reach. 

We all grew silent. The only sounds now were Sheena’s soft, frightened 
sobs and the steady wash of the waves. 

The water had risen nearly to the top of the tank. Soon it would come 
mshing in on us. 

Suddenly, the ocean darkened. The waters grew choppy, and the tank 
rocked a little faster. 

“What’s that noise?” Sheena asked. 

I listened. 

Through the churning of the water, I heard a strange sound. It was very 
faint, as if coming from far away. 

A shrill, high-pitched whistle. 

“It sounds like a siren,” Dr. D. murmured. “Lots of sirens.” 

The eerie wails rose and fell over the water. 

Louder. Closer. 

The sound—as shrill as the screech of metal—surrounded us. 

Suddenly, dark, shadowy forms swirled around the tank. 

We pressed our faces to the glass. 

“That sound. I’ve never heard anything like it. What can it be?” asked Dr. 
D. 

“It—it’s coming from all around!” I stammered. 

The dark water tossed, churned by the shadowy forms. I peered through the 
foam, straining to see. 

Suddenly, out of the murky water, a face appeared. It pressed itself against 
the glass, right in front of my face! 

I gasped and pulled back. 

Then I saw more faces. We were surrounded by small, girlish faces. Their 
wide eyes peered in at us menacingly. 

“Mermaids!” I shrieked. 

“Dozens of them!” Dr. D. murmured in hushed amazement. 

They churned the water with their long tails. 

Their hair, dark tangles in the black water, floated around their faces. The 
tank rocked harder and harder. 



“What do they want?” cried Sheena, her voice shrill and trembling. 

“They look angry,” Dr. D. whispered. 

I stared out at the mermaids, swirling around us like ghosts. They reached 
out their hands and began clutching at the tank. They smacked their tails on the 
water. The dark waters tossed and churned. 

Suddenly I knew. I knew what they wanted. 

“Revenge,” I murmured. “They’ve come for revenge. We took their friend. 
And now they’re going to pay us back.” 



24 


Shadowy hands pressed against the glass. 

“They’re pulling us under!” Dr. D. cried. 

I gasped in terror, staring out at the hands, black outlines against the glass. 
Then, suddenly, the tank began to rise. Up out of the water, higher and 
higher. 

“Huh? What’s happening?” asked Sheena. 

“They—they’re pushing us back up!” I cried happily. 

“The mermaids aren’t taking revenge—they’re saving us!” Dr. D. 
exclaimed. 

The tank brushed up against the Cassandra. I could see the mermaids’ tiny 
hands working above us. 

The clamps popped open. The screen was pulled off. 

With a happy groan, Dr. D. boosted Sheena up. She scrambled on board the 

boat. 

Then I climbed aboard, and we both helped pull Dr. D. out of the tank. 

We were drenched, shivering from the cold. But we were safe. 

The mermaids swarmed around the boat, their pale eyes peering up at us. 
“Thank you,” Dr. D. called down to them. “Thank you for saving our lives.” 
I realized this was the second time a mermaid had saved my life. I owed 
them more than ever now. 

“We’ve got to get the kidnapped mermaid back,” I said. “Who knows what 
Alexander and those creeps will do to her!” 

“Yeah,” cried Sheena. “Look what they tried to do to us!” 

“I wish we could rescue her,” Dr. D. murmured, shaking his head. “But I 
don’t see how we can. How will we find the kidnappers’ boat in the dark? 
They’re long gone by now.” 

But I knew there had to be a way. I leaned over the rail, peering down at the 
mermaids floating beside us, chattering and cooing in the moonlight. 

“Help us!” I pleaded with them. “We want to find your friend. Please—can 
you take us to her?” 

I held my breath and waited. Would the mermaids understand me? Would 



they be able to help us—somehow? 

The mermaids chattered and whistled to one another. Then one of them—a 
dark-haired mermaid with an extra-long tail—moved to the head of the group. 

She began whistling and clicking to the other mermaids. She seemed to be 
giving orders. 

The three of us stared in amazement as the mermaids began to form a long 
line, one mermaid after the other, stretching far out to sea. 

“Do you think they’re going to lead us to the kidnappers?” I asked. 

“Maybe,” Dr. D. replied thoughtfully. “But how will the mermaids find the 
boat?” He rubbed his chin. “I know. I’ll bet they’ll use their sonar. I wish I had 
time to really listen to those sounds they’re making—” 

“Look, Dr. D!” Sheena interrupted. “The mermaids are swimming away!” 

We watched the dark figures slide away through the rolling black waters. 

“Quick!” I cried. “We’ve got to follow them.” 

“Too dangerous,” Dr. D. replied, sighing. “We can’t fight Alexander and 
four big masked men by ourselves!” 

He paced back and forth on the narrow deck. “We should call the island 
police,” he said finally. “But what would we say? That we’re chasing after a 
kidnapped mermaid? No one would believe us.” 

“Dr. D., we have to follow them. Please!” I pleaded. “The mermaids are 
swimming out of sight!” 

He stared at me for a long moment. “Okay. Let’s get going,” he said finally. 

I hurried to the stern to untie the dinghy. Dr. D. dropped it into the water 
and jumped in. Sheena and I followed. Dr. D. started the motor—and we raced 
after the shimmering line of mermaids. 

The mermaids glided so quickly through the rolling waters, it was hard for 
the small boat to keep up with them. 

About fifteen or twenty minutes later, we found ourselves in a small, 
deserted cove. The moon drifted out of the clouds. It cast pale light on a dark 
boat anchored near the shore. 

Dr. D. cut the motor so the kidnappers wouldn’t hear us approaching. 

“They must be asleep,” he whispered. 

“How can Alexander sleep after what he did to us?” said Sheena. “He left 
us to drown!” 

“Money can make people do terrible things,” Dr. D. replied sadly. “But it’s 
good they think we’re dead. They won’t be expecting us.” 



“But where’s the mermaid?” I whispered, staring at the dark boat, bobbing 
gently under the misty moonlight. 

We drifted silently toward the darkened boat. 

Well, we’ve found the kidnappers, I thought, holding on to the side of the 
dinghy as we drew near. 

There’s just one problem. 

What do we do next? 



25 


The air became very still. The kidnappers’ boat sat gently on the calm, glassy 
waters of the cove. 

“What happened to all the mermaids?” Sheena whispered. 

I shrugged. There was no sign of them. I imagined them swimming way 
down below the surface, hiding. 

Suddenly, at the side of the kidnappers’ boat, I saw ripples in the water. 

Slowly, silently, our dinghy glided toward the boat. I stared at the ripples, 
trying to see what was making them. Then I saw a flash of blond hair in the 
moonlight. 

“The mermaid!” I whispered. “There she is!” 

She was floating in the water, tied to the back of the kidnappers’ boat. 

“They must not have a tank to keep her in,” Dr. D. whispered excitedly. 
“Lucky for us.” 

Suddenly, we saw other figures rippling the water. Mermaids arched up, 
circling the captured mermaid. I saw tail fins raised like giant fans. I saw hands 
reach around the mermaid, hands tugging at the rope that held her. 

The waters tossed quietly as the figures worked. 

“The mermaids are setting her free,” I whispered. 

“What are we going to do?” Sheena asked. 

“We’ll just make sure she gets away safely,” Dr. D. replied. “Then we’ll slip 
away. The kidnappers will never know we were here.” 

We watched the mermaids struggle with the rope as our dinghy washed up 
against the kidnappers’ boat. 

“Come on, mermaids!” Sheena urged under her breath. “Hurry!” 

“Maybe they need some help,” I said. 

Dr. D. began to steer toward the mermaids. 

I gasped as a light flared on the kidnappers’ boat. A match set flame to a 
torch. 

An angry voice boomed, “What do you think you’re doing?” 



26 


I ducked away as the flaming torch was thrust in my face. 

Behind the torch, I could see the kidnapper glaring down at me. He had 
quickly pulled on his black mask. It covered only the top of his face. 

I heard a clambering sound, cries of surprise. Alexander and the other three 
kidnappers appeared on the deck. 

“How did you get here?” demanded the man with the torch. “Why aren’t 
you dead?” 

“We’ve come for the mermaid,” Dr. D. called up to him. “You can’t keep 
her here!” 

The torch swung past my head. I stood up in the dinghy and took a swipe at 
it, trying to knock it into the water. 

“Billy, no!” cried Dr. D. 

The kidnapper pulled the torch away. I fell forward in the dinghy, toppling 
over on Sheena. 

“Give us back the mermaid!” Dr. D. demanded. 

“Finders, keepers,” the kidnapper muttered. “You’ve made a long trip for 
nothing. And now look—your boat is on fire.” 

He lowered the torch to the dinghy and set it aflame. 



27 


The flames flared up, bright orange and yellow against the blue-black sky. They 
spread quickly across the front of the dinghy. 

Sheena uttered a terrified scream and tried to back away from the flames. 

In a panic, she started to leap into the water—but Dr. D. pulled her back. 
“Don’t leave the boat! You’ll drown!” 

The fire crackled. The bright flames shot higher. 

Dr. D. grabbed a yellow life jacket from the bottom of the dinghy and 
started frantically beating out the fire. 

“Billy—get a life jacket!” he yelled. “Sheena—find the bucket. Throw 
water on the flames—hurry!” 

I found a life jacket and beat at the flames. Sheena dumped seawater on 
them as fast as she could. 

Over the crackling flames, I heard Alexander shout, “Get the mermaid 
aboard. Let’s get out of here!” 

“Dr. D.!” I cried. “They’re getting away!” 

Then I heard the kidnappers yelling. “The mermaid! Where’s the 
mermaid?” 

I turned to the side of the boat. The mermaid was gone. Her friends had 
freed her. 

One of the kidnappers reached down from his boat and grabbed me. “What 
did you do with the mermaid?” he demanded. 

“Let him go!” shouted Dr. D. 

I tried to squirm away from the kidnapper. He held me tight. Then I saw 
another kidnapper swing a club at Dr. D.’s head. 

Dr. D. dodged the club. The kidnapper tried to hit him in the stomach. Dr. 
D. dodged again. 

I kicked and squirmed. Sheena tugged at the kidnapper’s hands, trying to 
help me escape. 

The third kidnapper picked her up by the wrists and threw her to the floor 
of the dinghy. 

“Let go of the kids!” pleaded Dr. D. “Alexander! Help us!” 

Alexander didn’t move from his spot on the deck. He stood with his brawny 



arms crossed in front of him, calmly watching the fight. 

The flames had nearly been quenched, but they suddenly flared up again. 

“Sheena—the fire!” I cried. “Put out the fire!” 

She grabbed the bucket and poured seawater everywhere. 

One of the kidnappers kicked the bucket from her hands. It landed in the 
water with a splash. 

Sheena picked up a life jacket and beat the last of the flames out. 

“Drop down into their boat and toss them in the water!” I heard a kidnapper 
shout up above. 

A man started to lower himself to our dinghy. But suddenly he lurched 
forward, his arms flailing. He let out a cry of surprise as his boat began to rock 
violently to the left. It looked as if it had been slammed by a huge wave. 

The kidnappers cried out as their boat began to rock back and forth. Slowly 
at first. Then violently. Gripping the sides of the dinghy, I watched them clinging 
to the rail, screaming in confusion and surprise. 

Dr. D. slowly stood up, trying to see what was happening. 

The boat tossed violently, as if bucking tall waves. 

The mermaids. I could see them now. 

They had surrounded the kidnappers’ ship and were rocking it hard. 

Hard. Harder. The kidnappers hung on helplessly. 

“Mission accomplished!” Dr. D. cried happily. He started up the motor and 
we roared off. 

Turning back, I could see the boat tilting and rocking in the water. And I 
could see our mermaid swimming free, behind the other mermaids in the 
shimmering waves. 

“She got away!” I cried. “She’s free!” 

“I hope she’ll be all right,” said Sheena. 

“We’ll look for her tomorrow,” said Dr. D. as he steered us back to the sea 
lab. “We know where to find her now.” 

Sheena glanced at me. I glanced back. 

Oh, no, I thought. After all this, it can’t be true. 

Is Dr. D. going to catch the mermaid again—and give her to the zoo? 

Sheena and I met in the galley the next morning. Since Alexander was gone, we 
had to fix our own breakfasts. 

“Do you think the mermaid went back to the lagoon?” asked Sheena. 



“Probably,” I replied. “That’s where she lives.” 

She spooned some cereal into her mouth and chewed with a thoughtful look 
on her face. 

“Sheena,” I said, “if someone gave you a million dollars, would you show 
them where the mermaid lives?” 

“No,” Sheena replied. “Not if they wanted to capture her.” 

“Me, neither,” I said. “That’s what I don’t get. Dr. D. is a great guy. I just 
can’t believe he’d—” 

I stopped. I heard a noise. The sound of a motor. 

Sheena listened. She heard it, too. 

We dropped our spoons and ran up on deck. 

Dr. D. was standing on the deck, staring out to sea. 

A boat was approaching. A white boat with Marina Zoo stenciled on the 
side in large letters. 

“The zoo people!” I said to Sheena. “They’re here!” 

What would our uncle do? I wondered with growing dread. Would he tell 
them where the mermaid was? Would he accept the million dollars? 

Sheena and I ducked behind the cockpit. We watched the Marina Zoo boat 
tie up beside the Cassandra. I recognized Mr. Showalter and Ms. Wickman. 

Mr. Showalter tossed a rope to Dr. D. Ms. Wickman jumped aboard. 

The zoo people smiled and shook Dr. D.’s hand. He nodded at them 
solemnly. 

“We had word from the fishermen on Santa Anita that you found the 
mermaid,” Mr. Showalter said. “We’re ready to take her with us now.” 

Ms. Wickman opened her briefcase and pulled out a slender envelope. 
“Here is a check for one million dollars, Dr. Deep,” she said, smiling. “We’ve 
made it out to you and the Cassandra Research Lab.” 

She held out the check to my uncle. 

I peered out from behind the cockpit. Please don’t take it, Dr. D., I pleaded 
silently. Please don’t take the check. 

“Thank you very much,” my uncle said. He reached out a hand and took the 
check from her. 



28 


“A million dollars means a great deal to me and my work,” Dr. D. said. “Your 
zoo has been very generous. That’s why I’m sorry I have to do this.” 

He raised the envelope and tore it in half. 

The two zoo people gasped in surprise. 

“I can’t take the money,” Dr. D. said. 

“Just what are you saying, Dr. Deep?” Mr. Showalter demanded. 

“You sent me on a wild goose chase,” my uncle replied. “I have searched 
these waters thoroughly ever since you left. With my equipment, I searched 
every inch of the lagoon and all the surrounding waters. I am now more 
convinced than ever before that mermaids do not exist.” 

“Yaaaay!” I screamed to myself. I wanted to jump up and down and cheer 
my head off—but I stayed hidden with Sheena behind the cockpit. 

“But what about the fishermen’s stories?” Ms. Wickman protested. 

“The local fishermen have told mermaid stories for years,” Dr. D. told her. 
“I think they believe they’ve really seen mermaids rising through the mist on 
foggy days. But what they have seen are only fish, or dolphins, or manatees, or 
even swimmers. Because mermaids don’t exist. They’re fantasy creatures.” 

Mr. Showalter and Ms. Wickman both sighed in disappointment. 

“Are you sure about this?” Mr. Showalter asked. 

“Completely sure,” my uncle replied firmly. “My equipment is very 
sensitive. It can pick up the tiniest minnow.” 

“We respect your opinion, Dr. Deep,” Mr. Showalter said with some 
sadness. “You’re the leading expert on exotic sea creatures. That’s why we came 
to you in the first place.” 

“Thank you,” said Dr. D. “Then I hope you’ll take my advice and drop your 
hunt for a mermaid.” 

“I guess we’ll have to,” said Ms. Wickman. “Thank you for trying, Dr. 
Deep.” 

They all shook hands. Then the zoo people got back on their boat and 
motored away. 

The coast was clear. Sheena and I came bursting out of our hiding place. 

“Dr. D.!” cried Sheena, throwing her arms around him. “You’re the 



greatest!” 

A wide grin spread over Dr. D.’s face. “Thanks, guys,” he said. “From now 
on, none of us will say anything to anyone about mermaids. Is it a deal?” 

“It’s a deal,” Sheena instantly agreed. 

“Deal,” I said. We all shook hands. The mermaid was our secret. 

I swore I’d never mention the mermaid to anyone. But I wanted to see her one 
last time. I wanted to say good-bye. 

After lunch, Sheena and Dr. D. went to their cabins to nap. We had been up 
for most of the night, after all. I pretended to take a nap, too. 

But once they were asleep, I sneaked out of my cabin and slipped into the 
bright blue water. 

I swam over to the lagoon to search for the mermaid. 

The sun was high in a pale blue sky. It glowed down on the still lagoon 
waters, making them glitter as if covered in gold. 

Mermaid? Where are you? I wondered. 

I was just past the reef when I felt a playful tug on my leg. 

Sheena? I thought. Had she followed me again ? 

I spun around to catch her. 

No one there. 

Seaweed, probably, I thought. I kept swimming. 

A few seconds later, I felt the tug again. Harder this time. 

Hey—it must be the mermaid! I told myself. 

I turned once again to search for her. 

The water rippled. “Mermaid?” I called. A head popped out of the water. A 
gigantic, slimy, dark green head. With one enormous eye. And a mouthful of 
jagged teeth. “The sea monster!” I shrieked. “The sea monster!” Would they 
believe me this time? 




THE SCARECROW 
WALKS AT MIDNIGHT 
Goosebumps - 20 
R.L. Stine 


1 


“Hey, Jodie—wait up!” 

I turned and squinted into the bright sunlight. My brother, Mark, was still 
on the concrete train platform. The train had clattered off. I could see it snaking 
its way through the low, green meadows in the distance. 

I turned to Stanley. Stanley is the hired man on my grandparents’ farm. He 
stood beside me, carrying both suitcases. “Look in the dictionary for the word 
‘slowpoke’,” I said, “and you’ll see Mark’s picture.” 

Stanley smiled at me. “I like the dictionary, Jodie,” he said. “Sometimes I 
read it for hours.” 

“Hey, Mark—get a move on!” I cried. But he was taking his good time, 
walking slowly, in a daze as usual. 

I tossed my blond hair behind my shoulders and turned back to Stanley. 
Mark and I hadn’t visited the farm for a year. But Stanley still looked the same. 

He’s so skinny. “Like a noodle”, my grandma always says. His denim 
overalls always look five sizes too big on him. 

Stanley is about forty or forty-five, I think. He wears his dark hair in a 
crewcut, shaved close to his head. His ears are huge. They stick way out and are 
always bright red. And he has big, round, brown eyes that remind me of puppy 
eyes. 

Stanley isn’t very smart. Grandpa Kurt always says that Stanley isn’t 
working with a full one hundred watts. 

But Mark and I really like him. He has a quiet sense of humor. And he is 
kind and gentle and friendly, and always has lots of amazing things to show us 
whenever we visit the farm. 

“You look nice, Jodie,” Stanley said, his cheeks turning as red as his ears. 
“How old are you now?” 

“Twelve,” I told him. “And Mark is eleven.” 

He thought about it. “That makes twenty-three,” he joked. 

We both laughed. You never know what Stanley is going to say! 

“I think I stepped in something gross,” Mark complained, catching up to us. 

I always know what Mark is going to say. My brother only knows three 
words— cool, weird, and gross. Really. That’s his whole vocabulary. 



As a joke, I gave him a dictionary for his last birthday. “You’re weird,” 
Mark said when I handed it to him. “What a gross gift.” 

He scraped his white high-tops on the ground as we followed Stanley to the 
beat-up, red pickup truck. “Carry my backpack for me,” Mark said, trying to 
shove the bulging backpack at me. 

“No way,” I told him. “Carry it yourself.” 

The backpack contained his Walkman, about thirty tapes, comic books, his 
Game Boy, and at least fifty game cartridges. I knew he planned to spend the 
whole month lying on the hammock on the screened-in back porch of the 
farmhouse, listening to music and playing video games. 

Well... no way! 

Mom and Dad said it was my job to make sure Mark got outside and 
enjoyed the farm. We were so cooped up in the city all year. That’s why they 
sent us to visit Grandpa Kurt and Grandma Miriam for a month each summer— 
to enjoy the great outdoors. 

We stopped beside the truck while Stanley searched his overall pockets for 
the key. “It’s going to get pretty hot today,” Stanley said, “unless it cools down.” 

A typical Stanley weather report. 

I gazed out at the wide, grassy field beyond the small train station parking 
lot. Thousands of tiny white puffballs floated up against the clear blue sky. 

It was so beautiful! 

Naturally, I sneezed. 

I love visiting my grandparents’ farm. My only problem is, I’m allergic to 
just about everything on it. 

So Mom packs several bottles of my allergy medicine for me—and lots of 
tissues. 

“Gesundheit, ” Stanley said. He tossed our two suitcases in the back of the 
pickup. Mark slid his backpack in, too. “Can I ride in back?” he asked. 

He loves to lie flat in the back, staring up at the sky, and bumping up and 
down really hard. 

Stanley is a terrible driver. He can’t seem to concentrate on steering and 
driving at the right speed at the same time. So there are always lots of quick 
turns and heavy bumps. 

Mark lifted himself into the back of the pickup and stretched out next to the 
suitcases. I climbed beside Stanley in the front. 

A short while later, we were bouncing along the narrow, twisting road that 



led to the farm. I stared out the dusty window at the passing meadows and 
farmhouses. Everything looked so green and alive. 

Stanley drove with both hands wrapped tightly around the top of the 
steering wheel. He sat forward stiffly, leaning over the wheel, staring straight 
ahead through the windshield without blinking. 

“Mr. Mortimer doesn’t farm his place anymore,” he said, lifting one hand 
from the wheel to point to a big, white farmhouse on top of a sloping, green hill. 

“Why not?” I asked. 

“Because he died,” Stanley replied solemnly. 

See what I mean? You never know what Stanley is going to say. 

We bounced over a deep rut in the road. I was sure Mark was having a great 
time in back. 

The road leads through the small town, so small that it doesn’t even have a 
name. The farmers have always called it Town. 

It has a feed store, a combination gas station and grocery store, a white- 
steepled church, a hardware store, and a mailbox. 

There were two trucks parked in front of the feed store. I didn’t see anyone 
as we barreled past. 

My grandparents’ farm is about two miles from town. I recognized the 
cornfields as we approached. 

“The corn is so high already!” I exclaimed, staring through the bouncing 
window. “Have you eaten any yet?” 

“Just at dinner,” Stanley replied. 

Suddenly, he slowed the truck and turned his eyes to me. “The scarecrow 
walks at midnight,” he uttered in a low voice. 

“Huh?” I wasn’t sure I’d heard correctly. 

“The scarecrow walks at midnight,” he repeated, training his big puppy 
eyes on me. “I read it in the book.” 

I didn’t know what to say, so I laughed. I thought maybe he was making a 

joke. 


Days later, I realized it was no joke. 



2 


Watching the farm spread out in front of us filled me with happiness. It’s not a 
big farm or a fancy farm, but I like everything about it. 

I like the barn with its sweet smells. I like the low mooing sounds of the 
cows way off in the far pasture. I like to watch the tall stalks of corn, all swaying 
together in the wind. 

Corny, huh? 

I also like the scary ghost stories Grandpa Kurt tells us at night in front of 
the fireplace. 

And I have to include Grandma Miriam’s chocolate chip pancakes. They’re 
so good, I sometimes dream about them back home in the city. 

I also like the happy expressions on my grandparents’ faces when we come 
mshing up to greet them. 

Of course I was the first one out of the truck. Mark was as slow as usual. I 
went running up to the screen porch in back of their big, old farmhouse. I 
couldn’t wait to see my grandparents. 

Grandma Miriam came waddling out, her arms outstretched. The screen 
door slammed behind her. But then I saw Grandpa Kurt push it open and he 
hurried out, too. 

His limp was worse, I noticed right away. He leaned heavily on a white 
cane. He’d never needed one before. 

I didn’t have time to think about it as Mark and I were smothered in hugs. 
“So good to see you! It’s been so long, so long!” Grandma Miriam cried happily. 

There were the usual comments about how much taller we were and how 
grown up we looked. 

“Jodie, where’d you get that blond hair? There aren’t any blonds in my 
family,” Grandpa Kurt would say, shaking his mane of white hair. “You must get 
that from your father’s side. 

“No, I know. I bet you got it from a store,” he said, grinning. It was his little 
joke. He greeted me with it every summer. And his blue eyes would sparkle 
excitedly. 

“You’re right. It’s a wig,” I told him, laughing. 

He gave my long blond hair a playful tug. 



“Did you get cable yet?” Mark asked, dragging his backpack along the 
ground. 

“Cable TV?” Grandpa Kurt stared hard at Mark. “Not yet. But we still get 
three channels. How many more do we need?” 

Mark rolled his eyes. “No MTV,” he groaned. 

Stanley made his way past us, carrying our suitcases into the house. 

“Let’s go in. I’ll bet you’re starving,” Grandma Miriam said. “I made soup 
and sandwiches. We’ll have chicken and corn tonight. The corn is very sweet 
this year. I know how you two love it.” 

I watched my grandparents as they led the way to the house. They both 
looked older to me. They moved more slowly than I remembered. Grandpa 
Kurt’s limp was definitely worse. They both seemed tired. 

Grandma Miriam is short and chubby. She has a round face surrounded by 
curly red hair. Bright red. There’s no way to describe the color. I don’t know 
what she uses to dye it that color. I’ve never seen it on anyone else! 

She wears square-shaped eyeglasses that give her a really old-fashioned 
look. She likes big, roomy housedresses. I don’t think I’ve ever seen her in jeans 
or pants. 

Grandpa Kurt is tall and broad-shouldered. Mom says he was really 
handsome when he was young. “Like a movie star,” she always tells me. 

Now he has wavy, white hair, still very thick, that he wets and slicks down 
flat on his head. He has sparkling blue eyes that always make me smile. And a 
white stubble over his slender face. Grandpa Kurt doesn’t like to shave. 

Today he was wearing a long-sleeved, red-and-green-plaid shirt, buttoned to 
the collar despite the hot day, and baggy jeans, stained at one knee, held up by 
white suspenders. 

Lunch was fun. We sat around the long kitchen table. Sunlight poured in 
through the big window. I could see the barn in back and the cornfields 
stretching behind it. 

Mark and I told all our news—about school, about my basketball team 
going to the championships, about our new car, about Dad growing a mustache. 

For some reason, Stanley thought that was very funny. He was laughing so 
hard, he choked on his split-pea soup. And Grandpa Kurt had to reach over and 
slap him on the back. 

It’s hard to know what will crack Stanley up. As Mark would say, Stanley is 
definitely weird. 



All through lunch, I kept staring at my grandparents. I couldn’t get over 
how much they had changed in one year. They seemed so much quieter, so much 
slower. 

That’s what it means to get older, I told myself. 

“Stanley will have to show you his scarecrows,” Grandma Miriam said, 
passing the bowl of potato chips. “Won’t you, Stanley?” 

Grandpa Kurt cleared his throat loudly. I had the feeling he was telling 
Grandma Miriam to change the subject or something. 

“I made them,” Stanley said, grinning proudly. He turned his big eyes on 
me. “The book—it told me how.” 

“Are you still taking guitar lessons?” Grandpa Kurt asked Mark. 

I could see that, for some reason, Grandpa Kurt didn’t want to talk about 
Stanley’s scarecrows. 

“Yeah,” Mark answered with a mouthful of potato chips. “But I sold my 
acoustic. I switched to electric.” 

“You mean you have to plug it in?” Stanley asked. He started to giggle, as if 
he had just cracked a funny joke. 

“What a shame you didn’t bring your guitar,” Grandma Miriam said to 
Mark. 

“No, it isn’t,” I teased. “The cows would start giving sour milk!” 

“Shut up, Jodie!” Mark snapped. He has no sense of humor. 

“They already do give sour milk,” Grandpa Kurt muttered, lowering his 

eyes. 

“Bad luck. When cows give sour milk, it means bad luck,” Stanley 
declared, his eyes widening, his expression suddenly fearful. 

“It’s okay, Stanley,” Grandma Miriam assured him quickly, placing a hand 
gently on his shoulder. “Grandpa Kurt was only teasing.” 

“If you kids are finished, why not go with Stanley,” Grandpa Kurt said. 
“He’ll give you a tour of the farm. You always enjoy that.” He sighed. “I’d go 
along, but my leg—it’s been acting up again.” 

Grandma Miriam started to clear the dishes. Mark and I followed Stanley 
out the back door. The grass in the back yard had recently been mowed. The air 
was heavy with its sweet smell. 

I saw a hummingbird fluttering over the flower garden beside the house. I 
pointed it out to Mark, but by the time he turned, it had hummed away. 

At the back of the long, green yard stood the old barn. Its white walls were 



badly stained and peeling. It really needed a paint job. The doors were open, and 
I could see square bales of straw inside. 

Far to the right of the barn, almost to the cornfields, stood the small guest 
house where Stanley lived with his teenage son, Sticks. 

“Stanley—where’s Sticks?” I asked. “Why wasn’t he at lunch?” 

“Went to town,” Stanley answered quietly. “Went to town, riding on a 
pony.” 

Mark and I exchanged glances. We never can figure Stanley out. 

Poking up from the cornfield stood several dark figures, the scarecrows 
Grandma Miriam had started to talk about. I stared out at them, shielding my 
eyes from the sun with one hand. 

“So many scarecrows!” I exclaimed. “Stanley, last summer there was only 
one. Why are there so many now?” 

He didn’t reply. He didn’t seem to hear me. He had a black baseball cap 
pulled down low over his forehead. He was taking long strides, leaning forward 
with that storklike walk of his, his hands shoved into the pockets of his baggy 
denim overalls. 

“We’ve seen the farm a hundred times,” Mark complained, whispering to 
me. “Why do we have to take the grand tour again?” 

“Mark—cool your jets,” I told him. “We always take a tour of the farm. It’s 
a tradition.” 

Mark grumbled to himself. He really is lazy. He never wants to do anything. 

Stanley led the way past the barn into the cornfields. The stalks were way 
over my head. Their golden tassels gleamed in the bright sunlight. 

Stanley reached up and pulled an ear off the stalk. “Let’s see if it’s ready,” 
he said, grinning at Mark and me. 

He held the ear in his left hand and started to shuck it with his right. 

After a few seconds, he pulled the husk away, revealing the ear of corn 
inside. 

I stared at it—and let out a horrified cry. 



3 


“Ohhhh—it’s disgusting !” I shrieked. 

“Gross!” I heard Mark groan. 

The corn was a disgusting brown color. And it was moving on the cob. 
Wriggling. Squirming. 

Stanley raised the corn to his face to examine it. And I realized it was 
covered with worms. Hundreds of wriggling, brown worms. 

“No!” Stanley cried in horror. He let the ear of corn drop to the ground at 
his feet. “That’s bad luck! The book says so. That’s very bad luck!” 

I stared down at the ear of corn. The worms were wriggling off the cob, 
onto the dirt. 

“It’s okay, Stanley,” I told him. “I only screamed because I was surprised. 
This happens sometimes. Sometimes worms get into the corn. Grandpa told me.” 

“No. It’s bad,” Stanley insisted in a trembling voice. His red ears were 
aflame. His big eyes revealed his fear. “The book—it says so.” 

“What book?” Mark demanded. He kicked the wormy ear of corn away 
with the toe of his high-top. 

“My book,” Stanley replied mysteriously. “My superstition book.” 

Uh-oh, I thought. Stanley shouldn’t have a book about superstitions. He 
was already the most superstitious person in the world—even without a book! 

“You’ve been reading a book about superstitions?” Mark asked him, 
watching the brown worms crawl over the soft dirt. 

“Yes.” Stanley nodded his head enthusiastically. “It’s a good book. It tells 
me everything. And it’s all true. All of it!” 

He pulled off his cap and scratched his stubby hair. “I’ve got to check the 
book. I’ve got to see what to do about the corn. The bad corn.” 

He was getting pretty worked up. It was making me feel a little scared. I’ve 
known Stanley my whole life. I think he’s worked for Grandpa Kurt for more 
than twenty years. 

He’s always been strange. But I’ve never seen him get so upset about 
something as unimportant as a bad ear of corn. 

“Show us the scarecrows,” I said, trying to get his mind off the corn. 

“Yeah. Let’s see them,” Mark joined in. 



“Okay. The scarecrows.” Stanley nodded. Then he turned, still thinking 
hard, and began leading the way through the tall rows of cornstalks. 

The stalks creaked and groaned as we passed by them. It was kind of an 
eerie sound. 

Suddenly, a shadow fell over me. One of the dark scarecrows rose up in 
front of us. It wore a tattered black coat, stuffed with straw. Its arms stretched 
stiffly out at its sides. 

The scarecrow was tall, towering over my head. Tall enough to stand over 
the high cornstalks. 

Its head was a faded burlap bag, filled with straw. Evil black eyes and a 
menacing frown had been painted on thickly in black paint. A battered old- 
fashioned hat rested on its head. 

“You made these?” I asked Stanley. I could see several other scarecrows 
poking up from the corn. They all stood in the same stiff position. They all had 
the same menacing frown. 

He stared up the scarecrow’s face. “I made them,” he said in a low voice. 
“The book showed me how.” 

“They’re pretty scary looking,” Mark said, standing close beside me. He 
grabbed the scarecrow’s straw hand and shook it. “What’s up?” Mark asked it. 

“The scarecrow walks at midnight,” Stanley said, repeating the phrase he 
had used at the train station. 

Mark was trying to slap the scarecrow a high-five. 

“What does that mean?” I asked Stanley. 

“The book told me how,” Stanley replied, keeping his eyes on the dark- 
painted face on the burlap bag. “The book told me how to make them walk.” 

“Huh? You mean you make the scarecrows walk?” I asked, very confused. 

Stanley’s dark eyes locked on mine. Once again, he got that very solemn 
expression on his face. “I know how to do it. The book has all the words.” 

I stared back at him, totally confused. I didn’t know what to say. 

“I made them walk, Jodie,” Stanley continued in a voice just above a 
whisper. “I made them walk last week. And now I’m the boss.” 

“Huh? The boss of the s-scarecrows?” I stammered. “Do you mean—” 

I stopped when, out of the corner of my eye, I saw the scarecrow’s arm 
move. 

The straw crinkled as the arm slid up. 

Then I felt rough straw brush against my face—as the dry scarecrow arm 



moved to my throat. 



4 


The prickly straw, poking out of the sleeve of the black coat, scraped against my 
neck. 

I let out a shrill scream. 

“It’s alivel” I cried in panic, diving to the ground, scrambling away on all 
fours. 

I turned back to see Mark and Stanley calmly watching me. 

Hadn’t they seen the scarecrow try to choke me? 

Then Stanley’s son, Sticks, stepped out from behind the scarecrow, a gleeful 
grin on his face. 

“Sticks—! You creep!” I cried angrily. I knew at once that he had moved 
the scarecrow’s arm. 

“You city kids sure scare easy,” Sticks said, his grin growing wider. He 
reached down to help me to my feet. “You really thought the scarecrow moved, 
didn’t you, Jodie?” he said accusingly. 

“I can make the scarecrows move,” Stanley said, pulling the cap down 
lower on his forehead. 

“I can make them walk. I did it. It’s all in the book.” 

Sticks’ smile faded. The light seemed to dim from his dark eyes. “Yeah, 
sure, Dad,” he murmured. 

Sticks is sixteen. He is tall and lanky. He has long, skinny arms and legs. 
That’s how he got the nickname Sticks. 

He tries to look tough. He has long black hair down past his collar, which 
he seldom washes. He wears tight muscle shirts and dirty jeans, ripped at the 
knees. He sneers a lot, and his dark eyes always seem to be laughing at you. 

He calls Mark and me “the city kids”. He always says it with a sneer. And 
he’s always playing stupid jokes on us. I think he’s kind of jealous of Mark and 
me. I don’t think it’s been easy for Sticks to grow up on the farm, living in the 
little guest house with his dad. 

I mean, Stanley is more like a kid than a father. 

“I saw you back there,” Mark told Sticks. 

“Well, thanks for warning me!” I snapped at Mark. I turned back angrily to 
Sticks. “I see you haven’t changed at all.” 



“Great to see you, too, Jodie,” he replied sarcastically. “The city kids are 
back for another month with the hicks!” 

“Sticks—what’s your problem?” I shot back. 

“Be nice,” Stanley muttered. “The corn has ears, you know.” 

We all stared at Stanley. Had he just made a joke? It was hard to tell with 

him. 

Stanley’s face remained serious. His big eyes stared out at me through the 
shade of his cap. “The corn has ears,” he repeated. “There are spirits in the 
field.” 

Sticks shook his head unhappily. “Dad, you spend too much time with that 
superstition book,” he muttered. 

“The book is all true,” Stanley replied. “It’s all true.” 

Sticks kicked at the dirt. He raised his eyes to me. His expression seemed 
very sad. “Things are different here,” he murmured. 

“Huh?” I didn’t understand. “What do you mean?” 

Sticks turned to his father. Stanley was staring back at him, his eyes 
narrowed. 

Sticks shrugged and didn’t reply. He grabbed Mark’s arm and squeezed it. 
“You’re as flabby as ever,” he told Mark. “Want to throw a football around this 
afternoon?” 

“It’s kind of hot,” Mark replied. He wiped the sweat off his forehead with 
the back of his hand. 

Sticks sneered at him. “Still a wimp, huh?” 

“No way!” Mark protested. “I just said it was hot, that’s all.” 

“Hey—you’ve got something on your back,” Sticks told Mark. “Turn 
around.” 

Mark obediently turned around. 

Sticks quickly bent down, picked up the wormy corncob, and stuffed it 
down the back of Mark’s T-shirt. 

I had to laugh as I watched my brother run screaming all the way back to 
the farmhouse. 

Dinner was quiet. Grandma Miriam’s fried chicken was as tasty as ever. And she 
was right about the corn. It was very sweet. Mark and I each ate two ears, 
dripping with butter. 

I enjoyed the dinner. But it upset me that both of my grandparents seemed 



so changed. Grandpa Kurt used to talk nonstop. He always had dozens of funny 
stories about the farmers in the area. And he always had new jokes to tell. 

Tonight he barely said a word. 

Grandma Miriam kept urging Mark and me to eat more. And she kept 
asking us how we liked everything. But she, too, seemed quieter. 

They both seemed tense. Uncomfortable. 

They both kept glancing down the table at Stanley, who was eating with 
both hands, butter dripping down his chin. 

Sticks sat glumly across from his father. He seemed even more unfriendly 
than usual. 

Stanley was the only cheerful person at the table. He chewed his chicken 
enthusiastically and asked for a third helping of mashed potatoes. 

“Is everything okay, Stanley?” Grandma Miriam kept asking, biting her 
bottom lip. “Everything okay?” 

Stanley burped and smiled. “Not bad,” was his reply. 

Why do things seem so different? I wondered. Is it just because Grandma 
and Grandpa are getting old? 

After dinner, we sat around the big, comfortable living room. Grandpa Kurt 
rocked gently back and forth in the antique wooden rocking chair by the 
fireplace. 

It was too hot to build a fire. But as he rocked, he stared into the dark 
fireplace, a thoughtful expression on his white-stubbled face. 

Grandma Miriam sat in her favorite chair, a big, green overstuffed armchair 
across from Grandpa Kurt. She had an unopened gardening magazine in her lap. 

Sticks, who had barely said two words the whole evening, disappeared. 
Stanley leaned against the wall, poking his teeth with a toothpick. 

Mark sank down into the long, green couch. I sat down at the other end of it 
and stared across the room. 

“Yuck. That stuffed bear still gives me the creeps!” I exclaimed. 

At the far end of the room, an enormous stuffed brown bear—about eight 
feet tall—stood straight up on its hind legs. Grandpa Kurt had shot it many years 
ago on a hunting trip. The bear’s huge paws were extended, as if ready to 
pounce. 

“That was a killer bear,” Grandpa Kurt remembered, rocking slowly, his 
eyes on the angry-looking beast. “He mauled two hunters before I shot him. I 
saved their lives.” 



I shuddered and turned away from the bear. I really hated it. I don’t know 
why Grandma Miriam let Grandpa Kurt keep it in the living room! 

“How about a scary story?” I asked Grandpa Kurt. 

He stared back at me, his blue eyes suddenly lifeless and dull. 

“Yeah. We’ve been looking forward to your stories,” Mark chimed in. “Tell 
us the one about the headless boy in the closet.” 

“No. Tell a new one,” I insisted eagerly. 

Grandpa Kurt rubbed his chin slowly. His eyes went to Stanley across the 
room. Then he cleared his throat nervously. 

“I’m kind of tired, kids,” he said softly. “Think I’ll just go to bed.” 

“But—no story?” I protested. 

He stared back at me with those dull eyes. “I don’t really know any stories,” 
he murmured. He slowly climbed to his feet and headed toward his room. 

What is going on here? I asked myself. What is wrong? 



5 


Upstairs in my bedroom later that night, I changed into a long nightshirt. The 
bedroom window was open, and a soft breeze invaded the room. 

I stared out the open window. A broad apple tree cast its shadow over the 
lawn. 

Where the grass ended, the cornfields stretched out under the glow of the 
full moon. The pale moonlight made the tall stalks shimmer like gold. The stalks 
cast long blue shadows over the field. 

Across the wide field, the scarecrows poked up stiffly like dark-uniformed 
soldiers. Their coat sleeves ruffled in the light breeze. Their pale burlap faces 
seemed to stare back at me. 

I felt a cold chill run down my back. 

So many scarecrows. At least a dozen of them, standing in straight rows. 
Like an army ready to march. 

“The scarecrow walks at midnight.” 

That’s what Stanley had said in that low, frightening tone I had never heard 
him use before. 

I glanced at the clock on the bed table. Just past ten o’clock. 

I’ll be asleep by the time they walk, I thought. 

A crazy thought. 

I sneezed. It seems I’m allergic to the farm air both day and night! 

I stared at the long shadows cast by the scarecrows. A gust of wind bent the 
stalks, making the shadows roll forward like a dark ocean wave. 

And then I saw the scarecrows start to twitch. 

“Mark!” I screamed. “Mark—come here! Hurry!” 



6 


Under the light of the full moon, I stared in horror as the dark scarecrows started 
to move. 

Their arms jerked. Their burlap heads lurched forward. 

All of them. In unison. 

All of the scarecrows were jerking, twitching, straining—as if struggling to 
pull free of their stakes. 

“Mark—hurry!” I screamed. 

I heard footsteps clomping rapidly down the hall. Mark burst breathlessly 
into my room. “Jodie—what is it?” he cried. 

I motioned frantically for him to come to the window. As he stepped beside 
me, I pointed to the cornfields. “Look—the scarecrows.” 

He gripped the windowsill and leaned out the window. 

Over his shoulder, I could see the scarecrows twitch in unison. A cold 
shudder made me wrap my arms around myself. 

“It’s the wind,” Mark said, stepping back from the window. “What’s your 
problem, Jodie? It’s just the wind blowing them around.” 

“You—you’re wrong, Mark,” I stammered, still hugging myself. “Look 
again.” 

He rolled his eyes and sighed. But he turned back and leaned out the 
window. He gazed out at the field for a long time. 

“Don’t you see?” I demanded shrilly. “They’re all moving together. Their 
arms, their heads—all moving together.” 

When Mark pulled back from the window, his blue eyes were wide and 
fearful. He stared at me thoughtfully and didn’t say a word. 

Finally, he swallowed hard and his voice came out low and frightened. 
“We’ve got to tell Grandpa Kurt,” he said. 

We rushed downstairs, but our grandparents had gone to bed. The bedroom door 
was closed. It was silent on the other side. 

“Maybe we’d better wait till tomorrow morning,” I whispered as Mark and 
I tiptoed back upstairs to our rooms. “I think we’ll be safe till then.” 

We crept back to our rooms. I pushed the window shut and locked it. Out in 



the fields, the scarecrows were still twitching, still pulling at their stakes. 

With a shudder, I turned away from the window and plunged into the bed, 
pulling the old quilt up over my head. 

I slept restlessly, tossing under the heavy quilt. In the morning, I jumped 
eagerly from bed. I ran a brush through my hair and hurried down to breakfast. 

Mark was right behind me on the stairs. He was wearing the same jeans as 
yesterday and a red-and-black Nirvana T-shirt. He hadn’t bothered to brush his 
hair. It stood straight up in back. 

“Pancakes!” he managed to choke out. Mark is only good for one word at a 
time this early in the morning. 

But the word instantly cheered me up and made me forget for a moment 
about the creepy scarecrows. 

How could I have forgotten about Grandma Miriam’s amazing chocolate 
chip pancakes? 

They are so soft, they really do melt in your mouth. And the warm 
chocolate mixed with the sweet maple syrup makes the most delicious breakfast 
I’ve ever eaten. 

As we hurried across the living room toward the kitchen, I sniffed the air, 
hoping to smell that wonderful aroma of pancake batter on the stove. 

But my nose was too stuffed up to smell anything. 

Mark and I burst into the kitchen at the same time. Grandpa Kurt and 
Stanley were already at the table. A big blue pot of coffee stood steaming in 
front of them. 

Stanley sipped his coffee. Grandpa Kurt had his face buried behind the 
morning newspaper. He glanced up and smiled as Mark and I entered. 

Everyone said good morning to everyone. 

Mark and I took our places at the table. We were so eager for the famous 
pancakes, we were practically rubbing our hands together the way cartoon 
characters do. 

Imagine our shock when Grandma Miriam set down big bowls of 
cornflakes in front of us. 

I practically burst into tears. 

I glanced across the table at Mark. He was staring back at me, his face 
revealing his surprise—and disappointment. “Cornflakes?” he asked in a high- 
pitched voice. 

Grandma Miriam had gone back to the sink. I turned to her. “Grandma 



Miriam—no pancakes?” I asked meekly. 

I saw her glance at Stanley. “I’ve stopped making them, Jodie,” she replied, 
her eyes still on Stanley. “Pancakes are too fattening.” 

“Nothing like a good bowl of cornflakes in the morning,” Stanley said with 
a big smile. He reached for the cornflakes box in the center of the table and filled 
his bowl up with a second helping. 

Grandpa Kurt grunted behind his newspaper. 

“Go ahead—eat them before they get soggy,” Grandma Miriam urged from 
the sink. 

Mark and I just stared at each other. Last summer, Grandma Miriam had 
made us a big stack of chocolate chip pancakes almost every morning! 

What is going on here? I wondered once again. 

I suddenly remembered Sticks out in the cornfields the day before, 
whispering to me, “Things are different here.” 

They sure were different. And not for the better, I decided. 

My stomach grumbled. I picked up the spoon and started to eat my 
cornflakes. I saw Mark glumly spooning his. And then I suddenly remembered 
the twitching scarecrows. 

“Grandpa Kurt—” I started. “Last night, Mark and I—we were looking out 
at the cornfields and we saw the scarecrows. They were moving. We—” 

I heard Grandma Miriam utter a low gasp from behind me. 

Grandpa Kurt lowered his newspaper. He narrowed his eyes at me, but 
didn’t say a word. 

“The scarecrows were moving!” Mark chimed in. 

Stanley chuckled. “It was the wind,” he said, his eyes on Grandpa Kurt. “It 
had to be the wind blowing them around.” 

Grandpa Kurt glared at Stanley. “You sure?” he demanded. 

“Yeah. It was the wind,” Stanley replied tensely. 

“But they were trying to get off their poles!” I cried. “We saw them!” 

Grandpa Kurt stared hard at Stanley. 

Stanley’s ears turned bright red. He lowered his eyes. “It was a breezy 
night,” he said. “They move in the wind.” 

“It’s going to be a sunny day,” Grandma Miriam said brightly from the sink. 

“But the scarecrows—” Mark insisted. 

“Yep. Looks like a real pretty day,” Grandpa Kurt mumbled, ignoring Mark. 

He doesn’t want to talk about the scarecrows, I realized. 



Is it because he doesn’t believe us? 

Grandpa Kurt turned to Stanley. “After you take the cows to pasture, maybe 
you and Jodie and Mark can do some fishing at the creek.” 

“Maybe,” Stanley replied, studying the cornflakes box. “Maybe we could 
just do that.” 

“Sounds like fun,” Mark said. Mark likes fishing. It’s one of his favorite 
sports because you don’t have to move too much. 

There’s a really pretty creek behind the cow pasture at the far end of 
Grandpa Kurt’s property. It’s very woodsy back there, and the narrow creek 
trickles softly beneath the old shade trees and is usually filled with fish. 

Finishing my cereal, I turned to Grandma Miriam at the sink. “And what 
are you doing today?” I asked her. “Maybe you and I could spend some time 
together and—” 

I stopped as she turned toward me and her hand came into view. 

“Ohhhh.” I let out a frightened moan when I saw her hand. It—it was made 
of straw! 



7 


“Jodie—what’s the matter?” Grandma Miriam asked. 

I started to point to her hand. 

Then it came into sharp focus, and I saw that her hand wasn’t straw—she 
was holding a broom. 

She had gripped it by the handle and was pulling lint off the ends of the 
straw. 

“Nothing’s wrong,” I told her, feeling like a total jerk. I rubbed my eyes. 
“I’ve got to take my allergy medicine,” I told her. “My eyes are so watery. I keep 
seeing things!” 

I was seeing scarecrows everywhere I looked! 

I scolded myself for acting so crazy. 

Stop thinking about scarecrows, I told myself. Stanley was right. The 
scarecrows had moved in the wind last night. 

It was just the wind. 


* * * 


Stanley took us fishing later that morning. As we started off for the creek, he 
seemed in a really cheerful mood. 

He smiled as he swung the big picnic basket Grandma Miriam had packed 
for our lunch. “She put in all my favorites,” Stanley said happily. 

He patted the basket with childish satisfaction. 

He had three bamboo fishing poles tucked under his left arm. He carried the 
big straw basket in his right hand. He refused to let Mark and me carry anything. 

The warm air smelled sweet. The sun beamed down in a cloudless, blue 
sky. Blades of recently cut grass stuck to my white sneakers as we headed across 
the back yard. 

The medicine had helped. My eyes were much better. 

Stanley turned just past the barn and began walking quickly along its back 
wall. His expression turned solemn. He appeared to be concentrating hard on 
something. 

“Hey—where are we going?” I called, hurrying to keep up with him. 



He didn’t seem to hear me. Taking long strides, swinging the straw picnic 
basket as he walked, he headed back in the direction we started from. 

“Hey—wait up!” Mark called breathlessly. My brother hates to hurry when 
he can take his time. 

“Stanley—wait!” I cried, tugging his shirtsleeve. “We’re going around in 
circles!” 

He nodded, his expression serious under the black baseball cap. “We have 
to circle the barn three times,” he said in a low voice. 

“Huh? Why?” I demanded. 

We started our second turn around the barn. 

“It will bring us good luck with our fishing,” Stanley replied. Then he 
added, “It’s in the book. Everything is in the book.” 

I opened my mouth to tell him this was really silly. But I decided not to. He 
seemed so serious about that superstition book of his. I didn’t want to spoil it for 
him. 

Besides, Mark and I could use the exercise. 

A short while later, we finished circling and started walking along the dirt 
path that led past the cornfields to the creek. Stanley’s smile returned 
immediately. 

He really believes the superstitions in the book, I realized. 

I wondered if Sticks believed them, too. 

“Where’s Sticks?” I asked, kicking a big clump of dirt across the path. 

“Doing chores,” Stanley replied. “Sticks is a good worker. A real good 
worker. But he’ll be along soon, I bet. Sticks never likes to miss out on a fishing 
trip.” 

The sun began to feel really strong on my face and on my shoulders. I 
wondered if I should run back and get some sunblock. 

The dark-suited scarecrows appeared to stare at me as we walked past the 
tall rows of cornstalks. I could swear their pale, painted faces turned to follow 
me as I went by. 

And did one of them lift its arm to wave a straw hand at me? 

I scolded myself for such stupid thoughts, and turned my eyes away. 

Stop thinking about scarecrows, Jodie! I told myself. 

Forget your bad dream. Forget about the dumb scarecrows. 

It’s a beautiful day, and you have nothing to worry about. Try to relax and 
have a good time. 



The path led into tall pine woods behind the cornfields. It got shady and 
much cooler as soon as we stepped into the woods. 

“Can’t we take a taxi the rest of the way?” Mark whined. A typical Mark 
joke. He really would take a taxi if there was one! 

Stanley shook his head. “City kids,” he muttered, grinning. 

The path ended, and we continued through the trees. It smelled so piney and 
fresh in the woods. I saw a tiny, brown-and-white chipmunk dart into a hollow 
log. 

In the near distance I could hear the musical trickle of the creek. 

Suddenly, Stanley stopped. He bent and picked up a pinecone. 

The three fishing poles fell to the ground. He didn’t seem to notice. He held 
the pinecone close to his face, studying it. 

“A pinecone on the shady side means a long winter,” he said, turning the 
dry cone in his hand. 

Mark and I bent to pick up the poles. “Is that what the book says?” Mark 
asked. 

Stanley nodded. He set the pinecone down carefully where he found it. 

“The cone is still sticky. That’s a good sign,” he said seriously. 

Mark let out a giggle. I knew he was trying not to laugh at Stanley. But the 
giggle escaped somehow. 

Stanley’s big brown eyes filled with hurt. “It’s all true, Mark,” he said 
quietly. “It’s all true.” 

“I—I’d like to read that book,” Mark said, glancing at me. 

“It’s a very hard book,” Stanley replied. “I have trouble with some of the 
words.” 

“I can hear the creek,” I broke in, changing the subject. “Let’s go. I want to 
catch some fish before lunchtime.” 

The clear water felt cold against my legs. The smooth rocks of the creek bed 
were slippery under my bare feet. 

All three of us had waded into the shallow creek. Mark had wanted to be 
down on the grassy shore to fish. But I convinced him it was much more fun— 
and much easier to catch something—if you stand in the water. 

“Yeah, I’ll catch something,” he grumbled as he rolled up the cuffs of his 
jeans. “I’ll catch pneumonia!” 

Stanley let out a loud laugh. It sounded like, “Har! Har! Har!” 



He set the big picnic basket down carefully on the dry grass. Then he rolled 
up the legs of his denim overalls. Carrying a pole high in one hand, he stepped 
into the water. 

“Ooooh! It’s cold!” he cried, waving his arms above his head, nearly losing 
his balance on the slippery rocks. 

“Stanley—didn’t you forget something?” I called to him. 

He turned, confused. His big ears became bright red. “What did I forget, 
Jodie?” 

I pointed to his fishing pole. “How about some bait?” I called. 

He glanced at the empty hook on the end of his line. Then he made his way 
back to shore to get a worm to bait his hook. 

A few minutes later, all three of us were in the water. Mark complained at 
first about how cold it was and about how the rocks on the bottom hurt his 
delicate little feet. 

But after a while, he got into it, too. 

The creek at this point was only about two feet deep. The water was very 
clear and trickled rapidly, making little swirls and dips over the rocky bottom. 

I lowered my line into the water and watched the red plastic float bob on 
the surface. If it started to sink, I’d know I had a bite. 

The sun felt warm on my face. The cool water flowed past pleasantly. 

I wish it were deep enough to swim here, I thought. 

“Hey—I’ve got something!” Mark cried excitedly. 

Stanley and I turned and watched him tug up his line. 

Mark pulled with all his might. “It—it’s a big one, I think,” he said. 

Finally, he gave one last really hard tug—and pulled up a thick clump of 
green weeds. 

“Good one, Mark,” I said, rolling my eyes. “It’s a big one, all right.” 

“You’re a big one,” Mark shot back. “Abig jerk.” 

“Don’t be such a baby,” I muttered. 

I brushed away a buzzing horsefly and tried to concentrate on my line. But 
my mind started to wander. It always does when I’m fishing. 

I found myself thinking about the tall scarecrows in the field. They stood so 
darkly, so menacingly, so alert. Their painted faces all had the same hard stare. 

I was still picturing them when I felt the hand slip around my ankle. 

The straw scarecrow hand. 

It reached up from the water, circled my ankle, and started to tighten its 



cold, wet grip around my leg. 



8 


I screamed and tried to kick the hand away. 

But my feet slipped on the smooth rocks. My hands shot up as I toppled 
backwards. 

“Ohh!” I cried out again as I hit the water. 

The scarecrow hung on. 

On my back, the water rushing over me, I kicked and thrashed my arms. 

And then I saw it. The clump of green weeds that had wrapped itself around 
my ankle. 

“Oh, no,” I moaned out loud. 

No scarecrow. Only weeds. 

I lowered my foot to the water. I didn’t move. I just lay there on my back, 
waiting for my heart to stop pounding, feeling once again like a total jerk. 

I glanced up at Mark and Stanley. They were staring down at me, too 
startled to laugh. 

“Don’t say a word,” I warned them, struggling to my feet. “I’m warning 
you—don’t say a word.” 

Mark snickered, but he obediently didn’t say anything. 

“I didn’t bring a towel,” Stanley said with concern. “I’m sorry, Jodie, I 
didn’t know you wanted to swim.” 

That made Mark burst out in loud guffaws. 

I shot Mark a warning stare. My T-shirt and shorts were soaked. I started to 
shore, carrying the pole awkwardly in front of me. 

“I don’t need a towel,” I told Stanley. “It feels good. Very refreshing.” 

“You scared away all the fish, Jodie,” Mark complained. 

“No. You scared them away. They saw your face!” I replied. I knew I was 
acting like a baby now. But I didn’t care. I was cold and wet and angry. 

I stomped onto the shore, shaking water from my hair. 

“I think they’re biting better down here,” I heard Stanley call to Mark. I 
turned to see him disappear around a curve of the creek. 

Stepping carefully over the rocks, Mark followed after him. They were both 
hidden from view behind the thick trees. 



I squeezed my hair, trying to get the creek water out. Finally, I gave up and 
tossed my hair behind my shoulder. 

I was debating what to do next when I heard a crackling sound in the 
woods. 

A footstep? 

I turned and stared into the trees. I didn’t see anyone. 

A chipmunk scurried away over the blanket of dead, brown leaves. Had 
someone—or something —frightened the chipmunk? 

I listened hard. Another crackling footstep. Rustling sounds. 

“Who—who’s there?” I called. 

The low bushes rustled in reply. 

“Sticks—is that you? Sticks?” My voice trembled. 

No reply. 

It has to be Sticks, I told myself. This is Grandpa Kurt’s property. No one 
else would be back here. 

“Sticks—stop trying to scare me!” I shouted angrily. 

No reply. 

Another footstep. The crack of a twig. 

More rustling sounds. Closer now. 

“Sticks—I know it’s you!” I called uncertainly. “I’m really tired of your 
dumb tricks. Sticks?” 

My eyes stared straight ahead into the trees. 

I listened. Silence now. 

Heavy silence. 

And then I raised my hand to my mouth as I saw the dark figure poke out 
from the shade of two tall pines. 

“Sticks—?” 

I squinted into the deep blue shadows. 

I saw the bulging, dark coat. The faded burlap head. The dark fedora hat 
tilted over the black, painted eyes. 

I saw the straw poking out under the jacket. The straw sticking out from the 
long jacket sleeves. 

A scarecrow. 

A scarecrow that had followed us? Followed us to the creek? 

Squinting hard into the shadows, staring at its evil, frozen grin, I opened my 
mouth to scream—but no sound came out. 



9 


And then a hand grabbed my shoulder. 

“Ohh!” I let out a cry and spun around. 

Stanley stared at me with concern. He and Mark had come up behind me. 

“Jodie, what’s the matter?” Stanley asked. “Mark and I—we thought we 
heard you calling.” 

“What’s up?” Mark asked casually. The line on his fishing pole had become 
tangled, and he was working to untangle it. “Did you see a squirrel or 
something?” 

“No—I—I—” My heart was pounding so hard, I could barely speak. 

“Cool your jets, Jodie,” Mark said, imitating me. 

“I saw a scarecrow!” I finally managed to scream. 

Stanley’s mouth dropped open. 

Mark narrowed his eyes suspiciously at me. “A scarecrow? Here in the 
woods?” 

“It—it was walking,” I stammered. “I heard it. I heard it walking.” 

A choking sound escaped Stanley’s open mouth. 

Mark continued to stare at me, his features tight with fear. 

“It’s over there!” I cried. “Right there! Look!” 

I pointed. 

But it was gone. 



10 


Stanley stared hard at me, his big brown eyes filled with confusion. 

“I saw it,” I insisted. “Between those two trees.” I pointed again. 

“You did? A scarecrow? Really?” Stanley asked. I could see he was really 
starting to get scared. 

“Well... maybe it was just the shadows,” I said. I didn’t want to frighten 
Stanley. 

I shivered. “I’m soaked. I’ve got to get back in the sunlight,” I told them. 

“But did you see it?” Stanley asked, his big eyes locked on mine. “Did you 
see a scarecrow here, Jodie?” 

“I—I don’t think so, Stanley,” I replied, trying to calm him down. “I’m 
sorry.” 

“This is very bad,” he murmured, talking to himself. “This is very bad. I 
have to read the book. This is very bad.” Then, muttering to himself, he turned 
and ran. 

“Stanley—stop!” I called. “Stanley—come back! Don’t leave us down 
here!” 

But he was gone. Vanished into the woods. 

“I’m going after him,” I told Mark. “And then I’m going to tell Grandpa 
Kurt about this. Can you carry back the fishing poles by yourself?” 

“Do I have to?” Mark whined. My brother is so lazy! 

I told him he had to. Then I went running along the path through the woods 
toward the farmhouse. 

My heart pounded as I reached the cornfields. The dark-coated scarecrows 
appeared to stare at me. As my sneakers thudded on the narrow dirt path, I 
imagined the straw arms reaching for me, reaching to grab me and pull me into 
the corn. 

But the scarecrows kept their silent, still watch over the cornstalks. They 
didn’t move or twitch as I hurtled past. 

Up ahead I saw Stanley running to his little house. I cupped my hands over 
my mouth and called to him, but he disappeared inside. 

I decided to find Grandpa Kurt and tell him about the scarecrow I saw 
moving through the woods. 



The barn door was open, and I thought I saw someone moving around 
inside. “Grandpa Kurt?” I called breathlessly. “Are you in there?” 

My wet hair bounced on my shoulders as I ran into the barn. I stood in the 
rectangle of light that stretched from the doorway and stared into the darkness. 
“Grandpa Kurt?” I called, struggling to catch my breath. 

My eyes slowly adjusted to the dim light. I stepped deeper into the barn. 
“Grandpa Kurt? Are you here?” 

Hearing a soft scraping sound against the far wall, I made my way toward 
it. “Grandpa Kurt—can I talk to you? I really need to talk to you!” My voice 
sounded tiny and frightened in the big, dark barn. My sneakers scraped over the 
dry straw floor as I walked toward the back. 

I spun around as I heard a rumbling sound. 

The light grew dimmer. 

“Hey—” I shouted. Too late. 

The barn door was sliding shut. 

“Hey! Who’s there?” I cried out in stunned anger. “Hey—stop!” 

I slipped over the straw as I started to lurch toward the sliding door. I fell 
down hard, but quickly scrambled to my feet. 

I darted toward the door. But I wasn’t fast enough. 

As the heavy door rumbled shut, the rectangle of light grew narrower, 
narrower. 

The door slammed with a deafening bang. 

The darkness slid around me, circled me, covered me. 

“Hey—let me out!” I screamed. “Let me out of here!” 

My scream ended in a choked sob. My breath escaped in noisy gasps. 

I pounded on the wooden barn door with both fists. Then I frantically swept 
my hands over the door, searching blindly for a latch, for something to pull— 
some way to open the door. 

When I couldn’t find anything, I pounded on the door until my fists hurt. 

Then I stopped and took a step back. 

Calm down, Jodie, I told myself. Calm down. You’ll get out of the barn. 
You’ll find a way out. It’s not like you’re trapped in here forever. 

I tried to force away my panic. I held my breath, waiting for my heart to 
stop racing. Then I let my breath out slowly. Slooooowly. 

I was just starting to feel a little better when I heard the scraping sound. 

A dry scraping. The sound of a shoe crunching over straw. 



“Oh.” I let out a sharp cry, then raised both hands to my face and listened. 
Scrape. Scrape. Scrape. 

The sound of footsteps. Slow, steady footsteps, so light on the barn floor. 
Footsteps coming toward me in the darkness. 



11 


“Who—who’s there?” I choked out, my voice a hushed whisper. 

No reply. 

Scrape. Scrape. Scrape. 

The soft, scratchy footsteps came closer. 

“Who is it?” I cried shrilly. 

No reply. 

I stared into the darkness. I couldn’t see a thing. 

Scrape. Scrape. 

Whoever—or whatever—was moving steadily toward me. 

I took a step back. Then another. 

I tried to cry out, but my throat was choked with fear. 

I let out a terrified gasp as I backed into something. In my panic, it took me 
a few seconds to realize that it was only a wooden ladder. The ladder that led up 
to the hayloft. 

The footsteps crunched closer. Closer. 

“Please—” I uttered in a tiny, choked voice. “Please—don’t—” 

Closer. Closer. Scraping toward me through the heavy darkness. 

I gripped the sides of the ladder. “Please—leave me alone!” 

Before I realized what I was doing, I was pulling myself up the ladder. My 
arms trembled, and my legs felt as if they each weighed a thousand pounds. 

But I scrambled rung by rung toward the hayloft, away from the 
frightening, scraping footsteps down below. 

When I reached the top, I lay flat on the hayloft floor. I struggled to listen, 
to hear the footsteps over the loud pounding of my heart. 

Was I being followed? Was the thing chasing me up the ladder? 

I held my breath. I listened. 

Scrabbling sounds. Scraping footsteps. 

“Go away!” I screamed frantically. “Whoever you are—go away!” 

But the sounds continued, dry and scratchy. Like straw brushing against 
straw. 

Scrambling to my knees, I turned to the small, square hayloft window. 



Sunlight filtered in through the window. The light made the hay strewn over the 
floor gleam like slender strands of gold. 

My heart still pounding, I crawled to the window. 

Yes! The heavy rope was still tied to the side. The rope that Mark and I 
always used to swing down to the ground. 

I can get out of here! I told myself happily. 

I can grab the rope and swing out of the hayloft. I can escape! 

Eagerly, I grabbed the rope with both hands. 

Then I poked my head out the window and gazed down to the ground. 

And let out a scream of surprise and horror. 



12 


Gazing down, I saw a black hat. Beneath it, a black coat. 

A scarecrow. Perched outside the barn door. As if standing guard. 

It jerked its arms and legs at the sound of my scream. 

And as I stared in disbelief, it hurried around the side of the barn, hobbling 
on its straw legs, its arms flapping at its sides. 

I blinked several times. 

Was I seeing things? 

My hands were cold and wet. I gripped the rope more tightly. Taking a deep 
breath, I plunged out of the small square window. 

The heavy rope swung out over the front of the barn. 

Down, down. I hit the ground hard, landing on my feet. 

“Ow!” I cried out as the rope cut my hands. 

I let go and ran around to the side of the barn. 

I wanted to catch up to that scarecrow. I wanted to see if it really was a 
scarecrow, a scarecrow that could run. 

Ignoring my fear, I ran as fast as I could. 

No sign of him on this side of the barn. 

My chest began to ache. My temples throbbed. 

I turned the corner and headed around the back of the barn, searching for 
the fleeing scarecrow. 

And ran right into Sticks! 

“Hey—” We both shouted in surprise as we collided. 

I frantically untangled myself from him. Staring past him, I saw that the 
scarecrow had vanished. 

“What’s the hurry?” Sticks demanded. “You practically ran me over!” 

He was wearing faded denim jeans, slashed at both knees, and a faded 
purple muscle shirt that only showed off how skinny he was. His black hair was 
tied back in a short ponytail. 

“A—a scarecrow!” I stammered. 

And, then—that instant—I knew. 

In that instant, I solved the whole mystery of the scarecrows. 



13 


It hadn’t been a scarecrow. 

It was Sticks. 

In the woods down by the creek. And, now, outside the barn. 

Sticks. Playing another one of his mean tricks. 

And I was suddenly certain that Sticks had somehow made the scarecrows 
twitch and pull on their stakes last night. 

Sticks just loved fooling the “city kids”. Ever since Mark and I had been 
little, he’d played the scariest, meanest practical jokes on us. 

Sometimes Sticks could be a nice guy. But he had a real cruel streak. 

“I thought you were fishing,” he said casually. 

“Well, I’m not,” I snapped. “Sticks, why do you keep trying to scare us?” 

“Huh?” He pretended he didn’t know what I was talking about. 

“Sticks, give me a break,” I muttered. “I know you were the scarecrow just 
now. I’m not stupid!” 

“Scarecrow? What scarecrow?” he asked, giving me a wide-eyed, innocent 
expression. 

“You were dressed as a scarecrow,” I accused him. “Or else you carried one 
here, and pulled it on a string or something.” 

“You’re totally crazy,” Sticks replied angrily. “Have you been out in the sun 
too long or something?” 

“Sticks—give up,” I said. “Why are you doing this? Why do you keep 
trying to scare Mark and me? You scared your Dad, too.” 

“Jodie, you’re nuts!” he exclaimed. “I really don’t have time to be dressing 
up in costumes just to amuse you and your brother.” 

“Sticks—you’re not fooling me,” I insisted. “You—” 

I stopped short when I saw Sticks’ expression change. “Dad!” he cried, 
suddenly frightened. “Dad! You say he was scared?” 

I nodded. 

“I’ve got to find him!” Sticks exclaimed frantically, “He—he could do 
something terrible !” 

“Sticks, your joke has gone far enough!” I cried. “Just stop it!” 



But he was already running toward the front of the barn, calling for his 
father, his voice shrill and frantic. 

Sticks didn’t find his dad until dinnertime. That’s the next time I saw him, too— 
just before dinner. He was carrying his big superstition book, holding it tightly 
under his arm. 

“Jodie,” he whispered, motioning for me to come close. His face was red. 
His dark eyes revealed his excitement. 

“Hi, Stanley,” I whispered back uncertainly. 

“Don’t tell Grandpa Kurt about the scarecrow,” Stanley whispered. 

“Huh?” Stanley’s request caught me off guard. 

“Don’t tell your grandpa,” Stanley repeated. “It will only upset him. We 
don’t want to frighten him, do we?” 

“But, Stanley—” I started to protest. 

Stanley raised a finger to his lips. “Don’t tell, Jodie. Your grandpa doesn’t 
like to be upset. I’ll take care of the scarecrow. I have the book.” He tapped the 
big book with his finger. 

I started to tell Stanley that the scarecrow was only Sticks, playing a mean 
joke. But Grandma Miriam called us to the table before I could get the words 
out. 

Stanley carried his superstition book to the table. Every few bites, he would 
pick up the big, black book and read a few paragraphs. 

He moved his lips as he read. But I was sitting down at the other end of the 
table and couldn’t make out any of the words. 

Sticks kept his eyes down on his plate and hardly said a word. I think he 
was really embarrassed that his father was reading the superstition book at the 
dinner table. 

But Grandpa Kurt and Grandma Miriam didn’t act the least bit surprised. 
They talked cheerfully to Mark and me and kept passing us more food—as if 
they didn’t even notice Stanley’s behavior. 

I really wanted to tell Grandpa Kurt about how Sticks was trying to scare 
Mark and me. But I decided to listen to Stanley and not upset my grandfather. 

Besides, I could deal with Sticks if I had to. He thought he was so tough. 
But I wasn’t the least bit afraid of him. 

Stanley was still reading, jabbering away as he read, as Grandma Miriam 
cleared the dinner dishes. Mark and I helped. Then we took our seats as 



Grandma Miriam carried a big cherry pie to the table. 

“Weird,” Mark whispered to me, staring at the pie. 

He was right. “Doesn’t Grandpa Kurt like apple pie?” I blurted out. 

Grandma Miriam gave me a tense smile. “Too early in the year for apples,” 
she murmured. 

“But isn’t Grandpa Kurt allergic to cherries?” Mark asked. 

Grandma Miriam started cutting the pie with a silver pie cutter. “Everyone 
loves cherry pie,” she replied, concentrating on her work. Then she raised her 
eyes to Stanley. “Isn’t that right, Stanley?” 

Stanley grinned over his book. “It’s my favorite,” he said. “Grandma 
Miriam always serves my favorite.” 

After dinner, Grandpa Kurt once again refused to tell Mark and me a scary story. 

We were sitting around the fireplace, staring at the crackling yellow flames. 
Even though it had been so hot, the air had grown cool this evening, cool enough 
to build a nice, toasty fire. 

Grandpa Kurt was in his rocking chair at the side of the hearth. The old 
wooden chair creaked as he rocked slowly back and forth. 

He had always loved to gaze at the fire and tell us one of his frightening 
stories. You could see the leaping flames reflected in his blue eyes. And his 
voice would go lower and lower as the story got scarier. 

But tonight he shrugged when I asked him for a story. He stared dully at the 
huge stuffed bear on its pedestal against the wall. Then he glanced across the 
room at Stanley. 

“Wish I knew some good stories,” Grandpa Kurt replied with a sigh. “But 
I’ve clean run out.” 

A short while later, Mark and I trudged upstairs to our bedrooms. “What is 
his problem?” Mark whispered as we climbed. 

I shook my head. “Beats me.” 

“He seems so... different,” Mark said. 

“Everyone here does,” I agreed. “Except for Sticks. He’s still trying to scare 
us city kids.” 

“Let’s just ignore him,” Mark suggested. “Let’s just pretend we don’t see 
him running around in his stupid scarecrow costume.” 

I agreed. Then I said good-night and headed into my room. 

Ignore the scarecrows, I thought as I arranged the blankets on the bed. 



Just ignore them. 

I’m not going to think about scarecrows again, I told myself. 

Sticks can go jump in the creek. 

Climbing into bed, I pulled the quilt up to my chin. I lay on my back, 
staring up at the cracks in the ceiling, trying to figure out what kind of picture 
they formed. There were three jagged cracks. I decided they looked like bolts of 
lightning. 

If I squinted, I could make them look like an old man with a beard. 

I yawned. I felt really sleepy, but I couldn’t get to sleep. 

It was only my second night here at the farm. It always takes me awhile to 
adjust to being in a new place and sleeping in a different bed. 

I closed my eyes. Through the open window, I could hear the soft mooing 
of cows from the barn. 

And I could hear the whisper of the wind as it brushed through the tall 
cornstalks. 

My nose was totally stuffed up. Bet I snore tonight, I thought. 

That is, if I ever get to sleep! 

I tried counting sheep. It didn’t seem to be working, so I tried counting 
cows. Big, bulky, bouncing, sloooooow-moooooving cows. 

I counted to a hundred twelve before I decided that wasn’t working, either. 

I turned onto my side. Then, after a few minutes, I tried my other side. 

I found myself thinking about my best friend, Shawna. I wondered if 
Shawna was having a good time at camp. 

I thought about some of my other friends. Most of them were just hanging 
around this summer, not doing much of anything. 

When I glanced at the clock, I was surprised to see it was nearly twelve. 
I’ve got to get to sleep, I told myself. I’ll be wrecked tomorrow if I don’t get 
some sleep. 

I settled onto my back, pulling the soft quilt up to my chin again. I closed 
my eyes and tried to picture nothing. Just empty, black space. Endless, empty 
space. 

The next thing I knew, I was hearing scratching sounds. 

I ignored them at first. I thought the curtains were flapping against the open 
window. 

Got to get to sleep, I urged myself. Got to get to sleep. 

The scratching grew louder. Closer. 



I heard a scraping sound. 

From outside the window? 

I opened my eyes. Shadows danced on the ceiling. I realized I was holding 
my breath. 

Listening hard. 

Another scrape. More scratching. Dry scratching. 

I heard a low groan. 

“Huh?” A startled gasp escaped my lips. 

I pulled myself up against the headboard. I tugged the quilt up to my chin, 
gripping it tightly with both hands. 

I heard more dry scraping. Like sandpaper, I thought. 

Suddenly the room grew darker. 

I saw something pull itself up to the window. A dark figure. Blocking the 
moonlight. 

“Who—who’s there?” I tried to call. But my voice came out a choked 
whisper. 

I could see a shadowy head, black against the purple sky. 

It rose up in the window. Dark shoulders. Followed by a darker chest. Black 
against black. 

A silent shadow, slipping into my room. 

“H-help! ” Another stammered whisper. 

My heart had stopped beating. I couldn’t breathe. Couldn’t breathe. 

It slid over the windowsill. Brushed away the curtains as it lowered itself 
into my room. 

Its feet scraped over the bare floorboards. 

Scratch scratch scratch. 

It moved slowly, steadily toward my bed. 

I struggled to get up. 

Too late. 

My feet tangled in the quilt. 

I fell to the floor, landing hard on my elbows. 

I raised my eyes to see it move closer. 

I opened my mouth to scream as it emerged from the shadows. 

And then I recognized him. Recognized his face. 

“Grandpa Kurt!” I cried. “Grandpa Kurt—what are you doing here? Why 



did you climb in the window?” 

He didn’t reply. His cold blue eyes glared down at me. His whole face 
twisted into an ugly frown. 

And then he raised both arms above me. 

And I saw that he had no hands. 

Clumps of straw poked out from his jacket sleeves. 

Only straw. 

“Grandpa—no!!” I shrieked. 



14 


“Grandpa— please — no!” I shrieked as he lowered his straw arms toward me. 

He bared his teeth like an angry dog and let out a sharp, frightening growl. 
The straw hands reached down for me. 

Grandpa Kurt’s face was the same. The face I had always known. Except 
that his eyes were so cold, so cold and dead. 

The straw hands brushed over my face as I climbed to my feet. I took a step 
back, raising my hands like a shield. 

“Grandpa—what’s wrong? What’s happening?” I whispered. 

My temples were pounding. My entire body shook. 

His cold eyes narrowed in fury as he reached for me again. 

“Noooo!” I let out a long wail of terror. Then I turned and stumbled to the 

door. 

His feet scraped over the bare floor as he lurched toward me. Glancing 
down, I saw the straw poking out from the cuffs of his pants. 

His feet—they were straw, too. 

“Grandpa Kurt! Grandpa Kurt! What is happening ?” Was that really my 
voice, so shrill and frightened? 

He swung an arm. The straw scratched my back as it swept over me. 

I grabbed for the doorknob. Twisted it. Pulled open the door. 

And cried out again as I collided with Grandma Miriam. 

“Oh, help! Please help! Grandma Miriam—he’s chasing me!” I cried. 

Her expression didn’t change. She stared back at me. 

In the dim light of the hallway, her face came into focus. 

And I saw that her glasses were painted on. 

And her eyes. And mouth. And big round nose. 

Her entire face was painted on. 

“You’re not real!” I cried. 

And then darkness swept over me as Grandpa Kurt’s straw hands wrapped 
around my face. 



15 


I woke up coughing and choking. 

Surrounded by darkness. Heavy darkness. 

It took me a few seconds to realize that I’d been sleeping with the pillow 
over my face. 

Tossing it to the foot of the bed, I pulled myself up, breathing hard. My face 
was hot. My nightshirt stuck wetly to my back. 

I glanced at the window, suddenly afraid that I’d see a dark figure climbing 
in. 

The curtains fluttered gently. The early morning sky was still gray. I heard 
the shrill cry of a rooster. 

A dream. It had all been a frightening nightmare. 

Taking a deep breath and letting it out slowly, I lowered my feet to the floor. 

I stared at the gray morning light through the window. Just a dream, I 
assured myself. Calm down, Jodie. It was just a dream. 

I could hear someone moving around downstairs. Staggering over to the 
dresser, I pulled out some fresh clothes—a pair of faded denim cutoffs, a 
sleeveless blue T-shirt. 

My eyes were watery. Everything was a blur. My allergies were really bad 
this morning. 

Rubbing my eyes, I made my way to the window and peered out. A red ball 
of a sun was just peeking over the broad apple tree. A heavy morning dew made 
the grass of the back yard sparkle like emeralds. 

The sea of cornstalks rose darkly behind the grass. The scarecrows stood 
stiffly over them, arms outstretched as if welcoming the morning. 

The rooster crowed again. 

What a stupid nightmare, I thought. I shook myself as if trying to shake it 
from my memory. Then I ran a brush through my hair and hurried down to 
breakfast. 

Mark was just entering the kitchen as I came in. We found Grandma 
Miriam by herself at the table. A mug of tea steamed in front of her as she gazed 
out the window at the morning sunlight. 

She turned and smiled at us as we entered. “Good morning. Sleep well?” 



I was tempted to tell her about my scary nightmare. But, instead, I asked, 
“Where’s Grandpa Kurt?” I stared at his empty chair. The newspaper lay 
unopened on the table. 

“They all went off early,” Grandma Miriam replied. 

She stood up, walked to the cabinets, and brought a big box of cornflakes to 
the table. She motioned for us to take our places. “Pretty day,” she said 
cheerfully. 

“No pancakes?” Mark blurted out. 

Grandma Miriam stopped halfway across the room. “I’ve completely 
forgotten how to make them,” she said without turning around. 

She set two bowls down and made her way to the refrigerator to get the 
milk. “You kids want orange juice this morning? It’s fresh squeezed.” 

Grandma Miriam set the milk carton down beside my bowl. She smiled at 
me. Her eyes remained dull behind her square-rimmed glasses. “I hope you two 
are enjoying your visit,” she said quietly. 

“We would be if it weren’t for Sticks,” I blurted out. 

Her expression turned to surprise. “Sticks?” 

“He’s trying to scare us again,” I said. 

Grandma Miriam tsk-tsked. “You know Sticks,” she replied softly. 

She pushed at her red hair with both hands. “What are you two planning for 
today?” she asked brightly. “It’s a beautiful morning to go riding. Before they 
left this morning, Grandpa Kurt had Stanley saddle up Betsy and Maggie, in case 
you wanted to ride.” 

“Sounds like fun,” I told her. “What do you say, Mark? Before it gets really 
hot out?” 

“I guess,” Mark replied. 

“You two always enjoyed riding along the creek,” Grandma Miriam said, 
putting the cornflakes box away. 

I stared across the room at her, stared at her red, curly hair, her pudgy arms, 
her flowered housedress. 

“Are you okay, Grandma Miriam?” I asked. The words just tumbled out of 
my mouth. “Is everything okay here?” 

She didn’t reply. Instead, she lowered her eyes, avoiding my gaze. “Go 
have your ride,” she said quietly. “Don’t worry about me.” 


Grandpa Kurt always called Betsy and Maggie the “old gray mares”. I guess 



because they were both old and they were both gray. And they were as grumpy 
as can be when Mark and I climbed onto their saddles and started to urge them 
from the barn. 

They were the perfect horses for us “city kids”. The only time we ever got 
to ride horses was during our summers at the farm. So we were not exactly the 
most skillful riders in the world. 

Bumping along on these two old nags was just our speed. And even as slow 
as we were moving, I dug my knees into Betsy’s sides and held onto the saddle 
horn for dear life. 

We followed the dirt path past the cornfields toward the woods. The sun 
was still climbing a hazy, yellow sky. But the air was already hot and sticky. 

Flies buzzed around me as I bounced on top of Betsy. I removed one hand 
from the saddle horn to brush a big one off Betsy’s back. 

Several scarecrows stared back at us as Mark and I rode past. Their black 
eyes glared at us from under their floppy hats. 

Mark and I didn’t say a word. We were keeping to our promise of not 
talking about scarecrows. 

I turned my eyes to the woods and tossed the reins, urging Betsy to move a 
little faster. She ignored me, of course, and kept clopping along over the path at 
her slow, steady pace. 

“I wonder if these horses can still get up to a trot,” Mark called. He was a 
few paces behind me on the narrow dirt path. 

“Let’s give it a try!” I called back, grabbing the reins tighter. 

I dug my sneaker heels into Betsy’s side. “Go, girl—go!” I cried, slapping 
her gently with the reins. 

“Whoooa!” I let out a startled cry as the old horse obediently began to trot. I 
really didn’t think she would cooperate! 

“All right! Cool!” I heard Mark shout behind me. 

Their hooves clopped loudly on the path as the two horses began to pick up 
speed. I was bouncing hard over the saddle, holding on tightly, off-balance, 
beginning to wonder if this was such a hot idea. 

I didn’t have a chance to cry out when the dark figure hurtled across the 

path. 

It all happened so fast. 

Betsy was trotting rapidly. I was bouncing on the saddle, bouncing so hard, 
my feet slipped out of the stirrups. 



The dark figure leaped out right in front of us. 

Betsy let out a shrill, startled whinny—and reared back. 

As I started to fall, I saw immediately what had jumped onto the path. 
It was a grinning scarecrow. 



16 


Betsy rose up with a high whinny. 

My hand grabbed for the reins, but they slipped from my grasp. 

The sky appeared to roll over me, then tilt away. 

I slid backwards, out of the saddle, off the horse, my feet thrashing wildly 
for the flapping stirrups. 

The sky tilted even more. 

I hit the ground hard on my back. 

I remember only the shock of stopping so abruptly, the surprise at how hard 
the ground felt, how so much pain shot through my body so quickly. 

The sky turned bright red. A glowing scarlet. Like an explosion. 

And then the scarlet faded to deep, deep, endlessly deep black. 


* * * 


I heard low moans before I opened my eyes. 

I recognized the voice. Mark’s voice. 

My eyes still shut, I opened my mouth to call to him. My lips moved, but 
no sound came out. 

“Ohhhh.” Another low groan from him, not far from me. 

“Mark—?” I managed to choke out. My back ached. My shoulders hurt. My 
head throbbed. 

Everything hurt. 

“My wrist—I think I broke it,” Mark said, his voice shrill and frightened. 
“You fell, too?” I asked. 

“Yeah. I fell, too,” he groaned. 

I opened my eyes. Finally. I opened my eyes. 

And saw the hazy sky. 

All a blur. Everything was a watery blur. 

I stared at the sky, trying to get it in focus. 

And then saw a hand in front of the sky. A hand lowering itself toward me. 
A bony hand stretching out from a heavy black coat. 



The hand of the scarecrow, I realized, staring up helplessly at it. 
The hand of the scarecrow, coming down to grab me. 



17 


The hand grabbed my shoulder. 

Too terrified to cry out, too dazed to think clearly, my eyes followed the 
dark coat sleeve—up to the shoulder—up to the face. 

A blur. All a frightening blur. 

And then the face became clear. 

“Stanley!” I cried. 

He leaned over me, his red ears glowing, his face tight with worry. He 
gently grabbed my shoulder. “Jodie—are you all right?” 

“Stanley—it’s you!” I exclaimed happily. I sat up. “I think I’m okay. I don’t 
know. Everything hurts.” 

“What a bad fall,” Stanley said softly. “I was in the field. And I saw it. I 
saw the scarecrow....” 

His voice trailed off. I followed his frightened gaze up ahead of me on the 
dirt path. 

The scarecrow lay facedown across the path. 

“I saw it jump out,” Stanley uttered with a shudder that shook his whole 
body. 

“My wrist...” Mark moaned from nearby. 

I turned as Stanley hurried over to him. Mark was sitting up in the grass at 
the side of the path, holding his wrist. “Look—it’s starting to swell up,” he 
groaned. 

“Oooh, that’s bad. That’s bad,” Stanley said, shaking his head. 

“Maybe it’s just a sprain,” I suggested. 

“Yeah,” Stanley quickly agreed. “We’d better get you to the house and put 
ice on it. Can you get back up on Maggie? I’ll ride behind you.” 

“Where’s my horse?” I asked, searching both ways along the path. I climbed 
unsteadily to my feet. 

“She galloped back to the barn,” Stanley replied, pointing. “Fastest I’ve 
seen her go in years!” 

He glanced down at the scarecrow and shuddered again. 

I took a few steps, stretching my arms and my back. “I’m okay,” I told him. 
“Take Mark on the horse. I’ll walk back.” 



Stanley eagerly started to help Mark to his feet. I could see that Stanley 
wanted to get away from here—away from the scarecrow—as fast as possible. 

I watched as they rode off down the path toward the house. Stanley sat 
behind Mark in the saddle, holding the reins, keeping Maggie at a slow, gentle 
pace. Mark held his wrist against his chest and leaned back against Stanley. 

I stretched my arms over my head again, trying to stretch the soreness from 
my back. My head ached. But other than that, I didn’t feel bad. 

“Guess I’m lucky,” I murmured out loud. 

I took a long glance at the scarecrow, sprawled facedown across the path. 
Cautiously, I walked over to it. 

I poked its side with the toe of my sneaker. 

The straw beneath the coat crinkled. 

I poked it harder, pushing my sneaker hard into the scarecrow’s middle. 

I don’t know what I expected to happen. Did I think the scarecrow would 
cry out? Try to squirm away? 

With an angry cry, I kicked the scarecrow. Hard. 

I kicked it again. 

The burlap bag head bounced on the path. The scarecrow’s ghastly painted 
grin didn’t move. 

It’s just a scarecrow, I told myself, giving it one last kick that sent straw 
falling out from the jacket front. 

Just a scarecrow that Sticks tossed onto the path. 

Mark and I could have been killed, I told myself. 

We’re lucky we weren’t. 

Sticks. It had to be Sticks. 

But why? 

This wasn’t a joke. 

Why was Sticks trying to hurt us? 



18 


Stanley and Sticks weren’t at lunch. Grandpa Kurt said they had to go into town 
for supplies. 

Mark’s wrist was only sprained. Grandma Miriam put an ice bag on it, and 
the swelling went right down. But Mark was groaning and complaining. He was 
really making the most of it. 

“Guess I’ll have to lie on the couch and watch TV for a week or so,” he 
moaned. 

Grandma Miriam served ham sandwiches and homemade coleslaw. Mark 
and I gobbled down our lunches. All that excitement had made us really hungry. 

As we ate, I decided to tell Grandpa Kurt everything that had been 
happening. I couldn’t hold it in any longer. 

I told him about how Sticks was making the scarecrows move at night. And 
how he was trying to frighten us, trying to make us think the scarecrows were 
alive. 

I caught a glimpse of fear in Grandpa Kurt’s blue eyes. But then he rubbed 
his white-stubbled cheeks, and he got a faraway look on his face. 

“Sticks and his little jokes,” he said finally, a smile spreading across his 
face. “That boy sure likes his jokes.” 

“He’s not joking,” I insisted. “He’s really trying to frighten us, Grandpa.” 

“We could have been killed this morning!” Mark joined in. He had 
mayonnaise smeared on his cheek. 

“Sticks is a good boy,” Grandma Miriam murmured. She was smiling, too. 
She and Grandpa Kurt exchanged glances. 

“Sticks wouldn’t really hurt you,” Grandpa Kurt said softly. “He just likes 
to have his fun.” 

“Great fun!” I muttered sarcastically, rolling my eyes. 

“Yeah. Great fun,” Mark groaned. “I almost broke my wrist!” 

Grandpa Kurt and Grandma Miriam just smiled back at us, their faces 
frozen like the painted scarecrow faces. 

After lunch, Mark slumped to the couch, where he planned to spend the rest of 
the afternoon staring at the TV. He loved having an excuse not to go outdoors. 



I heard Stanley’s truck pull up the drive. I decided to go find Sticks and tell 
him how fed up we were with his stupid scarecrow tricks. 

I didn’t think his jokes were all in fun. I really believed he was trying to 
frighten us or hurt us—and I wanted to find out why. 

I didn’t see Sticks or Stanley out in the yard. So I made my way across the 
grass to the guest house where they lived. 

It was a warm, beautiful day. The sky was clear and bright. The air smelled 
fresh and sweet. 

But I couldn’t enjoy the sunshine. All I could think about was letting Sticks 
know how angry I was. 

I knocked on the guest house door. I took a deep breath and tossed my hair 
behind my shoulders, listening for signs of life inside. 

I tried to think of what I was going to say to Sticks. But I was too angry to 
plan it. My heart started to pound. I realized I was breathing hard. 

I knocked on the door again, harder this time. 

There was no one inside. 

I turned my gaze to the cornfields. The stalks stood stiffly, watched over by 
the motionless scarecrows. No sign of Sticks. 

I turned to the barn, across the wide grass from the guest house. Maybe 
Sticks is in there, I thought. 

I jogged to the barn. Two enormous crows hopped along the ground in front 
of the open barn doors. They flapped their wings hard and scrambled out of my 
way. 

“Hey—Sticks?” I shouted breathlessly as I stepped inside. 

No reply. 

The barn was dark. I waited for my eyes to adjust. 

Remembering my last creepy visit to the barn, I stepped reluctantly, my 
sneakers scraping over the straw on the floor. “Sticks? Are you in here?” I 
called, staring hard into the deep shadows. 

A rusted baling machine stood to one side of the straw bales. A 
wheelbarrow tilted against the wall. I hadn’t noticed them before. 

“Guess he isn’t here,” I said to myself out loud. 

I walked past the wheelbarrow. I saw something else I hadn’t noticed before 
—a pile of old coats on the barn floor. Empty burlap bags were stacked beside 
them. 

I picked one up. It had a frowning face painted on it in black paint. I 



dropped the bag back onto the pile. 

These must be Stanley’s scarecrow supplies, I realized. 

How many more scarecrows did he plan to build? 

Then something in the corner caught my eye. I walked quickly over the 
straw. Then I bent down to examine what I saw. 

Torches. At least a dozen torches, stacked in the corner, hidden by the 
darkness. Next to them I spotted a large bottle of kerosene. 

What on earth are these doing here? I asked myself. 

Suddenly, I heard a scraping sound. I saw shadows slide against shadows. 
And I realized that once again I was no longer alone. 

I jumped to my feet. “Sticks!” I cried. “You scared me.” 

His face was half hidden in darkness. His black hair fell over his forehead. 
He didn’t smile. “I warned you,” he said menacingly. 



19 


Feeling the fear rise to my throat, I stepped out of the corner and moved past 
him, into the light from the doorway. “I—I was looking for you,” I stammered. 
“Sticks, why are you trying to scare Mark and me?” 

“I warned you,” he said, lowering his voice to a whisper. “I warned you to 
get away from here, to go back home.” 

“But why?” I demanded. “What’s your problem, Sticks? What did we do to 
you? Why are you trying to scare us?” 

“I’m not,” Sticks replied. He glanced back nervously to the barn doors. 

“Huh?” I gaped at him. 

“I’m not trying to scare you. Really,” he insisted. 

“Liar,” I muttered angrily. “You must really think I’m a moron. I know you 
threw that scarecrow onto our path this morning. It had to be you, Sticks.” 

“I really don’t know what you’re talking about,” he insisted coldly. “But 
I’m warning you—” 

A sound at the doorway made him stop. 

We both saw Stanley step into the barn. He shielded his eyes with one hand 
as his eyes adjusted to the darkness. “Sticks—are you in here?” he called. 

Sticks’ features tightened in sudden fear. He let out a low gasp. 

“I—I’ve got to go,” Sticks whispered tensely to me. He turned and started 
jogging toward Stanley. “Here I am, Dad,” he called. “Is the tractor ready?” 

I watched the two of them hurry from the barn. Sticks didn’t look back. 

I stood in the darkness, my eyes on the empty doorway, thinking hard. 

I know Sticks was lying to me, I thought. 

I know he made the scarecrows move at night. I know he dressed as a 
scarecrow to scare me in the woods and at the barn. And I know he tossed that 
scarecrow in front of the horses this morning. 

I know he’s trying to frighten Mark and me. 

But enough is enough, I decided. 

Now it’s payback time. 

Now it’s time for Sticks to be frightened. Really frightened. 



20 


“I can’t do this!” Mark protested. 

“Of course you can,” I assured him. “This is going to be really cool.” 

“But my wrist hurts again,” my brother whined. “It just started hurting. I 
can’t use it.” 

“No problem,” I told him. “You won’t have to use it.” 

He started to protest some more. But then a smile spread across his face, 
and his eyes lit up gleefully. “It’s kind of a cool idea,” he said, laughing. 

“Of course it’s an awesome idea,” I agreed. “I thought of it!” 

We were standing in the doorway to the barn. The white light from a full 
moon shone down on us. Owls hooted somewhere nearby. 

It was a cool, clear night. The grass shimmered from a heavy dew. A soft 
wind made the trees whisper. The moonlight was so bright, I could see every 
blade of grass. 

After Grandpa Kurt and Grandma Miriam had gone to bed, I dragged Mark 
from the house. I pulled him across the yard to the barn. 

“Wait right here,” I said. Then I hurried into the barn to get what we 
needed. 

It was a little creepy in the dark barn at night. I heard a soft fluttering sound 
high in the rafters. 

Probably a bat. 

My sneakers were wet from the grass. I slid over the straw on the barn 
floor. 

The bat swooped low over my head. I heard a high-pitched chittering up in 
the rafters. More bats. 

I grabbed one of the big, old coats from the pile. Then I pulled up one of the 
burlap bag faces and slung it on top of the coat. 

Ignoring the fluttering wings swooping back and forth, back and forth, 
across the barn, I hurried outside to Mark. 

And explained my plan, my plan to get our revenge on Sticks. 

It was actually a very simple plan. We’d dress Mark up as a scarecrow. 
He’d stand with the other scarecrows in the cornfield. 

I’d go to the guest house and get Sticks. I’d tell Sticks I saw something 



weird in the field. I’d pull Sticks out to the field. Mark would start to stagger 
toward him—and Sticks would be so freaked, he’d have a cow! 

A simple plan. And a good one. 

Sticks deserved it, too. 

I pulled the burlap bag over Mark’s head. The black, painted eyes stared 
back at me. I reached down, picked up a handful of straw, and began stuffing it 
under the bag. 

“Stop squirming!” I told Mark. 

“But the straw itches!” he cried. 

“You’ll get used to it,” I told him. I grabbed his shoulders. “Stand still. 
Don’t move.” 

“Why do I need straw?” he whined. 

“Mark, you have to look like all the other scarecrows,” I told him. 
“Otherwise, Sticks won’t be fooled.” 

I stuffed the burlap face with straw. Then I held up the old overcoat for 
Mark to put on. 

“I can’t do this!” he wailed. “I’m going to itch to death! I can’t breathe!” 

“You can breathe perfectly fine,” I told him. I stuffed straw into the sleeves. 
I was careful to let clumps of straw hang from the cuffs, covering Mark’s hands. 
Then I stuffed more straw into the jacket. 

“Will you stand still?” I whispered angrily. “This is a lot of hard work—you 
know?” 

He grumbled in a low voice to himself as I continued to work. 

“Just keep thinking how great it’ll be when Sticks sees you and thinks 
you’re a scarecrow that’s really coming to life,” I said. 

I had straw stuck to my hands, straw all down the front of my sweatshirt 
and jeans. I sneezed. Once. Twice. I’m definitely allergic to the stuff. 

But I didn’t care. I was so excited. I couldn’t wait to see Sticks’ terrified 
face. I couldn’t wait to pay him back for trying to frighten us all week. 

“I need a hat,” Mark said. He was standing stiffly, afraid to move under all 
the straw. 

“Hmmmm.” I thought hard. There weren’t any hats in the barn with the 
other scarecrow supplies. “We’ll just take one off a real scarecrow,” I told Mark. 

I stepped back to see my handiwork. Mark looked pretty good. But he still 
needed more straw. I set to work, stuffing him, making the old coat bulge. 

“Now don’t forget to stand straight and stiff, with your arms straight out,” I 



instructed. 

“Do I have a choice?” Mark complained. “I—I can’t move at all!” 

“Good,” I said. I arranged the straw that stuck out of his sleeves, then 
stepped back. “Okay. You’re ready,” I told him. 

“How do I look?” he asked. 

“Like a short scarecrow,” I told him. 

“I’m too short?” he replied. 

“Don’t worry, Mark,” I said, grabbing his arm. “I’m going to stick you up 
on a pole!” 

“Huh?” 

I laughed. “Gotcha,” I muttered. “I’m kidding.” I started to lead him to the 
cornfields. 

“Think this is going to work?” Mark asked, walking stiffly. “Think we’re 
really going to scare Sticks?” 

I nodded. An evil grin spread over my face. “I think so,” I told my brother. 
“I think Sticks is in for a terrifying surprise.” 

Little did I know that we all were! 



21 


I gripped Mark’s arm with both hands and led him to the cornfields. The bright 
moon bathed us in white light. The tall cornstalks shivered in a light breeze. 

Mark looked so much like a scarecrow, it was scary. Tufts of straw stuck 
out at his neck and the cuffs of his coat. The enormous old coat hung loosely 
over his shoulders and came down nearly to his knees. 

We stepped into the field. Our sneakers crunched over the dry ground as we 
edged through a narrow row. 

The cornstalks rose above our heads. The breeze made them lean over us, 
as if trying to close us in. 

I let out a gasp as I heard a rustling sound along the ground. 

Footsteps? 

Mark and I both froze. And listened. 

The tall stalks bent low as the wind picked up. They made an eerie creaking 
sound as they moved. The ripe corn sheaths bobbed heavily. 

Creeeeak. Creeeeak. 

The stalks shifted back and forth. 

Then we heard the rustling again. A soft brushing sound. 

Very nearby. 

“Ow. Let go!” Mark whispered. 

I suddenly realized I was still gripping his arm, squeezing it tightly. 

I let go. And listened. “Do you hear it?” I whispered to Mark. “That 
brushing sound?” 

Creeeeak. Creeeeak. 

The cornstalks leaned over us, shifting in the wind. 

A twig cracked. So nearby, I nearly jumped out of my skin. 

I held my breath. My heart was racing. 

Another soft rustling sound. I stared down at the ground, trying to follow 
the sound. 

“Oh.” 

A large gray squirrel scampered across the row and disappeared between 
the stalks. 



I burst out laughing, mostly from relief. “Just a squirrel,” I said. “Do you 
believe it? Just a squirrel!” 

Mark let out a long, relieved sigh from under the burlap bag. “Jodie, can we 
get going?” he demanded impatiently. “This thing itches like crazy!” 

He raised both hands and tried to scratch his face through the bag. But I 
quickly tugged his arms down. “Mark—stop. You’ll mess up the straw!” 

“But my face feels like a hundred bugs are crawling all over it!” he wailed. 
“And I can’t see. You didn’t cut the eyeholes big enough.” 

“Just follow me,” I muttered. “And stop complaining. You want to scare 
Sticks, don’t you?” 

Mark didn’t reply. But he let me lead him deeper into the cornfield. 

Suddenly, a black shadow fell over our path. 

I let out a sharp gasp before I realized it was the long shadow of a 
scarecrow. 

“How do you do,” I said, reaching out and shaking its straw hand. “May I 
borrow your hat?” 

I reached up and pulled the brown, floppy hat off the burlap head. Then I 
lowered it over Mark’s burlap head and pulled it down tight. 

“Hey—!” Mark protested. 

“I don’t want it to fall off,” I told him. 

“I’m never going to stop itching!” Mark whined. “Can you scratch my 
back? Please? My whole back is itching!” 

I gave the back of the old coat a few hard mbs. “Turn around,” I instructed 
him. I gave him a final inspection. 

Excellent. He looked more like a scarecrow than the scarecrows did. 

“Stand right here,” I told him, moving him into a small clearing between 
two rows of cornstalks. “Good. Now when you hear me bringing Sticks over, put 
your arms straight out. And don’t move a muscle.” 

“I know, I know,” Mark grumbled. “Think I don’t know how to be a 
scarecrow? Just hurry—okay?” 

“Okay,” I told him. I turned and made my way quickly along the shifting 
rows of cornstalks. Dry straw and leaves crackled beneath my sneakers. 

I was breathing hard by the time I reached the guest house. The doorway 
was dark. But an orange light glowed dimly behind the pulled shade in the 
window. 

I hesitated at the doorway and listened. Silence inside. 



How was I going to get Sticks to come out alone—without his father? 

I didn’t want to frighten Stanley. He was a really nice man, who would 
never think of playing mean jokes on Mark and me. And I knew how scared and 
upset he could get. 

I only wanted to frighten Sticks. To teach him a lesson. To teach him he had 
no business getting on our case just because Mark and I are “city kids”. 

The wind fluttered through my hair. I could hear the cornstalks creaking 
behind me in the fields. 

I shivered. 

Taking a deep breath, I raised my fist to knock on the door. 

But a sound behind me made me spin around. 

“Hey—!” I choked out. 

Someone was moving across the grass, half running, half stumbling. My 
eyes were all watery. It was hard to see. 

Was it Mark? 

Yes. I recognized the floppy hat, the bulky, dark overcoat falling down past 
his knees. 

What is he doing? I asked myself, watching him approach. 

Why is he following me? 

He’s going to ruin the whole joke! 

As he came closer, he raised a straw hand as if pointing at me. 

“Mark—what’s wrong?” I called in a loud whisper. 

He continued to gesture with his straw hand as he ran. 

“Mark—get back in the field!” I whispered. “You’re not supposed to follow 
me. You’re going to ruin everything! Mark—what are you doing here?” 

I motioned with both hands for him to go back to the cornfield. 

But he ignored me and kept coming, trailing straw as he ran. 

“Mark, please—go back! Go back!” I pleaded. 

But he stepped up in front of me and grabbed my shoulders. 

And as I stared into the cold, painted black eyes—I realized to my horror 
that it xvasn’t Mark! 



22 


I cried out and tried to pull away. 

But the scarecrow held on to me tightly. 

“Sticks—is that you?” I cried in a trembling voice. 

No reply. 

I stared into the blank, painted eyes. 

And realized there were no human eyes behind them. 

The straw hands scratched against my throat. 

I opened my mouth to scream. 

And the door to the guest house swung open. “Sticks—” I managed to 
choke out. 

Sticks stepped out onto the small stoop. “What on earth—!” he cried. 

He leaped off the stoop, grabbed the scarecrow by the coat shoulders—and 
heaved it to the ground. 

The scarecrow hit the ground without making a sound. It lay sprawled on its 
back, staring up at us blankly. 

“Who—who is it?” I cried, rubbing my neck where the straw hands had 
scratched it. 

Sticks bent down and jerked away the burlap scarecrow head. 

Nothing underneath. Nothing but straw. 

“It—it really is a scarecrow!” I cried in horror. “But it— walked !” 

“I warned you,” Sticks said solemnly, staring down at the headless dark 
figure. “I warned you, Jodie.” 

“You mean it wasn’t you?” I demanded. “It wasn’t you trying to scare Mark 
and me?” 

Sticks shook his head. He raised his dark eyes to mine. “Dad brought the 
scarecrows to life,” he said softly. “Last week. Before you came. He used his 
book. He chanted some words—and they all came to life.” 

“Oh, no,” I murmured, raising my hands to my face. 

“We were all so frightened,” Sticks continued. “Especially your 
grandparents. They begged Dad to recite the words and put the scarecrows back 
to sleep.” 



“Did he?” I asked. 

“Yes,” Sticks replied. “He put them back to sleep. But first he insisted your 
grandparents make some promises. They had to promise not to laugh at him 
anymore. And they had to promise to do everything he wanted from now on.” 

Sticks took a deep breath. He stared toward the guest house window. 
“Haven’t you noticed how different things are at the farm? Haven’t you noticed 
how frightened your grandparents are?” 

I nodded solemnly. “Of course I have.” 

“They’ve been trying to keep Dad happy,” Sticks continued. “They’ve been 
doing everything they can to keep him from getting upset or angry. Your 
grandmother fixes only his favorite food. Your grandfather stopped telling scary 
stories because Dad doesn’t like them.” 

I shook my head. “They’re that afraid of Stanley?” 

“They’re afraid he’ll read the chant in the book again and bring the 
scarecrows back to life,” Sticks said. He swallowed hard. “There’s only one 
problem,” he murmured. 

“What’s that?” I asked. 

“Well, I haven’t told Dad yet. But...” His voice trailed off. 

“But what?” I demanded eagerly. 

“Some of the scarecrows are still alive,” Sticks replied. “Some of them 
never went back to sleep.” 



23 


We both let out short cries as the front door to the house swung open. 

Startled, I leaped away from the doorway. 

As the door pulled open, it revealed a rectangle of orange light. Stanley 
stepped into the light. 

He held on to the door and peered out. His eyes showed surprise as they 
landed on Sticks and me. But then he goggled and uttered a choking sound as he 
spotted the headless scarecrow on the ground. 

“N-no!” Stanley sputtered. He pointed a trembling finger at the scarecrow. 
“It—it walks! The scarecrow walks!” 

“No, Dad—!” Sticks cried. 

But Stanley didn’t hear him. Stanley had already dived back into the house. 

Sticks started after him. But Stanley reappeared in the doorway. As he 
stepped outside, I saw that he was carrying the big superstition book. 

“The scarecrows walk!” Stanley screamed. “I must take charge! I must take 
charge of them all now!” 

His eyes were wild. His entire skinny body was trembling. He started 
toward the cornfields, totally crazy. Sticks tried to calm him down. 

“No, Dad!” Sticks cried desperately, hurrying after him. “The scarecrow 
was dropped here! I dropped it here, Dad! It didn’t walk! It didn’t walk!” 

Stanley kept walking, taking long, rapid strides. He didn’t seem to hear 
Sticks. “I must take charge now!” Stanley declared. “I must be the leader. I will 
bring the others back to life and take control.” 

He turned and glanced at Sticks, who was hurrying to catch up to him. 
“Stay back!” Stanley shouted. “Stay back—until I read the chant! Then you can 
follow!” 

“Dad—please listen to me!” Sticks cried. “The scarecrows are ah asleep! 
Don’t wake them!” 

Stanley finally stopped a few yards from the edge of the cornfields. He 
turned to Sticks and studied his face. “You’re sure? You’re sure they’re not out 
of my control? You’re sure they’re not walking?” 

Sticks nodded. “Yes. I’m sure, Dad. I’m really sure.” 

Stanley’s face filled with confusion. He kept staring hard at Sticks, as if not 



believing him. “I don’t have to read the chant?” Stanley asked, confused, his 
eyes on the swaying cornstalks. “I don’t have to take charge?” 

“No, Dad,” Sticks replied softly. “The scarecrows are all still. You can put 
the book away. The scarecrows are not moving.” 

Stanley sighed with relief. He lowered the book to his side. “None of 
them?” he asked warily. 

“None of them,” Sticks replied soothingly. 

And that’s when Mark—in full scarecrow costume—decided to come 
staggering out of the cornfield. 



24 


“Where’ve you been?” Mark called. 

Stanley’s eyes went wide, and he opened his mouth in a high shriek of 
terror. 

“Dad, please—!” Sticks pleaded. 

Too late. 

Stanley took off, heading into the cornfields, the big book raised high in 
front of him. “The scarecrows walk! They walk!” he cried. 

Mark tucked at the burlap bag face. “Did we blow it?” he called. “Is the 
joke over? What’s happening?” 

There was no time to answer him. 

Sticks turned to me, his features tight with fear. “We’ve got to stop Dad!” 
he cried. He started running to the swaying cornstalks. 

Stanley had already disappeared between the tall rows of corn. 

My allergies were really bad. I kept rubbing my eyes, trying to clear them. 
But as I followed Sticks, everything was a shimmering blur of grays and blacks. 

“Ow!” I cried out as I stumbled in a soft hole and fell. 

Mark, right behind me, nearly toppled over me. 

He reached down and helped pull me up. I had landed hard on both knees, 
and they were throbbing with pain. 

“Which way did they go?” I asked breathlessly, searching the dark, swaying 
rows of creaking cornstalks. 

“I—I’m not sure!” Mark stammered. “What’s going on, Jodie? Tell me!” 

“Not now!” I told him. “We have to stop Stanley. We have to—” 

Stanley’s voice, high and excited, rose up from somewhere nearby. Mark 
and I both froze as we listened to the strange words he was chanting. 

“Is he reading something from that weird book?” Mark demanded. 

Without answering, I headed in the direction of Stanley’s voice. It was easy 
to follow him. He was chanting the strange words at the top of his lungs. 

Where was Sticks? I wondered. 

Why hadn’t Sticks been able to stop his father? 

I pushed frantically through the tall stalks. I was moving blindly, my eyes 



watered over, brushing the stalks out of the way with both hands. 

In a small clearing, I found Stanley and Sticks. They were standing in front 
of two scarecrows on poles. 

Stanley held the book up close to his face as he chanted, moving his finger 
over the words. 

Sticks stood frozen, a blank expression on his face, a face of cold terror. 

Had the words of the chant somehow frozen him there like that? 

The scarecrows stood stiffly on their poles, their painted eyes staring 
lifelessly out from under their floppy black hats. 

Mark and I stepped into the clearing just as Stanley finished his chant. He 
slammed the big book shut and tucked it under one arm. 

“They’re going to walk now!” Stanley cried excitedly. “They’re going to 
come alive again!” 

Sticks suddenly seemed to come back to life. He blinked several times and 
shook his head hard, as if trying to clear it. 

We all stared at the two scarecrows. 

They stared back at us, lifeless, unmoving. 

The clouds floated away from the moon. The shadow over the cornfields 
rolled away. 

I stared into the eerie, pale light. 

A heavy silence descended over us. The only sounds I could hear were 
Stanley’s shallow breathing, tense gasps as he waited for his chant to work, for 
his scarecrows to come to life. 

I don’t know how long we stood there, none of us moving a muscle, 
watching the scarecrows. Watching. Watching. 

“It didn’t work,” Stanley moaned finally. His voice came out sad and low. 
“I did something wrong. The chant—it didn’t work.” 

A smile grew on Sticks’ face. He gazed at me. “It didn’t work!” Sticks 
exclaimed happily. 

And then I heard the scratch scratch scratch of dry straw. 

I saw the scarecrows’ shoulders start to twitch. I saw their eyes light up and 
their heads lean forward. 

Scratch scratch scratch. 

The dry straw crinkled loudly as they both squirmed off their poles and 
lowered themselves silently to the ground. 



25 


“Go warn your grandparents!” Sticks cried. “Hurry! Go tell them what my dad 
has done! ” 

Mark and I hesitated. We stared at the scarecrows as they stretched their 
arms and rolled their burlap bag heads, as if waking up after a long sleep. 

“Jodie—look!” Mark choked out in a hushed whisper. He pointed out to the 
fields. 

I gasped in horror as I saw what Mark was staring at. 

All over the field, dark-coated scarecrows were stretching, squirming, 
lowering themselves from their poles. 

More than a dozen of them, silently coming to life. 

“Run!” Sticks was screaming. “Go! Tell your grandparents!” 

Stanley stood frozen in place, gripping the book in both hands. He stared in 
amazement, shaking his head, enjoying his triumph. 

Sticks’ face was knotted with fear. He gave my shoulders a hard shove. 
“Run!” 

The scarecrows were rolling their heads back and forth, stretching out their 
straw arms. The dry scratch of straw filled the night air. 

I forced myself to take my eyes off them. Mark and I turned and started 
mnning through the cornfield. We pushed the tall stalks away with both hands as 
we ran. We ducked our heads low, running in terrified silence. 

We ran across the grass, past the guest house. Past the dark, silent barn. 

The farmhouse loomed darkly ahead of us. The windows were dark. A dim 
porch light sent a circle of yellow light over the back porch. 

“Hey—!” Mark shouted, pointing. 

Grandpa Kurt and Grandma Miriam must have heard our shouts back in the 
cornfields. They were waiting for us in the back yard. 

They looked frail and frightened. Grandma Miriam had pulled a flannel 
bathrobe over her nightdress. She had a scarf tied over her short red hair. 

Grandpa Kurt had pulled his overalls on over his pajamas. He leaned 
heavily on his cane, shaking his head as Mark and I came running up. 

“The scarecrows—!” I exclaimed breathlessly. 

“They’re walking!” Mark cried. “Stanley—he—” 



“Did you get Stanley upset?” Grandpa Kurt asked, his eyes wide with fear. 
“Who got Stanley upset? He promised us he wouldn’t do it again! He promised 
—if we didn’t upset him.” 

“It was an accident!” I told him. “We didn’t mean to. Really!” 

“We’ve worked so hard to keep Stanley happy,” Grandma Miriam said 
sadly. She chewed her lower lip. “So hard...” 

“I didn’t think he’d do it,” Grandpa Kurt said, his eyes on the cornfields. “I 
thought we convinced him it was too dangerous.” 

“Why are you dressed like that?” Grandma Miriam asked Mark. 

I was so frightened and upset, I had completely forgotten that Mark was 
still dressed as a scarecrow. 

“Mark, did you dress like that to scare Stanley?” Grandma Miriam 
demanded. 

“No!” Mark cried. “It was supposed to be a joke! Just a joke!” 

“We were trying to scare Sticks,” I told them. “But when Stanley saw Mark, 
he...” 

My voice trailed off as I saw the dark figures step out of the cornfields. 

In the silvery moonlight, I saw Stanley and Sticks. They were running hard, 
leaning forward as they ran. Stanley held the book in front of him. His shoes 
slipped and slid over the wet grass. 

Behind them came the scarecrows. They were moving awkwardly, 
staggering, lurching silently forward. 

Their straw arms stretched straight forward, as if reaching to grab Stanley 
and Sticks. Their round, black eyes glowed blankly in the moonlight. 

Staggering, tumbling, falling, they came after Stanley and Sticks. A dozen 
twisted figures in black coats and hats. Leaving clumps of straw as they pulled 
themselves forward. 

Grandma Miriam grabbed my arm and squeezed it in terror. Her hand was 
as cold as ice. 

We watched Stanley fall, then scramble to his feet. Sticks helped pull him 
up, and the two of them continued to run toward us in terror. 

The silent scarecrows lurched and staggered closer. Closer. 

“Help us— please !” Stanley called to us. 

“What can we do?” I heard Grandpa Kurt mutter sadly. 



26 


The four of us huddled close together, staring in helpless horror as the 
scarecrows made their way, chasing Stanley and Sticks across the moonlit lawn. 

Grandma Miriam held on to my arm. Grandpa Kurt leaned heavily, 
squeezing the handle of his cane. 

“They won’t obey me!” Stanley screamed breathlessly. He stopped in front 
of us, holding the book in one hand. 

His chest was heaving up and down as he struggled to catch his breath. 
Despite the coolness of the night, sweat poured down his forehead. 

“They won’t obey me! They must obey me! The book says so!” Stanley 
cried, frantically waving the book in the air. 

Sticks stopped beside his father. He turned to watch the scarecrows 
approach. “What are you going to do?” he asked his father. “You have to do 
something!” 

“They’re alive!” Stanley shrieked. “Alive!” 

“What does the book say?” Grandpa Kurt demanded. 

“They’re alive! They’re all alive!” Stanley repeated, his eyes wild with 
fright. 

“Stanley—listen to me!” Grandpa Kurt yelled. He grabbed Stanley by the 
shoulders and spun him around to face him. “Stanley—what does the book say 
to do? How do you get them in control?” 

“Alive,” Stanley murmured, his eyes rolling in his head. “They’re all alive.” 

“Stanley—what does the book say to do?” Grandpa Kurt demanded once 
again. 

“I—I don’t know,” Stanley replied. 

We turned back to the scarecrows. They were moving closer. Spreading out. 
Forming a line as they staggered toward us. Their arms reached forward 
menacingly, as if preparing to grab us. 

Clumps of straw fell from their sleeves. Straw spilled from their coats. 

But they continued to lurch toward us. Closer. Closer. 

The black, painted eyes stared straight ahead. They leered at us with their 
ugly, painted mouths. 

“Stop!” Stanley screamed, raising the book high over his head. “I command 



you to stop!” 

The scarecrows lurched slowly, steadily forward. 

“Stop!” Stanley shrieked in a high, frightened voice. “I brought you to life! 
You are mine! Mine! I command you! I command you to stop!” 

The blank eyes stared straight at us. The arms reached stiffly forward. The 
scarecrows pulled themselves closer. Closer. 

“Stop! I said stop!” Stanley screeched. 

Mark edged closer to me. Behind his burlap mask I could see his eyes. 
Terrified eyes. 

Ignoring Stanley’s frightened pleas, the scarecrows dragged themselves 
closer. Closer. 

And then I did something that changed the whole night. 

I sneezed. 



27 


Mark was so startled by my sudden, loud sneeze that he let out a short cry and 
jumped away from me. 

To my amazement, the scarecrows all stopped moving forward—and 
jumped back, too. 

“Whoa!” I cried. “What’s going on here?” 

The scarecrows all seemed to have trained their painted eyes on Mark. 

“Mark—quick—raise your right hand!” I cried. 

Mark gazed at me through the burlap bag. I could see confusion in his eyes. 

But he obediently raised his right hand high over his head. 

And the scarecrows all raised their right hands! 

“Mark—they’re imitating you!” Grandma Miriam cried. 

Mark raised both hands in the air. 

The scarecrows copied him again. I heard the scratch of straw as they lifted 
both arms. 

Mark tilted his head to the left. The scarecrows tilted their heads to the left. 

Mark dropped to his knees. The scarecrows sank in their straw, slaves to my 
brother’s every move. 

“They—they think you’re one of them,” Grandpa Kurt whispered. 

“They think you’re their leader !” Stanley cried, staring wide-eyed at the 
scarecrows slumped on the ground. 

“But how do I make them go back to their poles?” Mark demanded 
excitedly. “How do I make them go back to being scarecrows?” 

“Dad—find the right chant!” Sticks yelled. “Find the right words! Make 
them sleep again!” 

Stanley scratched his short, dark hair. “I—I’m too scared!” he confessed 
sadly. 

And then I had an idea. 

“Mark—” I whispered, leaning close to him. “Pull off your head.” 

“Huh?” He gazed at me through the burlap mask. 

“Pull off your scarecrow head,” I urged him, still whispering. 

“But why?” Mark demanded. He waved his hands in the air. The 



scarecrows obediently waved their straw hands in the air. 

Everyone was staring at me, eager to hear my explanation. 

“If you pull off your scarecrow head,” I told Mark, “then they will pull off 
their heads. And they’ll die.” 

Mark hesitated. “Huh? You think so?” 

“It’s worth a try,” Grandpa Kurt urged. 

“Go ahead, Mark. Hurry!” Sticks cried. 

Mark hesitated for a second. Then he stepped forward, just inches from the 
dark-coated scarecrows. 

“Hurry!” Sticks urged him. 

Mark gripped the top of the burlap bag with both hands. “I sure hope this 
works,” he murmured. Then he gave the bag a hard tug and pulled it off. 



28 


The scarecrows stopped moving. They stood still as statues as they watched 
Mark pull off his scarecrow head. 

Mark stared back at them, holding the burlap bag between his hands. His 
hair was matted wetly to his forehead. He was dripping with sweat. 

The scarecrows hesitated for a moment more. 

A long, silent moment. 

I held my breath. My heart was pounding. 

Then I let out a happy cry as the scarecrows all reached up with their straw 
hands—and pulled off their heads! 

The dark hats and burlap heads fell silently to the grass. 

None of us moved. We were waiting for the scarecrows to fall. 

Waiting for the headless scarecrows to collapse and fall. 

But they didn’t go down. 

Instead, they reached out their arms and moved stiffly, menacingly forward. 

“They—they’re coming to get us!” Stanley cried in a high, trembling voice. 

“Mark —do something!” I shouted, shoving him forward. “Make them stand 
on one foot or hop up and down. Stop them!” 

The headless figures dragged themselves toward us, arms outstretched. 

Mark stepped forward. He raised both hands over his head. 

The scarecrows didn’t stop, didn’t copy him. 

“Hey—hands up!” Mark shouted desperately. He waved his hands above 
his head. 

The scarecrows edged forward, silently, steadily. 

“Th-they’re not doing it!” Mark wailed. “They’re not following me!” 

“You don’t look like a scarecrow anymore,” Grandma Miriam added. “They 
don’t think you’re their leader.” 

Closer they came, staggering blindly. Closer. 

They formed a tight circle around us. 

A scarecrow brushed its straw hand against my cheek. 

I uttered a terrified cry. “Noooooo!” 

It reached for my throat, the dry straw scratching me, scratching my face, 



scratching, scratching. 

The headless scarecrows swarmed over Mark. He thrashed and kicked. But 
they were smothering him, forcing him to the ground. 

My grandparents cried out helplessly as the dark-coated figures surrounded 
them. Stanley let out a silent gasp. 

“Sticks—help me!” I shrieked as the straw hands wrapped around my neck. 
“Sticks? Sticks?” 

I glanced frantically around. 

“Sticks? Help me! Please! Where are you?” 

Then I realized to my horror that Sticks was gone. 



29 


“Sticks?” I let out a final muffled cry. 

The straw hands wrapped around my throat. The scarecrow rolled over me. 
My face was pressed into the dry straw of its chest. 

I tried to squirm free. But it held on, surrounded me, choked me. 

The straw smelled sour. Decayed. I felt sick. A wave of nausea swept over 
me. 

“Let go! Let go!” I heard Stanley pleading. 

The scarecrow was surprisingly strong. It wrapped its arms around me 
tightly, smothering me in the disgusting straw. 

I made one last attempt to pull free. Struggling with all my might, I raised 
my head. 

And saw two balls of fire. Orange streaks of light. 

Floating closer. 

And in the orange light, I saw Sticks’ face, hard and determined. 

I gave another hard tug. And tumbled backwards. 

“Sticks!” I cried. 

He was carrying two blazing torches. The torches from the barn, I realized. 
“I was saving these just in case!” Sticks called. 

The scarecrows seemed to sense danger. 

They let go of us, tried to scramble away. 

But Sticks moved quickly. 

He swept the two torches, swinging them like baseball bats. 

A scarecrow caught fire. Then another. 

Sticks made another wide swing. 

The fire crackled, a streak of orange against the darkness. 

The dry straw burst into flame. The old coats burned quickly. 

The scarecrows twisted and writhed as the bright flames danced over them. 
They sank to their backs on the ground. Burning. Burning so brightly, so silently, 
so fast. 

I took a step back, staring in horror and fascination. 

Grandpa Kurt had his arm around Grandma Miriam. They leaned close 



together, their faces reflecting the flickering flames. 

Stanley stood tensely, his eyes wide. He hugged the book tightly to his 
chest. He was murmuring to himself, but I couldn’t make out the words. 

Mark and I stood beside Sticks, who held a torch in each hand, watching 
with narrowed eyes as the scarecrows burned. 

In seconds, there was nothing left but clumps of dark ashes on the ground. 

“It’s over,” Grandma Miriam murmured softly, gratefully. 

“Never again,” I heard Stanley mutter. 

The house was quiet the next afternoon. 

Mark was out on the screen porch, lying in the hammock, reading a stack of 
comic books. Grandpa Kurt and Grandma Miriam had gone in for their 
afternoon nap. 

Sticks had driven into town to pick up the mail. 

Stanley sat at the kitchen table, reading his superstition book. His finger 
moved over the page as he muttered the words aloud in a low voice. 

“Never again,” he had repeated at lunch. “I’ve learned my lesson about this 
book. I’ll never try to bring any scarecrows to life again. I won’t even read the 
part about scarecrows!” 

We were all glad to hear that. 

So now, on this lazy, peaceful afternoon, Stanley sat at the table, quietly 
reading some chapter of the big book. 

And I sat alone on the couch in the living room, hearing Stanley’s gentle 
murmurings from the kitchen, thinking about the night before. 

It felt good to have a quiet afternoon, to be all alone to think about what had 
happened. 

All alone... 

The only one in the room... 

The only one to hear Stanley’s low mumbling as he read the book. 

The only one to see the gigantic stuffed brown bear blink its eyes. 

The only one to see the bear lick its lips, step off its platform, snarl and paw 
the air with its enormous claws. 

The only one to hear its stomach growl as it stared down at me. 

The only one to see the hungry look on its face as it magically came out of 
its long hibernation. 

“Stanley?” I called in a tiny, high voice. “Stanley? What chapter have you 
been reading?” 
